 Housing and Urban Development officials provided lucrative housing subsidies and gave preferential treatment to a project linked to former HUD Secretary Samuel Pierce's old law firm and politically connected developers.  Internal HUD records show that funding for the 316-unit, Amherst, N.Y., project was awarded in an irregular fashion and that a critical waiver of federal regulations was granted in 1988, saving the developers from losing their $1.8 million annual rent subsidy.  One of the developers, Stephen Ross, a prominent Manhattan real estate executive, contributed $100,000 to the Republican Party last year.  His spokesman said the donation wasn't connected to the Amherst project, known as the Allenhurst apartments.  Mr. Ross was represented in the project by the New York law firm of Battle, Fowler, of which Mr. Pierce used to be a partner.  Battle Fowler, which has represented Mr. Ross since 1972, also served as attorneys for the underwriters on a New York state revenue bond issue that was used to finance renovation of the multimillion dollar project.  The firm, which didn't return phone calls, was paid about $25,000 by the underwriters for its work on the bond issue, according to New York state officials.  The second major partner in the project, Dennis Penman, was chairman of the Erie County, N.Y., 1984 Reagan-Bush campaign committee and also a longtime friend and fund-raiser for former Republican Rep. Jack Kemp, the current HUD secretary whose congressional district included the Buffalo, N.Y., suburbs.  Mr. Penman, executive vice president of a prominent Amherst, N.Y., real estate concern known as M.J. Peterson Co., said Mr. Kemp played no role in the project's funding.  Mr. Kemp's spokeswoman said he didn't know anything about the project.  Government records and interviews showed that Mr. Penman played a key role in obtaining funds for the Allenhurst project.  A HUD inspector general's audit of the project and other documents strongly suggest that he had inside information enabling him to win backing.  But Mr. Penman insisted in interviews that he enjoyed no such advantage and had always operated "in good faith and above board."  The Allenhurst project, whose subsidy will total $26.6 million over 15 years, was approved by HUD for funding in December 1984, according to HUD records.  A letter in the files of Mr. Pierce, released last week by HUD officials, indicates his former executive assistant, Deborah Gore Dean, played an important role in lining up HUD support for the project.  In a February 1985 letter, a Battle Fowler partner, Martin Edelman, wrote Ms. Dean asking for help in obtaining funds for a second rent-subsidy project.  Referring to the Allenhurst project, he wrote: "You may remember that you helped us achieve a similar transaction through the New York State Housing Finance Agency last year."  A copy of the letter was sent to Mr. Pierce's confidential assistant, Starr Eckert.  As has been the case throughout the three-month-old HUD scandal, Mr. Pierce didn't return phone calls seeking comment.  Ms. Dean's attorneys, Charles Leeper and Joseph Artabane, said in a brief statement that the existence of Mr. Edelman's letter in Mr. Pierce's files shows "whatever involvement Ms. Dean had in the decision-making process occurred with the knowledge and approval" of Mr. Pierce.  Irregularities in the Allenhurst funding process are listed in the inspector general's report on the project and other records obtained by The Wall Street Journal.  Money for rent-subsidy projects, including the Allenhurst one, came from discretionary funds that were controlled by Mr. Pierce and his staff.  The funds were supposed to be awarded to developers by state and local public housing authorities after competitive bidding, but investigators have found that the competitive process sometimes was ignored.  In the Allenhurst case, rent subsidy funds are being funneled to the developers through the New York State Housing Finance Agency.  The state agency awarded the funds to the Penman-Ross partnership after applying to HUD for the money.  That was the only time it has ever sought funds under the rent-subsidy program.  Mr. Penman said the New York agency also issued about $8.5 million in tax-exempt revenue bonds to provide construction and permanent financing for the project.  He said the debt will be paid off by the partnership over 30 years.  The project also is insured by HUD.  The inspector general's audit and related documents explore how Mr. Penman got the New York agency to apply for HUD funds.  One inspector general interview report quotes Kenneth Lobene, a HUD official in Buffalo, as saying Mr. Penman told him that he had access to rent-subsidy funds in Washington.  Mr. Penman denies making such statements and said he was misunderstood.  Mr. Penman in 1984 asked Belmont Shelter Corp., a nonprofit organization that acts as a public housing authority for Erie County, to apply for HUD rent subsidies for Allenhurst.  Belmont turned him down because his request was for too many units and because the organization already had a waiting list of 86 proposals.  A Belmont official told the inspector general that it hadn't received any rent-subsidy funds under the discretionary program.  The inspector general's documents show Mr. Penman turned to the New York State Housing Finance Agency at the suggestion of a Buffalo HUD official.  The New York agency requested funds from HUD in a Nov. 21, 1984, letter to a senior HUD official in Washington.  A copy was sent to Ms. Dean.  Within three weeks, HUD notified the state agency of the award.  The New York agency, in turn, made the funds available to the Allenhurst project, without publicly advertising the availability of the rent-subsidy funds as required by HUD regulations.  A HUD team uncovered the failure to comply with the public-notice requirement when it reviewed the New York state agency in May 1987.  In Washington, HUD staffers who reviewed the situation recommended that funding for the Allenhurst project be cancelled.  But a senior HUD official, Hunter Cushing, urged that officials grant a retroactive waiver of the public-notice requirement.  Mr. Cushing argued that if the contract with Allenhurst were canceled and the developers defaulted, HUD might have to pay an $8.6 million claim because the project was fully insured by HUD.  HUD officials in Washington and Buffalo ultimately approved the waiver.  A former senior HUD official said the department had no choice but to grant the waiver or face a possible large insurance claim.  But this official stressed that HUD had failed to monitor the project closely and should never have allowed funds to be awarded on a preferential basis and without competitive bidding.  Messrs.  Penman and Ross over the years have been heavily involved in HUD-related projects.  Mr. Ross declined to be interviewed, but his spokesman, Martin McLaughlin said, "I know that Steve was not peddling influence."  He added: "He was financially backing the deal and Penman came to him with the deal."  He said that although Mr. Pierce's old firm, Battle Fowler, had represented Mr. Ross and his company, Related Companies, Inc., for years, Mr. Ross didn't know Mr. Pierce.  Mr. McLaughlin also said Mr. Ross made his $100,000 political contribution last year in response to a GOP "Team 100" campaign soliciting donations of that amount for use at the state or national level.  Mr. Penman said he had met Mr. Pierce and once organized a June 1984 Buffalo event in which Mr. Pierce visited one of his projects.  But he said he had never talked to Mr. Pierce about the Allenhurst project.  He said he learned that rent-subsidy funds might be available in 1984 through his involvement with the National Association of Home Builders.  UAL Corp. took a step toward a possible sale of the nation's second-largest airline by saying it will explore all of its options instead of rejecting a $5.4 billion bid from Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  After a five-hour special board meeting, the Chicago-based parent of United Airlines said it plans "to explore all possible financial and strategic alternatives open to the company."  The quick launch of the review was surprising because UAL Monday called Mr. Davis's offer "an unsolicited, highly conditional proposal."  UAL said the review would include "continuing its strategic business plans as an independent, publicly owned company."  But such reviews often open the door to an auction-style procedure that ends in a sale.  Other alternatives could include a recapitalization.  In a brief statement, Mr. Davis responded, "We are encouraged by the board's response and look forward to a meeting with the company and its representatives as soon as possible."  If the UAL study does result in an auction, it could well attract many of the same bidders who pursued Northwest Airlines' parent NWA Inc., which was sold for $3.65 billion to Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi last month.  The losing NWA bidders included the leveraged buy-out firms of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. and Forstmann, Little & Co. and Pan Am Corp. People who know the buy-out firms say KKR and Forstmann Little are likely to bid.  And yesterday Pan Am Chairman Thomas Plaskett said in an interview with the New York Daily News that Pan Am may consider bidding for UAL if the company is put up for sale.  Pan Am, parent of Pan American World Airways, has been seeking a merger partner for several months now to buttress its domestic route network.  The board convened a special meeting at midafternoon yesterday under mounting pressure from a continuing rise in UAL's stock price, which soared $24.625 a share to $243.875 yesterday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The latest price rise followed news that Mr. Davis's bid was $240 a share, somewhat higher than expected for an initial proposal.  In its statement, issued at 9:10 p.m. EDT, the board said it would be "premature to make a decision as to whether a sale of the company to Mr. Davis or any other party at the present time would be appropriate."  UAL Chairman Stephen L. Wolf added that the board still wants "to promote the long-term growth of United Airlines as a major U.S. carrier."  In its deliberations, he said, the board will consider its customers, employees and the communities in which it operates as well as its stockholders.  Many observers had predicted the UAL board would either reject Mr. Davis's bid outright because of its informal nature or take more time to study the situation before responding.  The speed with which it opened up a full review may have been influenced by the course of events surrounding Mr. Davis's bid for Northwest Airlines' parent NWA Inc. last spring.  Only a few weeks after rejecting Mr. Davis's bid, NWA began a review similar to UAL's after Mr. Davis took steps to oust the NWA board by launching a proxy fight and starting a procedure known as a consent solicitation.  By launching a review of all of its options immediately, the UAL board could spare itself such indignities.  Since the Davis bid was first reported Monday, 5.6 million UAL shares have traded, or 26% of the 21.6 million shares outstanding.  Many of the buyers have been takeover stock traders who would favor a sale.  In that period, UAL's stock has risen nearly 50%.  "What they're doing is playing for time," said Robert Joedicke, an airline expert at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  He said the move allows the board to "keep {Mr.  Davis} at arm's length while it waits to see if there is anybody else out there" interested in bidding.  Kevin Murphy, an airline analyst with Morgan Stanley & Co., said Mr. Davis's bid of $240 a share, which Mr. Davis said he might raise after a look at UAL data, is "at the low end of an acceptable bid."  He estimated if the company is sold it could fetch $300 a share, or $6.75 billion.  An acquirer would have to buy 22.5 million UAL shares on a fully diluted basis, counting unexercised options.  UAL's response may also reflect Mr. Wolf's reported interest in pursuing a management-led buy-out himself.  There have been reports that he would entertain a buy-out and rumors he is already pursuing such a plan.  Mr. Wolf has declined to comment.  A takeover at a price of only $250 a share would give Mr. Wolf a profit of about $42 million on 250,000 stock options he holds.  What's more, management usually gets about a 10% to 20% ownership stake in a company that undergoes a buy-out, giving Mr. Wolf the chance for far greater gains if the company prospers.  Separately, there were new indications yesterday that United's most influential labor group, the pilots union, would be willing to participate in a management buy-out.  Previously, the union had said it wanted to make its own bid if the company became a takeover target.  Many analysts and even some pilot leaders have said they believed the pilots union wouldn't be willing to participate in a transaction led by Mr. Wolf because of the union's history of stormy relations with the UAL chairman.  The pilots have been feuding with Mr. Wolf for nearly two years over terms of a new contract.  The union has said repeatedly it wants majority ownership for employees.  After conferring with their advisers over the past three days, union leaders apparently believe they might be able to accomplish that goal under a management buy-out.  Whatever agreement is worked out, the union is likely to insist that employees have a large enough stake in the transaction so that they can influence major corporate decisions.  Mr. Wolf would have difficulty completing a buy-out without support from the pilots and other unions.  A spokesman for the International Association of Machinists, which represents United mechanics, said that union won't support any transaction, led by management or otherwise, that doesn't protect union members' jobs and shield them from the sale of assets.  Separately, Saul Steinberg, chairman of one of UAL's largest shareholders, Reliance Group Holdings Inc., announced that Reliance Capital Group, a private leveraged buy-out fund he controls, is negotiating to sell some of its Days Inns hotels for $90 million.  Takeover stock traders are watching Reliance closely.  They believe Mr. Steinberg, who became friends with Mr. Wolf when the UAL chairman engineered a turnaround of Tiger International Inc., may be advising Mr. Wolf on the situation and might participate in a UAL buy-out.  The dollar was slightly higher, largely unruffled by the release of the U.S. Federal Reserve's Beige Book survey of the U.S. economy.  Foreign-exchange traders said the report, prepared to help the Federal Open Market Committee gauge the economy at its Aug. 22 meeting to review monetary policy, made for fairly bland reading.  Without direction from the Fed report or from an unspectacular auction of $9.76 billion in 10-year bonds in part of a U.S. Treasury quarterly refinancing program, the dollar meandered in calm trading through the day.  "Very early in the day it became obvious that there just wasn't much going on in the forex market," said Frank Watson, chief of corporate foreign exchange at Swiss Bank Corp. in New York.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.8975 marks, up from 1.8925 marks Tuesday, and at 139.15 yen, up from 138.75 yen.  Sterling was at $1.6221, down from $1.6265.  In Tokyo Thursday, the dollar opened for trading at 138.70 yen, down from Wednesday's Tokyo close of 138.85 yen.  The dollar came under pressure Wednesday in early Asian trading as participants seemed eager to check support for the U.S. unit at the technically important 1.89-mark level.  Buyers of the U.S. currency emerged in sufficient force at those levels to stanch selling interest, and the dollar began a drift upward that endured through European dealings.  The dollar peaked in early New York dealings, hovering near its intraday highs of 1.9050 marks and 139.42 yen, until slipping after the release of the Beige Book.  Some traders said the dollar's slide following the report's release was only a coincidence, explaining that the U.S. currency, in testing the upper end of the day's range, had exhausted buying interest.  They pointed to the placid pace of New York afternoon dealings as evidence the report didn't ruffle the market.  Others theorized that some participants had hoped, after last Friday's healthy employment figures, that the report would raise the specter of resurging inflation, delaying further credit easing by the Fed.  After dissecting the report, however, the market found its contents quite familiar, analysts said.  "We all know the economy is slowing, and that is what the Beige Book is saying," said Michael Penzer, vice president and senior economist at Bank of America in San Francisco.  The report, which takes an "impressionistic" view of activities in the 12 Fed districts, supports the "hard statistics" released since the last open market committee meeting, Mr. Penzer said.  He said the information in the Beige Book was gathered up to Aug. 1, before last Friday's release of a stronger-than-expected U.S. employment report in July, which sparked an energetic rally in the dollar.  In interpreting the Beige Book's contents, the committee is unlikely to find any reason to alter its recent approach to monetary policy, traders said.  The Fed, after allowing the federal funds rate -- charged on overnight loans between banks -- to fall to its current 9% middling range, will hold fast to current credit conditions until more economic data is in, they said.  Most economists and traders don't expect the Fed to feel the urge to ease again until at least the end of the month, or perhaps mid-September.  The Treasury's bond sale, the second leg of a three-day refinancing operation, was fairly uneventful, traders said.  No unexpected interest in the U.S. debt surfaced from overseas, leaving yields little changed and creating no new demand for dollars to fund the purchases, they said.  Traders' attention is now focusing on the release tomorrow of U.S. producer-price and retail-sales data for July.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $366.90 an ounce, up 70 cents.  Estimated volume was light at 1.9 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was quoted at $365.85 an ounce.  Italian financier Giancarlo Parretti and Italian movie producer Dino De Laurentiis have jointly made an offer to buy the ailing De Laurentiis Entertainment Group Inc. for about $41.5 million in cash, according to a court filing.  That offer, disclosed in a filing in U.S. Bankruptcy Court, tops a bid by Carolco Pictures Inc. to buy the movie company for about $28 million cash plus about $5 million of stock in the reorganized company.  The filing was made by the creditors' committee of De Laurentiis Entertainment.  The disclosure of the Parretti-De Laurentiis joint bid came as a surprise in Hollywood because Mr. Parretti announced last March that he had ended talks to buy De Laurentiis Entertainment for about $22 million.  At that time, he was bidding through Pathe Communications Corp., formerly Cannon Group Inc., a public movie company that he controls.  This time, however, Mr. Parretti's much higher bid was made through Comfinance S.A., a private company he controls, along with companies controlled by Dino De Laurentiis, the founder and ousted head of De Laurentiis Entertainment.  Mr. De Laurentiis was forced out as chairman and chief executive officer in February 1988 after a string of losses.  De Laurentiis Entertainment has been operating under Chapter 11 of federal bankruptcy law since last August.  Earlier this month, the company filed a lawsuit against Mr. De Laurentiis charging that he made a series of fraudulent business deals with the company.  That suit seeks more than $50 million in damages.  Yesterday, Mr. De Laurentiis couldn't be reached for comment.  A lawyer for Pathe said Mr. Parretti was traveling in Asia.  The two Italian movie executives are friends and it has been rumored that Mr. Parretti has been interested in buying the ailing movie company partly for his ousted friend.  Mr. De Laurentiis controls about 61% of the company's stock.  According to the filing, Mr. De Laurentiis also has claimed that his companies are owed about $28 million by the troubled company.  Earlier this year, Mr. Parretti bought the building that houses De Laurentiis Entertainment.  He had an architect add offices for himself and other Pathe executives.  Meanwhile, Mr. De Laurentiis retains an office in the building and has continued to work at producing movies.  In the filing, the creditors' committee says it believes that Carolco's offer represents "the best offer," despite being a lower bid.  The filing says that the difference in amount between the two offers is "more than offset" by the business practices and financial condition of Carolco that the committee "believes are superior to those of" the companies controlled by Messrs.  Parretti and De Laurentiis.  The committee adds in the filing that it believes there is a greater likelihood that Carolco will complete the transaction with De Laurentiis Entertainment.  The commitee noted that Mr. Parretti failed to follow through in his planned acquisitions of New World Entertainment, Peregrine Entertainment Ltd. and Kings Road Entertainment Inc.  The filing also mentions the negative publicity Mr. Parretti has received and such articles were attached in the filing.  BUSH VOWED to pursue every diplomatic channel to free U.S. hostages.  The president said the White House was open to talks to win the release of captives in Lebanon, but ruled out "trading" for their freedom.  Bush also renewed an appeal for Iran's help in the hostage crisis.  In southern Lebanon, a Moslem launched a suicide attack on Israeli troops, driving an explosives-laden truck into an army convoy.  Six people were wounded.  The pro-Iranian Hezbollah called the assault a "down payment" for Israel's abduction of a Shiite cleric.  Israel said the attack was "another horrible reminder" of security problems along its northern border, and an official in the area threatened to retaliate.  ---  POWELL IS EXPECTED to be named chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.  The four-star Army general, national security adviser to Reagan, is expected to be named to the post by Bush today, a senior administration official said.  The chairman of the Joint Chiefs, the nation's senior military officer, is the principal military adviser to the president and defense secretary.  Powell would become the first black to hold the post.  Upon confirmation by the Senate, the 52-year-old Powell would succeed Adm. Crowe, who is to retire Sept. 30.  Bush's decision means that Powell, who is expected to be well-received on Capitol Hill, will leapfrog over several more senior military officers.  ---  Poland's Peasant Party leader said the traditional Communist Party ally would join Solidarity in voting against a Communist-led coalition government.  In Gdansk, officials of the trade union called for a one-hour strike Friday at 470 factories to protest food price increases of as much as 500% under a government-imposed "marketization" plan.  ---  The Justice Department confirmed that it has asked some prestigious colleges and universities for documents as part of an antitrust inquiry into tuition and student-aid rates.  Former government officials and antitrust experts said some 20 schools may have violated federal law by exchanging financial data.  ---  U.S. military forces blockaded Fort Amador in Panama City for more than three hours after two American servicemen were arrested by Panama's military authorities.  The U.S. troops withdrew after the soldiers were exchanged for two arrested Panamanians.  The fort is a shared U.S.-Panama area that houses Noriega's office.  ---  HUD aides provided lucrative housing subsidies and gave preferential treatment to a housing project linked to Pierce's old law firm and politically connected developers.  Records show that funding for the Amherst, N.Y., project was awarded in an irregular fashion and that a waiver of federal rules was granted in 1988.  ---  Japan's Kaifu assumed the office of prime minister and, in an apparent attempt to bolster the Liberal Democratic Party's image as it heads into parliamentary elections, included two women in his new cabinet.  Kaifu's other cabinet choices maintained an acceptable balance between the various LDP factions.  ---  About 20,000 ethnic Russians joined a strike in the republic of Estonia to protest Tuesday's approval of legislation that tightens residency requirements to vote and run for public office.  The new law was aimed at stemming the influence of Estonia's Russian minority.  The strike affected several factories and public transport.  ---  Ethiopian rescue workers extended their search into Sudan in an attempt to find Democratic Rep. Leland of Texas and 13 others who disappeared Monday while flying to a refugee camp in southwestern Ethiopia.  The U.S. sent military and medical personnel to assist in the search.  Leland had been inspecting relief efforts in Africa.  ---  Cambodia's Hun Sen met in Phnom Penh with a 15-member U.N. delegation.  The pro-Vietnamese premier rejected a U.N. role in resolving the Southeast Asian nation's decade-long conflict until the world body ends its support for a three-party rebel coalition that includes the Khmer Rouge guerrillas.  ---  A train derailed on the Pacific coast railroad in northwestern Mexico, killing at least 73 people and injuring about 80 others, officials said.  Poor track conditions and bad weather in Sinaloa state appeared to have caused the accident, at least the fifth involving a train in Mexico this year.  ---  China's leadership expelled two leading social scientists from the Communist Party.  Yan Jiaqi and Bao Zunxin, who urged the dismissal of Premier Li Peng in May, are believed to be the first party members ousted in Beijing's two-month-old crackdown on dissent.  They also lost their research posts, the Xinhua news agency said.  ---  Hungary's fledgling opposition said the Communist Party had destroyed the nation in 42 years of rule, but offered to cooperate with some lawmakers after free elections planned for next year.  The parliamentary group ruled out any coalition with the Communists before the general elections.  ---  Three Salvadoran rebels were killed in fighting with government forces after President Cristiani urged the guerrillas to adopt a cease-fire ahead of peace talks with the rightist government.  An accord signed this week by five Central American leaders meeting in Honduras calls for such talks.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Limited Inc. $ .35 ... $ .25 (13) 40.00  @Newmont Gold Co. .27 ... .20 (6) 35.00  @Wal-Mart Stores .39 ... .34 (14) 14.71  @NEECO Inc. .35 ... .31 (3) 12.90  @Aon Corp. .94 ... .89 (7) 5.62  @ NEGATIVE  @Eldon Inds $ .24 ... $ .28 (5) 14.29  @Roy F Weston A .14 ... .16 (4) 12.50  @Country Lake .27 ... .30 (3) 10.00  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  THE ROMANS RULED THEIR EMPIRE via 50,000 miles of roads that took 500 years to build.  Dwight Eisenhower signed a law in 1956 that called for more than 41,000 miles of interstate highways in 10 years.  The effect on America was profound, increasing mobility but at the cost of urban sprawl and the decline of traditional cities.  Ike had learned about highways the hard way.  In 1919, he led a coast-to-coast Army convoy that fought rutted roads and broken axles on a 58-day trip that averaged barely 5 mph.  As a World War II commander, he had marveled at Hitler's high-speed autobahns.  As president at the height of the Cold War, he wondered how any city could be evacuated in a nuclear war without super-highways.  He also thought a grand-scale road program might smooth the bumps in the U.S. economy.  In 1954, Ike sent Vice President Richard Nixon to talk up a $50 billion program at a Governors' Conference and naming Army colleague Lucius Clay to study how to finance it.  Clay proposed bond issues paid off by gasoline and tire taxes.  Ike liked it, but Congress didn't.  He got his way in 1956.  In June, he signed a pay-as-you-go bill for a $33 billion National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, limited-access roads engineered for speeds up to 75 mph.  Not everything went according to plan, Ike was horrified when his roads ploughed through cities instead of bypassing them like the autobahns.  To ensure big-city votes, his Capitol Hill liaison, Gen. Jerry Persons, had made that deal with construction unions and congressional Democrats.  Today, 42,000 miles of interstates have been built, at a cost of $95 billion.  But with 790 miles to go, the work continues.  Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner notes that the three-mile trip from his Virginia home to his downtown Washington office can take 40 minutes.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  Engineers at Ampex Corp's Redwood City, Calif. lab in February 1956 used a new videotape (VTR) machine to record a man talking.  Thus, most live TV died, and the endless rerun was born.  Home videocassette recorders (VCR) came later.  The early device -- about the size of a side-by-side washer-dryer -- had two 12.5-inch-diameter tape reels that spun around as the audio-video was recorded or played.  "We recorded for about two minutes, rewound and stopped the tape, and pushed the playback button." said Charles Ginsburg, Ampex's project leader.  Those who "had been quiet up to that point, suddenly leaped to their feet and started shouting . . .," he recalled in James Lardner's "Fast Forward."  Soon, most telecasters were using the VTRs.  Earlier attempts by others failed.  Crooner-actor Bing Crosby, who wanted to videotape his shows, backed a Nov. 11, 1951, videotape prototype test that was a flop of flickers.  RCA, CBS, Zenith and nine others raced fruitlessly in the 1960s and 1970s to develop VCRs for the home.  It was the big-spending Japanese companies -- Sony, Matsushita, Japan Victor and Hitachi -- that came to dominate the world market by the late 1970s.  Ampex had flunked a 1963 market test of a $30,000 home VCR, dubbed "Grant's Tomb" by competitors for its girth and for Gus Grant, its marketing manager.  And Sony's improved, small home "videocorder" of 1965 succeeded.  By early 1977, such U.S. companies as Zenith and RCA, having swallowed their pride, began selling Japanese VCRs under their labels. (RCA had one last $400 million fling in 1981-1984 with a video-disc type device that was unprofitable.)  Annual wholesale U.S. sales of VCR machines and tapes currently run about $9 billion, says the Electronic Industries Association, a trade group.  GENERAL MOTORS ACCEPTANCE Corp., Detroit, said it will exercise its option to redeem on Sept. 15 all $230 million outstanding of its 9.4% debentures due to mature in 2004.  The debentures of the General Motors Corp. finance unit will be redeemed at 102% of their principal amount.  LPL TECHNOLOGIES Inc., Wallingford, Conn., declared a 3-for-2 split of Class A and Class B common shares, distributed Sept. 8 to stock of record Aug. 18.  The maker of coaxial cable, connectors, fiber optic systems and other devices said the split would increase liquidity.  BALDOR ELECTRIC Co. said its directors declared a 3-for-2 stock split, payable Sept. 22 to stock of record Aug. 25.  The Fort Smith, Ark., company also declared an 11 cents-a-share dividend on post-split shares payable Oct. 18 to stock of record Sept. 29.  The new rate is equal to a 16.5 cents-a-share dividend on pre-split shares, an effective 10% increase from the 15 cents a share the company had been paying.  United Technologies Corp. said it took its loss-ridden Norden Systems division off the market after an unsuccessful 16-month effort to sell the radar maker.  The decision confirmed the views of many securities analysts who doubted any buyer would be willing to accept the uncertainties about the extent of future losses tied to Norden's ongoing set-price development work for the Pentagon.  The firm's announcement "is stating the obvious," says Paul H. Nisbet, an analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., New York.  Moreover, amid the company's effort to sell the division, the Pentagon canceled two major programs utilizing Norden radar systems.  In a letter to employees, Norden President Edwin D. Decker said United Technologies was "unable to conclude a sale on terms reflecting the true value of Norden" following "discussions with several companies."  Chief executives at concerns that discussed buying Norden have said in interviews that United Technologies wanted too much for the division in view of the problems facing the business.  Analysts initially put a $400 million price on the division, but later cut their estimates to as low as $150 million.  United Technologies wouldn't disclose the asking price.  Since 1986, Norden's last profitable year, United Technologies has reported nearly $300 million in loss provisions or charges attributable to Norden.  Analysts expect that additional losses at Norden this year could reach $120 million.  A spokeswoman for United Technologies, based in Hartford, Conn., said "we would defer to the analysts on loss estimates."  Norden is based in Norwalk, Conn.  Norden's losses stem from its fixed-price development work on the Air Force's Joint Surveillance and Target Attack Radar System, or Joint STARS program, as well as an Israeli aircraft system that has incurred hefty cost overruns.  The Air Force plans to eventually buy 22 Joint STARS aircraft but given the Pentagon's tightening budget outlook, some analysts consider the plan "iffy."  They also question whether full Joint STARS production would even enable Norden to recover its investment in the program.  Norden's other recent setbacks include the Pentagon's decision to cancel production of the Norden radar-equipped A-6 Navy bomber and an upgraded version of the plane.  The division also lost a $114 million contract in May with General Dynamics Corp. for radar work on the Navy's advanced tactical aircraft, the A-6's planned successor.  Norden is suing General Dynamics for breach of contract over that cancellation in state court in Stamford, Conn.  As a result of program rollbacks and cost-cutting efforts, Norden has slashed employment by 16% to 3,460 this year.  When United Technologies announced plans to sell Norden in April 1988 it said the division didn't fit into its overall plans and would fare better as part of a large defense electronics company.  In February, United Technologies said it was looking for a joint-venture partner for Norden in the event a buyer couldn't be found.  In his letter to employees, however, Mr. Decker, the division president, said the unit will operate "as a part of (United Technologies) indefinitely."  General Electric Co. elected Eugene P. Nesbeda vice president for corporate business development and planning, effective Sept. 1.  He is currently executive vice president of Strategic Planning Associates, a big Washington consulting group.  GE, which has interests ranging from broadcasting and jet engines to financial services and industrial products, said it has been company practice to hire an outsider for the development and planning job, in keeping with Chairman John F. Welch Jr.'s interest in "fresh perspectives."  Mr. Nesbeda, 35 years old, will report to Mr. Welch.  Recent holders of the development and planning job have also been in their 30s, GE added.  Mr. Nesbeda succeeds Nigel D.T. Andrews, who was named vice president and general manager of GE Silicones in March.  Mr. Andrews' predecessor in the planning office was Michael A. Carpenter, currently president and chief executive of the Kidder, Peabody & Co. investment-banking unit.  The Soviet Union's chief salesman for commercial aircraft arrived at a trade show here a few days ago to drum up business.  Alexandr Voinov heads a 100-member Soviet delegation that hopes to entice corporate customers with small talk, dare-devil flying exhibitions and Western marketing techniques.  If all that fails, Mr. Voinov says he can offer an even more powerful incentive: cut-rate prices.  "We are intent on {using} every method, every potential tool, to help penetrate Western markets," Mr. Voinov says.  But he concedes that unless Soviet aircraft designs are adapted to meet the needs of consumers, and large sums are invested in long-term promotion, "you can't talk seriously about marketing."  Such tactics show just how serious Moscow's aircraft makers are these days to boost civilian exports, even at the expense of military production.  To earn badly needed foreign currency, Soviet officials are hawking everything from helicopters and specialty sport planes to the latest generation of commuter jets and long-range Ilyushin airliners.  "The Russians are desperate to play a bigger part in the international aerospace community," says James Roberts, a senior U.S. Commerce Department official.  U.S. industry and government analysts doubt that slashing prices or using other sales gimmicks will be enough to give Mr. Voinov's team a major breakthrough in supplying commercial aircraft to the West.  That's the main reason the Soviets showed up in such force for Vancouver's Abbotsford Air Show and exposition, which formally opens today.  Some 8,000 additional industry participants are expected at this usually sleepy airfield to marvel at the hot planes and hammer out deals.  Spectators cheered wildly as a pair of sleek MiG-29 fighters -- making their first appearance in North America -- roared low over the field Sunday with their Canadian air force escorts.  After they landed, the MiG pilots, guzzling welcoming beers on the hot tarmac, were surrounded by reporters and aviation buffs eager to get a glimpse of the high-performance fighters.  Minutes later, the 500-ton Antonov An-225, the world's largest airplane, lumbered to a landing with all six engines howling.  The cargo-transport behemoth can carry up to 80 vehicles in its belly.  The Abbotsford show was conceived as North America's answer to the displays at Paris and Farnborough, England.  Its sponsors sought a large Soviet turnout to give their previously low-profile event instant prestige.  For Mr. Voinov and his colleagues, the show is another chance to practice high-stakes salesmanship.  So far, the results indicate modest success.  Mr. Voinov says he expects to sign a contract in a few weeks to sell two more SU-26 acrobatic planes to U.S. investors, but won't disclose details.  The first two of the Russian stunt planes ever sold in the U.S. were delivered to a Pompano Beach, Fla., aircraft dealer this month.  Soviet officials also said a prospective U.S. customer is eager to lease the mighty An-225 -- as well as its entire crew -- to haul oversize cargo.  And Mr. Voinov hopes to leave behind a Ka-32 helicopter at a bargain price, giving Canadian timber and oil-drilling firms a chance to appreciate its heavy lift capabilities.  Until recently, the Soviets didn't seem interested in the vagaries of marketing.  When they came to sell helicopters in the U.S. last year, "the Russians didn't bring along a bunch of glossy brochures," recalls John Zugschwert, executive director of the American Helicopter Society.  "They weren't salesmen.  They were clearly engineers."  This year the Soviets have moved commercial sales to the front burner.  The export arm of the Soviet Ministry of Aviation Industry hopes to double its revenue by the mid-1990s.  But such a shift would bring major upheavals to the Soviet system.  Orders for military aircraft have fallen 20% in the past two years, according to some estimates.  And, for the first time in decades, prestigious military design bureaus in the Soviet Union are devoting substantial manpower to civilian projects.  U.S. Defense Secretary Dick Cheney says the only way Mikhail Gorbachev can revitalize the Soviet economy is by shifting "resources away from the military sector to the civilian side of the house."  Based on preliminary indications, says Mr. Cheney, "those are precisely {Mr.  Gorbachev's} intentions."  In past air shows, the Russians touted the power and speed of their military jets.  This time, even the MiGs are an important part of the commercial sales pitch, with Soviet officials stressing that the laminated materials and new manufacturing techniques used on the fighters are being applied to commercial jet production.  Soviet aviation officials are even seeking advice from prospective customers, including West European charter groups, before designing new aircraft.  Some U.S. analysts contend that Moscow is seriously thinking about using more-dependable and fuel-efficient Western engines on Russian-built planes.  To attract buyers, the Soviets have sold certain helicopters at prices that cover only about one-third of production costs, says Rand Corp. economist Arthur Alexander.  Moscow is willing to swallow such losses, Mr. Alexander and others believe, to keep production lines operating and to achieve product recognition in the West.  Officials of Boeing Co. and McDonnell Douglas Corp. say the Soviet marketing drive doesn't worry them.  But Mr. Roberts of the Commerce Department, whose job is promoting foreign sales of U.S. airliners, takes a more cautious view.  "There are some major concerns" in the Bush administration, he says, that the Soviets "may choose to virtually give their aircraft away."  While the U.S. remains eager to promote peaceful Soviet trade, he asserts, "we want them to be a fair competitor."  The Japanese space program suffered another embarrassment yesterday when a rocket engine failed, delaying the launch of a weather satellite.  The National Space Development Agency of Japan and industry analysts played down the technical problem, saying the H-1 rocket probably could be fixed in the next few weeks.  It was the first time since 1975 that a technological glitch hampered a satellite launch here.  But it comes just a month after the government was forced to announce it would postpone for one year the planned launch of its high-stakes next-generation rocket, the H-2.  Engine problems have pushed back that program to 1993.  Despite its superiority in many high-technology industries, Japan lags far behind the U.S. and Europe in aerospace, and is sensitive to any perceived setbacks.  "This morning's failure is just minor," said Eiichiro Sekigawa, a Japanese aerospace industry analyst.  "But following the occurrence of the H-2 {announcement}, it clouds the space program."  The launch was originally scheduled for earlier in the month, but was delayed by bad weather on three occasions.  Yesterday's launch was set for 4:40 a.m. in southern Japan.  Although the main engine started on time, it failed to ignite the rocket's boosters.  "We think if we change some components we can launch the satellite" by the end of September, Eijiro Hirohama, a space agency spokesman said.  "But we need to study it more."  Mr. Hirohama emphasized that the engines in the H-1 and H-2 rockets are different, so "there is no relationship" between the two problems.  Asked if the delay would hurt the space program, he said that "if we can launch {soon}, I think it will have no effect."  But if the launch is delayed longer, it could push back other planned launches.  Over the past decade, Japan has been pushing toward a long-term goal of space-technology independence from the U.S. and other countries.  The rocket program is a major part of this effort.  The H-1 was developed with help from the U.S., and Japan doesn't have total control over its use.  The H-2 will be the country's first completely indigenous rocket.  However, even before last month's announced delay, analysts forecast problems for the H-2 because of high costs.  In the weeks after foreign businessmen had left China following the Tiananmen massacre, many Japanese companies sent their representatives back here ahead of their Western competitors, creating a perception that the Japanese were trying to steal a march.  In a widely publicized statement that contributed to the impression of opportunism, Japan's foreign minister, Hiroshi Mitsuzuka, accused Japanese businessmen of acting like "thieves at a fire."  And a previously unknown group, dubbing itself the Blood-Bright Dare to Die Squad, threatened to kill Japanese in China and Hong Kong beginning next week, forcing many Japanese businessmen to adopt a low profile here.  Yet, despite the threat and criticism, Japanese have been just as cautious as Westerners about doing business here since Beijing's bloody suppression of pro-democracy demonstrators.  Some have become even more skeptical about their future here, particularly when it comes to bank loans and joint-venture investments.  Japanese banks, for example, did pull back hard after Tiananmen.  When governments and multilateral agencies froze new lending to China, Japanese banks -- who as a group have been the largest commercial lenders to China -- followed suit.  They still are refraining from new loans, though they are making trade-related transactions.  "Japanese banks are being less active than other banks," says John Frisbie, director of the Beijing office of the U.S.-China Business Council, "whereas other foreign banks are at least considering {new business} and in some cases are even offering funding for projects."  Businessmen and diplomats say the South Koreans have been the real opportunists since June.  They say the Koreans were out in force at a Beijing trade fair two weeks ago and signed several contracts, though no official notice was made of their presence.  Says one American business representative: "The South Korean attitude is, 'What's everybody running away from?  We knew all along this was a communist government that killed its people.'"  The Tiananmen crackdown's most-severe impact on Japanese business probably will fall in the area of investment.  Japanese companies have long been wary of Beijing's propensity for broad policy about-faces, and until recent years were far more reluctant than many Western firms to commit heavy investments in China.  Japanese investment has totaled $2.2 billion since 1979, with most of that coming in the past three years.  Some companies that were negotiating projects before Tiananmen have resumed talks.  For example, Hitachi Ltd. says it is still negotiating to build a refrigerator-manufacturing joint venture in Beijing.  But Japanese companies are expected to be more conservative than ever now that their worst fears about China's stability have been confirmed.  In Tokyo, an official at another electronics company says Tiananmen has tipped the scales against those who advocate investing in China.  "I'm very sympathetic to Japanese businessmen," says one Western diplomat.  "My stereotype of them is they're the most conservative guys business-wise.  The Japanese do enough to bring down opprobrium on themselves {elsewhere}.  But they don't deserve it here."  Many Japanese businessmen say they no longer trust China's word after witnessing the government's murderous crackdown and then hearing the official denials that it ever occurred.  To emphasize the point, one gestures to a bullet hole in his office wall, a reminder of the morning of June 7 when Chinese troops shot up a complex of diplomatic apartments and office buildings.  "The Chinese won't apologize even at this stage," he says.  "If they can behave in such a way, we are afraid such actions might occur even in business relations with foreign nations."  The terrorist threat against the Japanese came in four letters received by Japanese last month claiming that two Japanese a month will be killed in China or Hong Kong.  The terrorists cited Japan's alleged support for the Chinese authorities since the Tiananmen massacre, and its "economic invasion" of China.  Some Japanese businessmen say they don't take the threat seriously, but others have begun working fewer hours, stay home at night, wear casual clothes to blend in, and tell their drivers to take extra precautions.  "If an 'accident' occurs," says one Japanese businessman, "we won't want to do much more {business} with people here."  Japan's economic ties with China made it an easy target for criticism.  It is China's second-largest trading partner after Hong Kong; by Tokyo's figures, bilateral trade amounted to $19.33 billion in 1988 and $9.8 billion in the first six months of 1989.  Of foreign business communities in Beijing, Japan's is the largest, with about 300 offices and more than 1,000 businessmen before the Tiananmen incident.  Japanese statistics show that the major Japanese trading houses concluded $250 million in export contracts to China in June, down 60% from June last year.  Imports from China rose 5.2% to $257.9 million.  But one Japanese executive notes that those figures actually represent contracts negotiated before the June 4 massacre.  Despite a drop-off in automobile loans, U.S. consumer debt grew $2.99 billion in June, or at a 5.9% annual rate, the Federal Reserve Board said.  The expansion was solid but not strong, reflecting the slowing economy.  It was well below May's 7.3% annual pace, but considerably above April's 4.8% growth rate.  The low response to special auto company financing offers held down overall borrowing, as it has for the past few months.  Auto credit actually shrank during June, contracting $267 million, or at an annual rate of 1.1%.  On the other hand, revolving credit burgeoned despite numerous indications that consumer spending is tapering off.  This category, which includes retail and bank charge-card borrowing, surged $3.1 billion in June, or at a 20% annual rate, after jumping at a 13% annual rate in May.  Charge-card borrowing has been roaring for some time now in spite of the Fed's year-long efforts, ending in March, to curb borrowing of all kinds by pushing up interest rates.  Some economists contend that people have grown so accustomed to making credit-card purchases that they pay little attention to the interest rates on them.  At the end of June, consumer debt outstanding stood at $697.54 billion, up 9.9% from $634.51 billion in June 1988.  The Treasury plans to pay down about $475 million on the federal debt with the sale Monday of about $14.4 billion in short-term bills.  Maturing bills outstanding total $14.88 billion.  The offering will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills, which will be dated Aug. 17 and mature on Nov. 16, 1989, and Feb. 15, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $10,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Monday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  Yields on certificates of deposit aimed at the small investor continued to decline in the latest week, but yields on CDs of more than $90,000 rose across the board.  The average yield on six-month CDs of less than $50,000, for example, stood at 7.86% in the week ended yesterday, down from 7.95% a week before, according to Banxquote Money Markets.  On six-month CDs of $90,000 and up, the average yield was 7.96%, compared with 7.81%.  On six-month CDs sold by major brokerage firms, the average was 8.57%, up from 8.48%.  Some major banks raised the yields on so-called jumbo CDs as much as half a percentage point.  Large-denomination CDs, along with CDs sold by brokerage firms, tend to closely follow trends in Treasury bill yields.  Yields jumped at Monday's auction of three-month and six-month bills, reflecting higher interest rates in general following Friday's stronger-than-expected employment report for July.  "There's a strong perception in the market that rates will come down over the course of the next year," said Norberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote, an information service.  "To make a forecast on a week-to-week basis is very speculative."  The changes in the latest week restore something of the normal situation in which investors are rewarded for larger deposits.  Since interest rates began falling this spring, yields on jumbo CDs have fallen about twice as fast as consumer CDs and in recent weeks the yields on large-denomination CDs have been lower than on those of less than $50,000.  Yields on CDs of more than $90,000 are now about a tenth of a percentage point higher across the board.  At Chase Manhattan Bank in New York, for instance, the yield on a six-month CD of more than $90,000 jumped to 8% this week from 7.50%, while a one-year CD rose to 7.95% from 7.45%.  On smaller deposits, the yield fell to 7.90% for six months, from 8.33% last week, and 7.57% for one year, from 8%.  The best yields continue to be on the shortest-term deposits, a situation known as an inverted yield curve.  The average yield on a three-month CD of less than $50,000 was 7.92%, compared with 7.76% for five years.  However, the three-month CD slid nearly a tenth of a percentage point, while the five-year deposit fell just two hundredths of a point.  A possible trend toward restoring a normal yield curve is even more apparent among broker-sold CDs, which rose more than a fifth of a percentage point for five-year money but just two hundredths of a point for three months.  Money market deposit yields dropped just fractionally for all denominations.  The average for less than $50,000 was 7.02%, compared with 7.05% a week ago.  For $90,000 and more, the average yield was 7.54%, down from 7.56%.  Mr. Mehl of Banxquote said it is too early to see the effects of federal legislation to rescue troubled savings and loan institutions, passed late last week.  While the legislation is widely expected to force the closing or sale of hundreds of troubled thrifts, many of which have offered high CD yields to attract funds, Mr. Mehl predicted that "there always will be aggressive and competitive institutions paying higher-than-average rates."  Toshiki Kaifu today becomes Japan's third, but perhaps not last, prime minister this year.  As the newly elected president of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party, Mr. Kaifu must gear up for a parliamentary election that could come as early as October.  The nationwide vote will be for the Diet's lower house, which the LDP controls by a large majority.  Turning around the nation's anti-LDP mood by then would be a tough job for even the most powerful and savviest leader.  Mr. Kaifu has no independent power base of his own, and his savvy is largely untested.  "The LDP cannot avoid losing its majority in the lower-house election," said Takayoshi Miyagawa, a pollster and political commentator.  "The focus is on whether the LDP can retain enough seats to even lead a coalition government."  If the LDP can't, a coalition of opposition parties likely would form a cabinet headed by Takako Doi, the Japan Socialist Party's leader.  Conventional wisdom considers an LDP-led coalition more likely, but even in that case Mr. Kaifu could be jettisoned in favor of another LDP hopeful, depending on how party bosses regard his performance over the next few months.  "His term may very well be another interim one," like the two-month rule of his predecessor Sosuke Uno, said an aide to an LDP Diet member.  Opposition leaders immediately pounced on Mr. Kaifu's biggest weakness -- a public perception that he is a mere puppet of the LDP's power brokers, in particular former Prime Minister Noboru Takeshita.  "Only the face has changed," Ms. Doi crowed to the television cameras.  "This is another Takeshita cabinet," Satsuki Eda, the leader of a minor opposition party, said in an interview.  "He is a very able, liberal, moderate person, but he was chosen by factional rhetoric, so he won't be able to exercise his own personality.  I think it's very difficult for him to revitalize support for the LDP."  The extent of Mr. Takeshita's influence will become clear today, when the new cabinet is unveiled.  Indications were that the No. 2 party job of secretary-general would go to Ichiro Ozawa, a formidable 47-year-old Takeshita lieutenant.  Mr. Kaifu isn't without resources in facing the grim situation.  At 58 he's the second-youngest postwar Japanese prime minister, helping the party project a less out-of-touch image.  Moreover, his 29 years and 10 terms in the Diet give him enough experience to make the party's tradition-minded elders feel comfortable with him.  His boyish good looks show well on television, and he's considered the party's most eloquent orator.  Despite having received $110,000 in donations from scandal-plagued Recruit Co., he has a relatively clean reputation, perhaps in part because he was a protege of a reform-minded prime minister of the mid-1970s, Takeo Miki.  Mr. Kaifu also recently has shown a flair for manipulating political symbols.  Last Thursday, while preparing his campaign speech, he held a well-publicized series of hour-long meetings with five noted intellectuals in a suite at Tokyo's Okura Hotel, where he sought their opinions on issues ranging from political reform to revising the unpopular 3% consumption tax.  By Japanese standards it was a remarkable performance: A typical candidate for the LDP presidency wouldn't have had so deep an interest in policy matters in the first place, and in any event would have preferred talks with other politicians or bureaucrats, whom he would have summoned to LDP headquarters.  But it will take all of Mr. Kaifu's talent with symbols and then some to overcome his major handicap: widespread public skepticism that anything has changed in the LDP, even after its crushing loss in upper-house elections three weeks ago.  Although the party's problems stem originally from the Recruit influence-peddling scandal, the 3% consumption tax and liberalization of agricultural import rules, its main difficulty is the public's perception that the party is obsessed with its own internal, factional concerns and arrogantly disregards public opinion.  Mr. Kaifu was chosen in a secret ballot of LDP Diet members and local delegates, who gave him 279 votes.  His nearest opponent, former Health and Welfare Minister Yoshiro Hayashi, got 120 votes.  Mr. Kaifu's vote total was slightly less than the combined strength of the four LDP factions supporting him.  The reason for Mr. Kaifu's emergence is that the party elders' candidate, former party secretary-general Shintaro Abe, is in failing health and still hasn't gotten over the stain of the Recruit scandal.  The elders, in particular former Prime Minister Takeshita, wanted a candidate they could trust but who didn't pose a threat to future candidates in the party.  An initial groundswell for 52-year-old Ryutaro Hashimoto, Mr. Uno's LDP secretary-general, failed because he met neither test. (Mr.  Hashimoto, according to Japanese press reports, is likely to be named finance minister in the Kaifu administration.)  Mr. Kaifu meets both tests.  He was seven-years' Mr. Takeshita's junior at Waseda University, where both were members of the oratorical society.  In Japanese politics that's enough of a connection to form the basis for a serious long-term relationship.  Moreover, Mr. Kaifu, unlike Mr. Hashimoto, has never attempted to build his own power base in the party by distributing campaign contributions to other politicians or by forming his own faction.  Mr. Kaifu is regarded in the LDP as a "happo bijin", someone who tries to be liked by everyone.  National Heritage Inc. said it could have losses of up to $6.6 million in annual revenue from management fees because Southmark Corp. and a Southmark unit have sold or are selling properties that National Heritage manages.  In the nine months ended March 31, National Heritage had total revenue of $54.2 million.  National Heritage, which manages nursing homes and retirement centers, said it was notified last week that Southmark's San Jacinto Savings Association unit had sold eight nursing homes managed by National Heritage and that National Heritage's management contracts had been canceled.  National Heritage said Southmark also disclosed plans to sell 15 additional nursing homes, which are part of public real-estate syndications, by the end of 1989, meaning that National Heritage also may lose those management contracts.  Further, Southmark notified National Heritage that the troubled real-estate and thrift concern plans to stop mortgage payments or modify mortgages on 37 nursing homes and two other properties that National Heritage manages.  Those properties are held in public and private syndications that Southmark oversees.  Southmark officials have said they stop making mortgage payments or try to restructure loans when the properties don't generate enough cash flow to meet their obligations.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, National Heritage closed at $2.25, down 50 cents.  National Heritage was spun off from Southmark in 1987 but Southmark still owns about 62.5% of National Heritage.  Last month, Southmark sought protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code while it tries to work out a plan to pay its debts.  The Canadian government is "absolutely committed" to implementing its planned value-added consumption tax, despite widespread opposition to the move, Finance Minister Michael Wilson said.  The proposed tax, known as the Goods and Services Tax, is an "important part" of the government's program, Mr. Wilson said at a news conference.  The tax, which is to have a rate of 9% and take effect Jan. 1, 1991, has encountered strong opposition from consumer groups, some business sectors and even some members of the ruling Progressive Conservative Party.  In a technical document issued yesterday, the government disclosed in detail how the tax would be applied to "the vast majority" of goods and services sold in Canada.  The planned levy is similar to value-added taxes that have been introduced in more than 45 other countries in the past 20 years.  Businesses throughout the production and distribution chain, including retailers, are to levy the new tax on their domestic sales.  They may claim a credit for any tax paid on goods and services purchased for their business.  The ultimate burden of the tax will fall on the consumer.  Mr. Wilson acknowledged that the new tax isn't "popular."  He said that consumers don't want to have to pay it, and that businesses don't want to have to collect it or have it applied to their goods.  But he said the tax would provide substantial benefits, by replacing an outmoded federal sales tax that applies to only about one-third of goods and services.  The new tax will bring in estimated revenue of 24 billion Canadian dollars (US$20.49 billion) a year, compared with C$18.5 billion from the current federal sales tax.  The new tax won't apply to various financial activities, including brokerage services, securities dealing and underwriting.  But it will cover services such as financial planning, investment advice and management services.  Mr. Wilson also confirmed that "basic groceries," prescription drugs and medical devices won't be subject to the tax.  The Canadian Chamber of Commerce, which has supported the principle of a new value-added tax, said it was disappointed about "the proliferation of exemptions," which make the tax "more complex than we anticipated."  The government also disclosed details of a tax credit system, designed to prevent the burden of the new tax falling most heavily on low-income people.  Families with incomes of less than 30,000 Canadian dollars (US$25,614) a year will be better off under the new sales tax system, because of the refundable tax credits, Mr. Wilson said.  Many taxpayers will be eligible to use these credits to reduce their tax bills; for low-income Canadians who don't have any tax liability, checks will be paid automatically four times a year.  Mr. Wilson said the government will introduce legislation in the House of Commons this fall to implement the tax.  The new tax will apply to almost all Canadian businesses, because only those with annual sales of less than C$30,000 will be able to choose whether they wish to be in the sales tax system.  The new tax will be levied in addition to provincial sales taxes, in all provinces except Alberta, that range up to 12%.  Three airlines reported double-digit increases in July air travel, while a fourth reported a slight drop.  AMR Corp.'s American Airlines unit said July traffic rose 22% to 7.25 billion revenue passenger miles from the 5.94 billion flown a year earlier.  Load factor was 71.6% compared with 66.9% in July 1988.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor is the percentage of seats filled.  Dallas-based Metro Airlines Inc. said it flew 43.6 million revenue passenger miles in July, a 19.1% increase from the 36.6 million flown a year earlier.  Load factor was 55.7% compared with 54.6% in July 1988.  Mesa Airlines Inc. reported it flew about 5.8 million revenue passenger miles in July, compared with the 4.4 million flown a year earlier, an increase of about 30.5%.  Mesa's July traffic includes the operations of its Skyway Airlines unit.  July load factor was 46.3% compared with 46.4% a year earlier.  Continental Airlines, unlike carriers experiencing increases boosted in part by summer vacation travel, said July traffic fell 2%, to 3.86 billion revenue passenger miles from 3.94 billion a year earlier.  The carrier, a unit of Texas Air Corp., said July load factor was 68% compared with the year-earlier 67.3%.  IBM no longer sees red when called "Big Blue."  But after decades of eschewing the breezy nickname, the buttoned-down computer giant is now scrambling to embrace it -- and falling on its face.  Although it makes precision equipment, International Business Machines Corp. can't seem to fill out a trademark application properly.  Two efforts so far have been rejected by the Patent and Trademark Office because of small glitches -- one wasn't dated and the other lacked a signature.  A PTO bureaucrat says: "I'm really surprised at this -- it's a pretty simple mark to register."  IBM's efforts are surprising, in that there's little doubt the name -- apparently referring to the color of IBM's large mainframe computers -- originally wasn't meant kindly.  "It was an attack on IBM's culture, almost," says a former IBM executive.  Yet Big Blue stuck, and in the past year IBM has shown a belated interest in quashing imitators.  Last fall, it uncorked a flood of bad publicity by demanding that a New York winery stop marketing under a Big Blue label.  "Infringement on a trademark," bellowed a belligerent IBM.  Several months later, an IBM spokeswoman stated the obvious -- "We don't make wine" -- and conceded there was little chance consumers would be confused.  Instead, IBM trained its sights on a pint-sized competitor in Shreveport, La.  Softdisk Inc. and its 90 employees have published, since 1986, a monthly software collection called "Big Blue Disk."  Last October, IBM sent Softdisk a letter demanding it stop using the Big Blue label.  Softdisk's president, Al Vekovius, suggested that IBM buy his use of the name.  Before an agreement could be reached, all bets were off as IBM tangled with Big Blue Products Inc., a five-year-old Northport, N.Y., distributor of computer equipment.  On May 5, the day the trademark office again rejected IBM's application, IBM wrote, asserting that "Big Blue is a trademark of the IBM Corporation."  More bad publicity followed, and eventually IBM had another change of heart.  "We are not aware of any actual confusion" in the marketplace, it conceded in a July 19 letter.  But, IBM may already be too late to keep its nickname from being trashed: First Brands Corp. now markets Big Blue garbage bags.  When it comes to bondholder protection, there's an abyss between word and deed.  Take UAL Corp., for instance, the target of a bid by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  Last year, United Airlines, the operating unit of UAL, sold two high-yield, high-risk junk bond issues that allow bondholders to sell the securities back to the company at 101% of their principal value if there is a change of control in management.  But this seemingly straightforward "poison put" may not be worth the paper it is printed on, some investors and analysts say.  Poison puts were incorporated into bond offerings in recent years as a safeguard against an unsolicited takeover; the puts typically were designed to make any unfriendly acquisition more expensive and cumbersome for the bidder.  The two issues, $150 million of 12 1/2% senior subordinated notes due 1995 and $350 million of 13% of senior subordinated notes due 1998, make up the bulk of United's $527 million publicly traded debt outstanding.  The issues traded at prices as high as 105% of par value in recent weeks, but fell to 100.5% Monday on news of the takeover bid.  Over two days, the bonds declined as much as four points, or $40 per $1,000 face amount.  Several institutional investors are shunning the UAL bonds because they think the poison puts may lack the venom needed to force the redemption of the bonds above their par values.  If the covenant protection is exercised and the acquirer has to pay off bondholders, it would increase the cost of purchasing UAL by more than $500 million.  What could block bondholder protection is the company's interpretation of what constitutes a change of control as well as restrictions tied to the debt rating of the notes.  "There's a lot of room for bondholders to get hurt," says Dennis Schaney, airline analyst at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Under United's note covenants, a friendly takeover, or a board-approved leveraged transaction, wouldn't trigger the put protection at all.  Moreover, the notes would have to be downgraded to a single-B-Minus rating by Standard & Poor's Corp. and single-B-3 rating by Moody's Investors Service Inc. for the covenants to apply.  The possibility of a debacle for UAL bondholders could be embarrassing for First Boston Corp., an adviser to UAL and the underwriter of its bonds.  But a First Boston official said its investor protection covenants for the UAL bonds are stronger than those for many other outstanding bond issues.  "We don't feel badly about this," the First Boston official said.  "It's not an explicit event-risk covenant, but it may have some impact," says Philip Baggaley, an S&P airline bond analyst.  Both rating agencies are reviewing the level of bondholder protection in the United issues.  On Monday, after UAL confirmed the unsolicited Marvin Davis bid for the company, the two rating agencies put United's paper under review.  S&P placed the triple-B-minus rated notes on its CreditWatch surveillance list with negative implications.  Moody's placed the notes, which have a Ba-2 rating, under review for possible downgrade.  For the put protection to kick in, the rating agencies would have to drastically downgrade the notes.  Moody's airline analyst Charles Mancuso says: "A four-graduation drop is significant, but certainly within the realm of possibilities."  Last week, as investor Alfred Checchi's bid for NWA completed, Moody's downgraded NWA's debt to single-B-1 from Baa-2, a five-grade drop, Mr. Mancuso notes.  S&P's Baggaley says any prospective downgrade probably would "depend on how high a price is paid for UAL.  The higher the price, the more likely is such a downgrade."  The Davis bid is estimated at $240 a share, and analysts say a bidding war could take the price to more than $250 a share.  Analysts say the financing of any takeover will be important.  "If it isn't highly leveraged, the rating drop may not be that great," says one analyst, adding that the put protection probably wouldn't kick in on a downgrade alone.  The other obstacle is the provision that allows friendly takeovers and a board-approved buy-out.  John Morris, assistant vice-president at Moody's, says the rating agency views poison put protection conditioned on a hostile takeover as "ineffective. . . .  At the end of the day, most corporate takeovers become friendly.  Therefore, your put is voided."  Regarding Stephen Banko's July 5 editorial-page article, "Two Kinds of American Hero," comparing the lives of Abbie Hoffman and Col. Nicholas Rowe, who was assassinated by Philippines communists in April: I'd like Mr. Banko to know that not all of us pick our heroes according to the amount of press they generate.  Although I'm in my 20s and may never know the feeling of being in a war, I feel a tug in my heart every time I read of a true hero such as Nick Rowe, who paid the ultimate price for his love of America.  It may be somewhat heartening for Mr. Banko to understand that there are Americans and, perhaps more important, young Americans who love this country just as much.  We would never confuse the ramblings of a "lovable guy" like Abbie Hoffman with the silent convictions of a Nick Rowe, convictions that form the very backbone of America.  Mark J.McCall  Tampa, Fla.  ---  It's strange how we often come to idolize those covered in the media.  Mr. Hoffman, a popular, left-wing radical of the 1960s died of a drug overdose after serving a sentence on a drug-abuse charge.  His death inspired numerous editorials and significant network coverage.  Col. Rowe's death received but a fraction of the attention.  Yet, here was a man who quietly carried out his orders; believed in and loved his country, despite serving as a POW for five years in a war few care to remember.  That's a hero in my book.  In the end, Abbie Hoffman died as a burned-out symbol of an era's mostly bankrupt philosophy.  Col. Rowe died in the continuing fight against communism and trying to uphold those democratic values that shall endure.  Keith R. Cook  Laguna Niguel, Calif.  ---  Mr. Banko presents a provocative juxtaposition of lives, but he fails to understand why Mr. Hoffman's passing earned so much publicity.  He can only attribute the coverage to Mr. Hoffman's "fascination with the media."  I was one of millions in the U.S. and Europe in the '60 and '70s who believed America's war in Vietnam was immoral and pointless.  Mr. Hoffman, despite his eccentricities, helped provide us with a much-needed alternative viewpoint on the war than that promulgated by our heads of state.  We can thank Mr. Hoffman for his courage and leadership, and for putting his personal liberty at stake by his protests.  None of Mr. Hoffman's insight diminishes the heroics and selflessness of Col. Rowe, whose career Mr. Banko justly extols.  But Mr. Banko should realize that Mr. Hoffman and Col. Rowe shared the qualities Mr. Banko and all of us hold dear: deep love of country, and the willingness to sacrifice for its behalf.  Paul K. Penniman  Washington  The Nasdaq over-the-counter market advanced as technology issues, with the notable exception of 3Com, continued to bask in the adoration of investors.  Heavy buying of banking issues also helped the Nasdaq Composite Index rise 1.57 to 463.30.  The Nasdaq Financial Index of the biggest bank and insurance stocks jumped 0.6%, or 2.70, to 457.50.  The broader Nasdaq Bank Index of small savings banks added 3.52 to 478.88.  The Other Finance Index of regional banks, and real estate and brokerage concerns, gained 2.60 to 544.60.  Specifically, shares of the California thrift SFFed gained 3/8 to 20 5/8 on 216,400 shares.  Midlantic, a New Jersey bank stock, was up 3/4 to 47 3/8.  Ohio Casualty, an insurance issue, added 1/4 to 49 1/4.  Technology issues remained strong.  The Minneapolis-based securities firm, Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood, shifted the emphasis in its model portfolio from defensive stocks to technology issues.  Mark Donahoe, a trader, said the firm's technical analysis of the stock market indicates technology stocks are attractive now.  Piper Jaffray added Stratus Computer to its model portfolio and boosted its positions in Mentor Graphics and Intel.  Stratus eased 1/4 to 31 1/4 on 386,000 shares.  Mentor Graphics was unchanged at 37 1/4 on 287,000 shares and Intel gained 1/4 to 33 on 3.3 million shares.  The Nasdaq 100 Index, dominated by technology stocks, rose 0.4%, or 1.94, to 439.46.  But 3Com's slide, down 4 3/8, or 24%, to 14 1/8 on 6.6 million shares, was an unpleasant reminder to investors that all isn't well in the technology group.  Many of those issues have been depressed largely because of their disappointing earnings performances. 3Com, a computer-networking-systems company, said it might post a loss for its fiscal 1990 first quarter, ending this month, if orders don't strengthen.  3Com said that based on lower-than-expected orders in June and July, earnings for the quarter ending Aug. 31 will be below securities analysts' estimates of about 22 cents a share. 3Com said that if it achieves strong sales in August, it should post a profit for the quarter.  The company added, however, that "earnings will be directly related to incoming orders and the possibility of a loss cannot be ruled out." 3Com earned 25 cents a share in the fiscal 1989 first quarter.  The Santa Clara, Calif., company blamed the order slowdown on resellers hedging their purchasing decisions because of economic conditions and because of the pending release in September of a new version of the company's network-operating software.  As a result of the company's announcement, Frederick Ziegel, an analyst at Needham & Co., slashed his estimates on 3Com for the year ending May 31, 1990, to $1 a share from $1.40.  In fiscal 1989, 3Com earned $1.18 a share.  Mr. Ziegel also recommended that investors sell their 3Com shares and buy stock in its competitor, Novell.  Novell gained 3/8 to 30 1/2 on 989,000 shares.  First Ohio Bancshares, which agreed to be acquired by Fifth Third Bancorp, jumped 5 to 37.  The acquisition will be accomplished through a tax-free exchange of common stock valued at about $178 million.  The acquisition is subject to regulatory approval.  Fifth Third retreated 5/8 to 52 5/8.  Fibronics International dropped 1 to 6 3/8.  Second-quarter earnings for the maker of data-transmission systems fell to four cents a share, or $230,000, from six cents a share, or $353,000.  Relational Technology declined 3/4 to 8 3/4 on 107,000 shares.  The software-products maker said earnings for its fourth quarter, ended June 30, rose to $4.5 million or 37 cents a share, from $3.5 million, or 32 cents a share.  For the year, Relational Technology earned $6.2 million, or 50 cents a share, down from $7.5 million, or 76 cents a share.  Revenue for the fiscal year jumped to $130.7 million from $87.4 million in fiscal 1988.  America West Airlines, benefiting from the interest in airline stocks generated by a bid for United Air's parent, UAL, gained 7/8 to 12 1/2 on 1.7 million shares.  Trading volume on Nasdaq surged to 160.3 million shares.  Advancing issues led declining ones, 1,087 to 906.  Your July 20 editorial regarding the confirmation hearings on the nomination of William Lucas for assistant attorney general for civil rights hit the nail on the head.  The argument that Mr. Lucas lacks legal experience in general and federal-court experience in particular fails to recognize that Mr. Lucas has been sued numerous times for violating prisoners' civil rights.  This experience as a defendant clearly could have been put to good use in the Civil Rights Division's litigation to protect the rights of institution residents.  It is similarly outrageous that these liberal senators picked on such tangential points as Mr. Lucas's misrepresenting facts about his legal experience and omitting facts about a failed bar examination on various applications and resumes.  Mr. Lucas probably misunderstood these questions; he certainly would have no reason to hide these facts.  This experience clearly would have given Mr. Lucas a practical background in employment-discrimination issues that would have come in handy if he had been confirmed.  These liberal senators were just out to get Mr. Lucas because he is conservative and -- worse yet -- black.  Mr. Lucas's absence of relevant legal experience, his responsibility for civil-rights violations as Wayne County sheriff, his inaccuracies in describing his professional legal career and his violation of customs regulations are, as anyone can see, mere makeweight and -- to use your word -- "insubstantial" arguments.  Brad Reynolds, where were you when we needed you?  Stephen A. Whinston  Philadelphia  (Mr.  Whinston served in the Justice Department's Civil Rights division 1974-83.)  ---  You dismiss as nitpicking the fact Mr. Lucas was fined for smuggling, that he has no courtroom experience and that his nomination was opposed by most civil-rights groups.  Yet I'm sure the Journal would be the first to scream bloody murder if someone was nominated for secretary of commerce who had not been in business or was opposed by any Chamber of Commerce.  I saw lengthy excerpts of Mr. Lucas's testimony before the Judiciary Committee and I was appalled at his inarticulateness and his constant refrain that he was not familiar with current civil-rights law.  Mr. Lucas's nomination was pure tokenism on the part of the Bush administration and poorly disguised tokenism at that.  Randall Edwards  San Francisco  Alex Kozinski's July 18 Leisure & Arts review of Nathaniel Branden's autobiography, "Judgment Day: My Years With Ayn Rand," makes one wonder if he ever has read an Ayn Rand novel.  For he says:  ". . .  Randian heroes may happily mate on the basis of intellectual compatibility alone. . . ."   And he implies that physical attraction is not required; but on the contrary, Rand's work is quite definite on the value of physical attraction, and declares it over and over.  It's clear she focused on Mr. Branden because she liked his looks.  As for Mr. Branden as "the embodiment of a Randian hero," no interpretation of him could be more perverse.  He designed no great buildings, he masterminded no great industry, he wrote no great plays or music; indeed, his lack of creativity and individualism could not be more striking.  He was a secondhander riding the coattails of a great novelist.  A poseur.  He submerged his own individuality almost totally in order to preserve his titular standing in office at the center of a cult that rested solidly on the ideas of another.  And he had the gall to lecture others on the value of individualism]  Judge Kozinski also continues the fiction that members of the Rand cult favored reason and logic.  With their lips, perhaps.  But in fact Rand was so given to exception-making that it is hard to know precisely where her priorities and those of her followers lay.  And many of her hard conclusions flew absolutely in the face of reason and logic.  For example, her philosophical position was exceedingly anti-family; yet the value of the family as an institution is well supported by reason and logic.  Who sent her to the U.S. in the first place and helped her get started here?  Her anti-family bias is so adolescent in character that it made her heroes attractive mainly to 19-year-olds.  And as for her own individualism, we are startled to learn from Mr. Branden that "The Fountainhead" was heavily edited by her now-forgotten editor at Bobbs-Merrill, and that "Atlas Shrugged" proceeded only on the advice and counsel of -- who else? -- Mr. Branden himself] Is nothing sacred] (But what a great read])  Neil Elliott  Evanston, Ill.  As a student of history, I read the "Centennial Journal: 100 Years in Business" with great interest and enjoyment.  The June 27 topic of this column, "Unthinkable Heart Surgery Opens an Era," suggests that surgery was not performed successfully on the human heart prior to the Taussig-Blalock operation  In fact, a number of procedures had been performed successfully on the heart before 1944.  The first is generally credited to Dr. Daniel Hale Williams, who repaired a stab wound to the heart at Provident Hospital (now closed) in Chicago around 1898.  The operation was publicized widely and won Dr. Williams an invitation to the White House.  Though the Taussig-Blalock operation may have opened the era of modern heart surgery, Dr. Williams's efforts and other successful procedures in the intervening 50 years challenge the notion that "doctors believed that opening a human chest for a heart operation was unthinkable" in 1944.  Anthony E. Wilkins  Chicago  In West Germany, its bankers are making house calls to time-pressed yuppies.  In Spain, it quickly became the biggest auto lender.  In Taiwan, it introduced the 20-year home mortgage.  Citicorp is trying, in short, to become the world's first global consumer bank, with the Citibank branch, credit card and mortgage eventually becoming as ubiquitous around the world as the McDonald's hamburger, Coca-Cola or Italian knitwear.  "We want to be like Benetton -- location indifferent," says Pei-yuan Chia, the Shanghai-born chief of Citicorp's international consumer business.  Already, eight million households in 40 foreign countries are Citicorp customers, and Mr. Chia is aiming for 16 million within five years.  "No one else has the network that Citicorp does," says Robin Monro-Davies, who heads IBCA Ltd., a London bank-ratings firm.  "They've got as good a shot as anybody at building a global consumer business."  Whether the biggest U.S. banking company can achieve that won't be known for years.  Selling as basic a product as soap world-wide isn't easy, and global marketing of banking services is far tougher.  It runs into a welter of government regulations and cultural differences, and it requires huge commitments of managerial talent and capital.  "Personally, I don't know how to make a retail bank work outside my own country: Mr. Meunier isn't Mr. Mueller," says Marc Vienot, the chairman of Societe Generale, a major French bank that has been frustrated in its attempts to serve consumers in other nations.  Other grand visions of global consumer franchises have already faltered.  After big losses in mobile-home financing, Britain's Barclays Bank PLC is shifting its U.S. focus to corporations.  Midland Bank PLC, similarly disenchanted, sold Crocker National Bank in California to Wells Fargo & Co. several years ago.  U.S. banks have fared little better.  Chase Manhattan Corp. has retrenched, selling its Belgian bank earlier this year.  BankAmerica Corp., Chemical Banking Corp. and Manufacturers Hanover Corp. have largely quit trying to serve consumers overseas.  Japanese banks, despite their huge size, haven't tried hard to get into consumer banking abroad.  Nevertheless, Richard S. Braddock, who heads Citicorp's consumer business, contends that it can succeed where others have stumbled.  He gives three reasons: "First, the fundamental needs of consumers world-wide differ only in degree.  We also believe that we can lever our size quite effectively and export financial products from one market to another.  Lastly, we're perceived as large and innovative.  We're quite credible in other countries."  Even some Citicorp executives are dubious, however.  They argue that the company is stretching itself too thin and should focus on a relatively few foreign countries.  Thomas Theobald, former vice chairman for investment banking at Citicorp and now chairman of Continental Bank Corp., strongly opposed Citicorp's push for European consumers and instead favored expansion in the U.S.  But the critics have been wrong before.  In the 1970s, Citicorp lost millions trying to build its U.S. consumer banking business.  That business is now highly profitable, and John S. Reed, who led the effort, has become Citicorp's chairman.  Citicorp, a leader in back-office automation, is convinced that its marketing and technological know-how can make global banking work.  So, it is hunting for big overseas acquisitions.  "It's no secret that we're looking to buy in the U.K. and France," Mr. Reed says.  The bank's international consumer business already is churning out healthy profits.  Last year, according to a source at the bank, it earned about $170 million and posted a return on equity exceeding 20%.  Meanwhile, Citicorp's U.S. consumer business, which has 20 million households as customers, earned about $500 million.  Internal plans call for Citicorp's consumer banking, domestic and international, to earn more than $1 billion a year in the 1991-93 period.  Last year, Citicorp's total net was $1.9 billion.  How has Citicorp been able to penetrate foreign consumer markets?  It has made the right acquisitions on favorable terms, exploited underserved markets and used its back-office technology to provide superior service.  It also has tried hard to look like a local bank by employing local people; Mr. Chia says only 2% of its branch managers or higher executives overseas are U.S. citizens.  And it has attempted to introduce a "sales culture" in its foreign banks and to make customers comfortable during their bank visits, countering the old hat-in-hand atmosphere.  As one Citicorp executive says, "There's enough anxiety associated with financial services that people will pay a premium for comfort and peace of mind.  This is a people business, not a money business."  This approach to foreign banking worked in Spain and West Germany.  In 1983, Citicorp bought Banco de Levante from the Spanish government.  The bank was a mess; about 65% of its commercial loans had soured.  Margins between what it paid for funds and what it charged on loans were anemic.  Its 100 branches were spread too thinly across the country to give it strong market presence anywhere.  Its biggest asset, an ornate marble and brass headquarters, was a white elephant.  Moreover, Spain, with about one bank branch for every 1,300 residents, is so over-banked that a Spanish businessman says half-jokingly, "Banking and bullfighting are our national sports."  For Citicorp, Spain's entry into the Common Market in the early 1980s outweighed those problems; it galvanized the Spanish economy.  Moreover, Citicorp sensed an opportunity because Spanish banks had disdained retail banking; many viewed consumers primarily as a source of deposits for commercial loans.  The bank, renamed Citibank Espana, quickly began pursuing consumer loans.  It realigned its branches to concentrate on big urban centers; Madrid now has 20 branches, up from four.  To mesh with the local culture, Citicorp brought in Hispanic executives from its operations in Chile and London.  And to differentiate itself from rivals, Citibank Espana tried to seem friendlier.  Personnel seated at desks replaced tellers at long, elevated counters.  Stylish furniture, ebony stone floors and artwork decorated the branches.  And Citibank Espana promised mortgage commitments in 15 days to consumers used to waiting as long as two months.  Now, they wait only 48 hours.  Citibank Espana also introduced point-of-sale auto financing.  Tomas Martinez Perez, a Madrid Peugeot dealer, says, "Before Citibank, banks didn't make auto loans.  Private finance companies were the primary source of financing. . . .  Now, the finance companies aren't in the car business at all because the banks are cheaper."  With Citibank's computer systems recently upgraded, car buyers can get loans approved in minutes.  The bank also exploited a regulatory loophole that in effect allowed it to pay interest on checking accounts and avoid having to lure deposits through high-rate savings accounts.  The checking account has attracted $600 million in deposits, and other Spanish banks have copied it.  Since 1983, Citibank Espana's assets have grown to $1.2 billion from $43 million.  It began turning a profit in 1986.  In contrast to its turnaround of a sick Spanish bank, Citicorp bought the thriving Kundenkreditbank, West Germany's biggest consumer bank, and developed it into the crown jewel of Citicorp's overseas empire.  In 1974, Citicorp paid about $100 million for a stake in the well-regarded KKB when a KKB partner needed cash and apparently feared that KKB would fall into hands of Deutsche Bank AG, Germany's largest bank.  German bankers say the remaining partners figured that eventually they could buy back Citicorp's stake.  Instead, Citicorp bought them out.  "One of the keys to Citicorp's success was that it didn't immediately make changes," a former KKB partner says.  That reluctance was understandable.  German bankers say KKB's loans and services consistently carry higher charges than its competitors impose, and thus it is one of Germany's most profitable banks.  The 291-branch KKB has largely avoided interest-rate battles by competing on service.  But its strong appeal among blue-collar workers may pose future problems.  Manufacturing's share of the German economy is declining and the population is aging.  In the future, fewer traditional KKB customers will need installment loans.  So, KKB is going after German yuppies needing investment services.  Its bankers also are making house calls to customers in the evenings; they offer, at no extra charge, a full range of banking services, including checking and savings-account deposits and withdrawals, insurance policies, and applications for mortgages, installment loans and credit cards.  And it is changing its advertising, offering new products, installing the latest automated tellers and trying to get debt-wary Germans to accept credit cards in place of charge cards, on which balances have to be paid monthly.  Despite the successes, Citicorp's global strategy is fraught with risks.  The most obvious is political risk.  China's recent turmoil, for example, is casting a shadow over Citicorp's highly profitable, 21-branch Hong Kong system, which is second in size only to Hongkong & Shanghai Bank's.  If residents flee en masse in anticipation of Hong Kong's reversion to Chinese control in 1997, Citicorp could start losing money there.  In Panama, Citicorp's seven branches have been hurt by U.S. economic sanctions and an economic slump stemming from Gen. Manuel Noriega's refusal to recognize the 1988 presidential-election results.  Yet Mr. Chia says, "Our commitment to Panama is still there.  We're not there as a bunch of barracudas -- to be there in good times and leave in bad times."  And Mr. Braddock adds philosophically: "You take a hit every once in a while.  That's why we're in 40 countries."  In its rush to grow, Citicorp also risks making an ill-advised acquisition -- as it did in France.  About four years ago, Citicorp bought a small Paris bank, Compagnie Generale de Banque, hoping to serve medium-sized French companies.  That strategy flopped.  Now, Citicorp is trying to reposition the 12-branch Compagnie Generale as a consumer bank.  But the French have been unimpressed, and the bank, having attracted only 3,000 consumers, continues to hemorrhage red ink.  Why can Citicorp reinvigorate a sick Spanish bank but not a solvent French one?  Ricardo Angles, a Uruguayan who ran Citicorp's Spanish bank and now runs the French one, says, "The French banks are very good, and we haven't put a clear strategy together there."  Mr. Vienot of Societe Generale comments, "Paris has been very difficult for foreign banks.  In Spain, except for Banco Santander, banking was in the Middle Ages until recently."  In the years ahead, Citicorp faces difficult choices.  Some current and former Citicorp executives see its international consumer business at a crossroads.  They say some foreign operations are too narrowly focused; in Britain it only makes mortgages and offers credit cards.  Such niche banks must grow in size and product array if they are to compete effectively.  But growing by a branch at a time will take too long.  So Citicorp is shopping, thus far unsuccessfully, for big acquisitions.  In 1987, Citicorp came close to making such an acquisition.  Well-placed executives say Citicorp seriously considered an offer to buy Midland Bank, one of Britain's four large clearing banks.  That year, however, Brazil declared a moratorium on interest payments to Western banks.  That chilled investors in Citicorp and Midland, both big lenders to Brazil, as well as Citicorp's interest in Midland.  But these executives say even Citicorp, with $10 billion in shareholder equity, lacks the resources to simultaneously build banks in 40 countries into significant market shares and expand its U.S. branch network to 2,000 -- its stated goal -- from 600 now.  Some say Citicorp should forgo big, costly acquisitions in developed markets such as Japan and Britain and focus on about a dozen or so countries where economic prospects, market inefficiencies and Citicorp's technological prowess promise rapid growth.  And some contend that Citicorp should concentrate on U.S. acquisitions.  Mr. Theobald, the former vice chairman, argued that the stock market discounts foreign earnings, lumping such local-currency businesses together with bad loans to developing countries.  Better for Citicorp's stock, he added, to buy a U.S. bank.  Mr. Braddock agrees that in the past, Citicorp's overseas expansion hasn't done much for its stock.  "The market tends to reward acquisitions where the benefits are obvious and immediate," he concedes.  But he and others argue that many leading U.S. corporations, such as International Business Machines Corp., make 50% of their sales overseas and that the contributions of overseas profits are evident.  "We're going to have some difficult choices to make," Mr. Braddock says, "but it's not an either/or situation.  We have priorities, and we'll be doing things in phases."  Yesterday's Business World column referred incorrectly to the California office Thomas W. Hayes seeks.  Mr. Hayes is running for the Republican nomination for treasurer, his current post, not governor.  (See: "Business World: California's Hayes Is a Skeptic About Pension-Fund Clout" -- WSJ Aug. 8, 1989)  PEOPLES FEDERAL SAVINGS BANK, Bay St. Louis, Miss., had a tangible capital ratio of 3.83% as of March 31, and First Federal Savings & Loan Association, Leitchfield, Ky., had a ratio of 3.63%.  These thrifts reported their capital position incorrectly in filings to federal regulators, and the erroneous data were listed in a table that ran in Monday's editions.  Northwest Federal Savings & Loan Association, Woodward, Okla., had a ratio of 5.2% based on an amended filing that reclassified certain assets.  The table listed a ratio reported in an earlier filing.  Charter Bank, Hattiesburg, Miss., had a ratio of 2.25%.  The amount was misstated in the table because of an error by regulators.  Southwest Savings Association, Dallas, had net interest income of $42.7 million as of March 31, on an annualized basis.  A different amount was listed in a table in Monday's editions because the thrift reported federal cash assistance as "other income" rather than net interest income in a regulatory filing.  (See: "The Thrift Rescue -- New Fiscal Game: Big Thrift-Rescue Bill Is Likely to Realign The Financial System --- Many S&Ls Seem Doomed, But Banks May Well Gain; Mortgages May Cost More --- Wave of Acquisitions Looms" and "The Thrift Rescue: S&L Bill Hits 672 Institutions With Low Tangible Capital" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  This week marks the first anniversary of the start of the largest demonstrations ever seen in Burma, when millions of people marched for democracy and an end to the ruinous Burmese Way to Socialism.  For a few weeks, this obscure Buddhist nation of nearly 40 million people was the world's top news story; a year later, it is again largely forgotten.  The handful of tourists is confined to closely chaperoned groups, and journalists have been banned indefinitely.  The xenophobic military rulers recently cut the country's minimal international telecommunications for a week.  One of the few certainties is that not one of last year's demands -- multiparty democracy, freedom of speech and assembly, or an accounting of the estimated 3,000 dead -- has been met.  Indeed, the engines of repression appear to be revving up again.  Rangoon, the capital, has seen a visible buildup in light infantry since June; in the past two weeks, there have been hundreds, perhaps thousands, of political arrests.  Jails have been emptied of criminals to create space for political prisoners.  It was reported in late June that a former political detention center on the remote Kokos Islands has been reactivated.  Meanwhile, the National League for Democracy, the largest and best-organized of some 225 opposition parties, is being systematically dismembered.  Its charismatic leader, 44-year-old Aung San Suu Kyi, the daughter of assassinated pre-independence hero Aung San, has been under house arrest since July 20, as is league Chairman Tin U. Aung San Suu Kyi is believed to have started a hunger strike.  The minister for trade, Col. David Abel, denies that Aung San Suu Kyi's English husband, Michael Aris, a Tibet scholar at Oxford, is being held against his will.  The British Foreign Office has protested the apparent isolation of Mr. Aris.  The next target may well be 83-year-old former Premier U Nu, beloved head of the opposition League for Democracy and Peace.  Burma's political unrest did not start with the events that claimed so much attention this time last year.  Gen. Ne Win seized power in 1962, launching his Burmese Way to Socialism.  In 26 years he managed to turn Burma from one of Asia's richest nations to one of the world's poorest.  Per-capita income today is around $150.  Dissent is not allowed and Burma's self-imposed isolation has made it the Albania of Asia.  One of the first cracks in the totalitarian structure showed in mid-1987, when Gen. Ne Win unleashed a torrent of abuse upon party bureaucrats and civil servants for supposedly misinforming him about the country's dizzying downward spiral.  The tongue-lashing was a harbinger of things to come: In September 1987, the government declared worthless all banknotes over 15 kyat (officially $2.34 but about one-seventh of that on the black market).  Tourists found themselves with banknotes good only as souvenirs, while long-suffering Burmese found their savings suddenly fit only for lighting cheroots.  Riots broke out.  The army clamped the lid back on, but with rice and fuel in short supply, popular resentment smoldered.  Demonstrations were put down, brutally, in March and June 1988.  By July, the mood in central Burma was volcanic.  Even Gen. Ne Win could read the writing on the wall.  His belated solution was to suggest multiparty democracy, resigning July 23 as a gesture of good will.  No one doubted, however, that he was still the power behind the scenes, especially since longtime ally Sein Lwin, head of the brutal riot police and perhaps the most unpopular man in Burma, succeeded him.  The main demonstrations in Rangoon began on the afternoon of Aug. 3.  High-school students wore masks over their lower faces and ran down Shwedagon Pagoda Road bearing a pennant with the Fighting Peacock emblem under which generations of Burmese students have rallied. (The National League for Democracy later adopted it as its emblem.) The 10,000 or so marchers peacefully demonstrated for about an hour, then went home for dinner.  Martial law was declared that evening, and light infantry units with automatic weapons and shotguns were everywhere the next day.  On the astrologically auspicious Aug. 8, 1988, huge numbers of Burmese citizens took to the streets of Rangoon, Mandalay and other major cities.  Again, the security forces mostly let them run their course.  Late in the night, however, an order to disperse was ignored and the shooting began.  Four days and 1,000 lives later, the despised Sein Lwin finally stood down, just 17 days after taking office.  His successor was another Ne Win crony, Maung Maung, a Western-educated lawyer who was the only civilian in Gen. Ne Win's clique.  But Maung Maung's conciliatory efforts, such as the establishment of a then-respected election commission and promises of quick elections, came too late.  Demonstrators wanted real democracy, not another puppet.  The unwieldy opposition, meanwhile, could not translate its clear public mandate for change into a unified alternative government.  A state of technical anarchy set in, which in its ugliest manifestation led to the decapitation of more than 40 police and alleged government agents.  The stage was set for the bloody coup on Sept. 18 that installed Gen. Saw Maung, 60, and his State Law and Order Restoration Council.  By official admission, more than 500 alleged looters and "badhats" were summarily executed in the weeks that followed.  "The country has come back from an abyss, and I saved the country, for the good of the people, according to law," Gen. Saw Maung said in January.  But his reassurances rang hollow, since most people believed Gen. Ne Win really held -- and holds -- the reins of power anyway.  In June and early July of this year, Aung San Suu Kyi flouted martial law by addressing rallies of up to 15,000 people.  She reminded the public, in peaceful and well-ordered mass assemblies, that none of last year's basic demands for freedom and democracy have changed.  She specifically denounced Gen. Ne Win as the architect of all Burma's woes.  "It's U Ne Win my father disapproved of and distrusted," Aung San Suu Kyi said last month.  The army is well aware of the power a martyr commands in Burma, where memories are long and legends strong.  The simple fact that she is the daughter of Burma's most revered hero gives Aung San Suu Kyi an almost mystical stature.  Gen. Ne Win may have met his match -- certainly in terms of sheer stubbornness -- in this unlikely political phoenix, who after years in England returned to Burma last year chiefly to visit her dying mother.  The regime may have played to Aung San Suu Kyi's strengths.  As her jailers, they have become guardians of her well-being.  And exile would give her unfettered access to the foreign media.  Gen. Saw Maung probably will keep his word and proceed with elections of a kind next year.  But in the light of what has happened, there is good reason to doubt that the Burmese Way to Democracy will have any more to do with democracy than the idiosyncratic Burmese Way to Socialism ever did with socialism.  ---  Mr. Faulder is managing correspondent of Bureau Bangkok, a news-gathering company.  A federal grand jury here is investigating whether former House Speaker James Wright illegally asked organizations to buy large quantities of a book he wrote instead of paying him speaking fees.  Subpoenas for records related to purchases of Mr. Wright's book, "Reflections of a Public Man," were received recently by a number of organizations that allegedly bought copies in bulk after speeches by the former House leader, according to people familiar with the investigation.  It is illegal for public officials to solicit gifts or money in exchange for favors.  David Runkel, chief Justice Department spokesman, said the criminal investigation into Mr. Wright's financial affairs, reported by the Chicago Tribune, "is ongoing."  He declined, however, to confirm the existence of the grand jury.  Neither Mr. Wright nor his attorney could be reached for comment.  Mr. Wright, a Texas Democrat, announced his resignation May 31 in response to being charged by the House Ethics Committee with 69 violations of House rules and standards.  Some of those charges dealt with the bulk sale of his paperback book to lobbying groups in an alleged scheme to circumvent House income limits on speaking fees and honorariums.  Among the organizations that have received grand jury subpoenas is the National Association of Realtors, to which Mr. Wright spoke in April 1985.  William North, the group's executive vice president, said the Realtors had initially agreed to pay the former congressman $2,000 by check.  Mr. North said that check was subsequently voided by the association "and a new check was made out to the publishing company for books."  Mr. North added that he didn't know who made the decision to void the first check and that the group "cannot find the books" it bought.  Southwest Texas State University in San Marcos received its subpoena Monday regarding a speech Mr. Wright gave there in the fall of 1984.  William Fly, the school's lawyer, said Southwest Texas had agreed to pay Mr. Wright $3,000 for the speech, but that after his appearance, an aide to Mr. Wright called to say that he had reached his limit on outside income.  The Wright aide asked the school if it would, in effect, buy copies of the congressman's book with the $3,000.  The school agreed and received 504 books, almost all of which were given out to students, Mr. Fly said.  Another Yankee import is headed for the London financial scene: The arbs are coming in force.  Drawn by the British takeover boom, several U.S. investment firms are planning to establish so-called risk-arbitrage operations here to speculate in takeover stocks.  Smith Barney Harris Upham Inc. and Perry Partners each say they will open a London arbitrage operation by year end and expand the amount of capital they allocate to investing in British takeover issues.  The firms, which like many others based in New York have been doing their British takeover speculation long-distance, say they want to obtain direct intelligence by being on top of the action.  Bear Stearns Cos., which recently set up a New York-based international arbitrage operation, doesn't rule out a similar move, a senior official says.  "There's going to be lots and lots of action.  Already, I spend about 25% of my time working on U.K. deals," says Richard Perry, managing partner of Perry Partners, which specializes in risk arbitrage.  "We've invested in seven U.K. deals since the beginning of the year: five were great, one OK and one bad," for a net profit of $1.5 million, he adds.  "We've had 20% of our portfolio in U.K. securities.  We would go to 40% if the situation warranted it."  The arrival of the U.S. arbs was inevitable.  Britain's mergers and acquisitions fever has already spawned such U.S. imports as hostile takeovers and high-yield, high-risk junk bonds.  U.S. investor Asher Edelman has been operating in Europe for more than a year.  Arbitraging is risky enough, but the British market carries its own special perils that can send a stock's price plummeting after being bid up on takeover speculation.  British rules require a potential acquirer to win a relatively high percentage of a target company's securities for a takeover or buy-out to succeed.  And British institutions, which play an even more pivotal role in takeovers than their U.S. counterparts, generally still are wedded to long-term investments, and many are loath to unload shares quickly.  "Many institutions are willing to give up a quick profit and wait two or three years for current management to improve a company's share price," says Mr. Perry.  "Just saying 'No' to a takeover bid does work in Britain.  And institutions there have the capacity to say 'No.' Amateur arbs -- the investing public -- can get hurt."  Professionals, too.  Perry Partners' single "bad" British arbitrage venture this year came when Standard Life Assurance Co., a British institution, foiled a takeover run by Netherlands-based Rodamco N.V. on Hammerson Property Investment & Development Corp.; Standard Life bought a large stake in Hammerson.  The subsequent drop in Hammerson's share price lost Perry Partners more than $100,000, Mr. Perry says.  Typifying the caution of many British institutions, Barry Southcott, a managing director of C.I.N. Management Ltd., which oversees #12 billion ($19.17 billion) in British coal workers' pensions, says: "We are long-term investors.  We're really not looking to trade in takeover situations.  One risks taking an eye off the main ball by trying to chase every hare that runs."  But Mr. Southcott says some British institutions are becoming more performance oriented and quicker to cash in on stockmarket plays.  He says he was "rather surprised at the speed" with which Britain's General Electric Co. and Siemens AG of West Germany last week bought 113 million shares of Plessey Co. from institutions in the open market to further their takeover bid.  Those changes are encouraging U.S. arbs to head for London.  "There's risk, but there aren't so many players in London as in the U.S., so there's more opportunity," says Lewis L. Glucksman, vice chairman of Smith Barney, a Primerica Corp. unit.  Mr. Glucksman says that Smith Barney might invest as much as 25% of its $75 million arbitrage portfolio in British takeover situations, up from about 20% recently.  "We're talking to some people about opening an office in London," says Mr. Glucksman.  "Our negotiations are about one-third to one-half the way there.  We'll do something sooner rather than later."  Tax Aversion  ("The IRS plans 'town meetings' to get the public's ideas on improving forms and instructions." -- WSJ news item)  Should the IRS decide  To send out fliers,  The town halls would be  Filled with town criers.  -- Arnold J. Zarett.  ---  Advice Versa  Some high-priced consultants are baffled  By problems that are mind benders,  But my experts know all the answers  They're cabdrivers, barbers and bartenders.  -- George O. Ludcke.  ---  Double Negative  There's one expression That I hear a lot: "Think nothing of it."  And so I do not]  -- Joshua Adams.  Oliver Wendell Holmes is the greatest figure in American law -- perhaps our greatest judge, probably our most seminal legal thinker, but certainly the most vivid and sparkling actor on the legal stage.  Born in 1841, the eldest son of the famous writer-physician Dr. Oliver Wendell Holmes ("The Autocrat of the Breakfast Table," "Old Ironsides"), Holmes grew up in the same cultured and intellectual milieu that produced his boyhood acquaintances, William and Henry James.  After graduating from Harvard College as class poet, Holmes served with great courage in the Civil War; he was seriously wounded three times.  After studying law at Harvard, he rapidly became a leading legal scholar while practicing law part-time.  This phase of his career culminated in the publication in 1881 of "The Common Law," probably the most important book in American law ever written.  The 20 years that followed, in which Holmes was a judge on Massachusetts's highest court, proved merely an interlude before the final and most dramatic phase of Holmes's life.  Appointed to the U.S. Supreme Court at age 61, Holmes served with immense distinction for 30 years, albeit fading somewhat in the stretch, before being gently nudged into retirement.  A very tall, handsome man of commanding physical appearance, Holmes was gregarious, a great wit, a man of wide interests (ranging from Dante to eugenics, and from Durer to burlesque), and one of our greatest writers -- a gift as manifest in his letters and occasional speeches as in the famous scholarly writings and judicial opinions in which law is transmuted into poetry and philosophy.  For comparison one must go to Winston Churchill -- like Holmes a soldier, statesman, wit, writer, personality and survivor.  All this is stuff for great biography and Sheldon M. Novick has given us just that.  "Honorable Justice: The Life of Oliver Wendell Holmes" (Little, Brown; 522 pages; $24.95) is a work of original and exact scholarship, notable in particular for its skillful exploitation of Holmes's heretofore unpublished private correspondence.  "Honorable Justice" is also concise and readable, yet provides enough historical and legal background to enable the nonspecialist to read the book with comprehension and pleasure.  Holmes's legal and philosophical thought is not examined in as great a depth as one might wish, but it is after all a life that Mr. Novick has written rather than a scholarly monograph.  Mr. Novick also does not discuss the vicissitudes of Holmes's reputation, but I must, to bring out a particular value of the book.  From shortly after his appointment to the Supreme Court until his death, Holmes was revered by the liberals of his era.  They thought him one of their own because of the tolerance for the social experimentation that ran like a leitmotif through his constitutional opinions, his hostility to legal formalism -- a conservative force in law, then as now -- his championing of free speech and his generous interpretation of the "habeas corpus" statute.  Perhaps above all, Holmes showed an openness to change remarkably undimmed by old age.  Yet this same Holmes was not a "liberal" in the modern sense.  A social Darwinist and a lifelong Republican who did not balk even at Warren Harding, Holmes did not believe in social reform, antitrust or progressive taxation, and despite his abolitionist background, was unmoved by the plight of black people.  He was also an atheist, a materialist, a behaviorist and a resolute enemy of natural law.  As these dimensions of his thought sank into the academic consciousness after death removed him as an active force for legal progressivism, views on Holmes began to darken, with recent commentators describing him as cold, watchful, selfish, guarded, brutalized by his Civil War experiences, egoistical, excessively ambitious, incapable of friendship, and (even]) childless by choice.  This composite is largely inferred from the man's ideas; this book will make it harder to sustain.  No cold fish could have written the vulnerable letters addressed to Lady Castletown, from which Mr. Novick quotes at length.  Holmes met the sportily handsome, married Irish aristocrat on a European sojourn in the 1880s, continuing an epistolary romance when he returned to his Boston chambers, dreaming over long letters, fondling her gift of an enamel tie pin.  Mr. Novick is also the first to include extensive selections from Holmes's correspondence with family and friends, which show Holmes responding in an altogether human and often moving manner to sickness, bereavement, aging, the pleasures and pains of life, the joys of nature.  Of course Holmes had a hard side, although whether he owed it to his Civil War experiences -- or owed his survival in the Civil War to it -- is entirely speculative.  There is no denying the relish with which Holmes uttered his famous aphorism, "Three generations of imbeciles are enough" -- in an opinion upholding the right of a state to sterilize a feeble-minded woman whose mother and child were similarly afflicted.  Modern critics of Holmes mistake candor, which long ago disappeared from American public discourse, for hardness.  But hardness there was.  I would have been happy to see Mr. Novick dwell more on this, as on Holmes's weaknesses generally.  Middle-aged flirtations on summer holidays in England were the least of his failings.  Often impatient, he wrote many bad opinions, and even his good opinions are often needlessly cryptic.  He was ungenerous to his intellectual predecessors and to such contemporaries as Charles Sanders Peirce and William James.  He overstayed his welcome on the Supreme Court by several years, coming in the end to rely on Brandeis to tell him how to vote in technical cases.  He told some tall stories.  As he got older, he became pathologically tight with money.  All this is just to say that he was human like the rest of us, but fortunately a little less so.  Having reached the end of Mr. Novick's stirring and fascinating biography, you may find yourself inclined to say of Holmes what Hamlet said of his father: "He was a man, take him for all in all: I shall not look upon his like again."  ---  Mr. Posner is a judge for the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit.  Amsterdam's new opera house is called Het Muziektheater (The Music Theater), but people here called it a lot of other things before it was finished two years ago.  For decades the city fought over where to locate the structure, and the final selection of a site on the Amstel River near Waterlooplein was very unpopular with locals.  They charged that a massive, illuminated candy box would be grossly out of scale with the surrounding architecture.  One Muziektheater hater opened a cafe he named Stopera (which ironically now does a healthy pre-theater business).  Rage in the neighborhood rose to fortissimo during construction, when the huge pile drivers pounding foundation supports into the marshy soil set off staccato thunderclaps and shook down several old buildings.  The sound of those pile drivers carried for miles and was never forgotten by those who heard it.  It was, moreover, that sound that inspired the ostinato hammering at the beginning of Louis Andriessen's new opera, "De Materie."  Mr. Andriessen is one of Holland's more controversial composers and has regularly been dubbed the bad boy of Dutch music.  So Het Muziektheater might have shrugged off this audible reminder of its origins in urban noise pollution as just one more example of his sassiness, if the opera had not turned into the glory of this year's Holland Festival at its June premiere in the hall.  Indeed, Mr. Andriessen has turned that powerful hammering in the orchestral introduction to the opera into a sound celebrating the Dutch people as master builders.  It precedes a scene celebrating 16th- and 17th-century ship construction as an important industry in the growth of the Dutch republic.  "De Materie," which translates as "Matter," is an opera about the way spirit relates to matter, and Mr. Andriessen has relied mainly on Dutch culture and history for examples.  The opera has four scenes.  In the first, Dutch shipbuilding is juxtaposed with a visionary text by the 16th-century physicist Gorlaeus, who postulated that matter consists of infinitesimally small particles.  The second scene concerns a 13th-century mystic whose religious vision is strikingly erotic.  The third scene evokes the Dutch painter Piet Mondrian's spiritual notions about line and space, along with his love for dancing.  Only the final scene lacks the patriotic note.  Following a suggestion from the opera's director, Robert Wilson, Mr. Andriessen eccentrically lurches away from Dutch culture to consider the Polish physicist Marie Curie mourning the death of her husband, Pierre, meditating on love, their discovery of radium, and eternity.  If this sounds strange for an opera, it certainly is, especially since Mr. Wilson, the American director known for his own distinctive brand of visionary, non-narrative theater, adds striking visual glosses onto each scene.  Nor does Mr. Wilson hesitate to populate the stage with characteristically extraneous figures and peculiar imagery, most of it rapturously slow movement and gorgeously lit.  Still, it is Mr. Andriessen's music that is the real attraction of "De Materie."  Mr. Andriessen, who celebrated his 50th birthday in June during the run of "De Materie" and who is the descendant of a distinguished line of Dutch composers, initially drew attention to himself in the '50s when he became the first Dutch composer to follow the avant-garde serial approach fashionable then in Europe.  In the '60s, he became the first Dutch composer to use pop music in serious works; in the '70s he led the Dutch minimalist movement.  Such stylistic diversity might make Mr. Andriessen seem a follower of international trend, which of course he is, but he also has an individual stamp and a strong political sensitivity that he brings to all his music.  He often writes music with a message, and he has consistently applied these techniques, along with many others adapted from Gregorian chant, from Stravinsky, from the Rolling Stones, from Charlie Parker.  One of Mr. Andriessen's most successful scores, "De Staat," from the '70s, is a setting for chorus and orchestra of texts by Plato.  The orchestra plays repeated minimalist fragments, while the chorus declaims passages from "The Republic" as long-lined chants.  A lavish piece full of elaborate counterpoint and every other device from ancient Greek tetrachords to Stravinskian polyrhythms, "De Staat" tries to refute Plato's notion that musical innovation threatens the state.  This flair for combining jarring musical imagery pervades "De Materie" as well, especially in the exhilarating "De Stijl" segment, which revolves around that proto-cubist art movement's leader, Mondrian.  Mr. Andriessen has produced a musical analog of Mondrian's 1927 painting, "Composition With Red, Yellow and Blue," by utilizing different instruments -- winds, saxophones, piano, electric guitar and drums -- as if they were primary colors in his composition.  Moreover, he gives lower-register instruments a 24-bar disco theme and combines it with a boogie-woogie on the piano.  This must refer to the painter's masterpiece of 1942-43, "Broadway Boogie Woogie," and to his love of the music itself.  He is said to have taken dancing lessons until the age of 70.  On top of all this, a chorus of sopranos sings a text about the spiritual symbolism of circle and angle; later a dancer jazzily speaks a text about Mondrian's dancing days in Paris.  The music, meanwhile, swings and pulses in unpredictable but forcefully visceral ways, erupting at one point into highly structured but provocative rock and roll, and doing so with such momentum that it forced Mr. Wilson to create some of his most rapid and arresting movements for dancers.  "De Stijl" has been recorded by a small Dutch label, Attacca, but like the rest of Mr. Andriessen's music, it is hard to find outside of Holland, and unfortunately the compact disk release of "De Materie" scheduled by Donemus will have no international distribution.  But it is not impossible for another, more widely distributed label, to license it for America, and that could happen, especially if public radio carries through a tentative plan to broadcast a live recording of an Amsterdam performance in the fall.  Mr. Andriessen will also be a presence here over the next several months.  Also this fall, Mr. Andriessen will be a visiting professor at the State University of New York in Buffalo, where he is sure to make waves.  ---  Mr. Swed is a free-lance music critic based in New York.  Now There's No Excuse  For Dirty Windows  AN OREGON couple is selling a squeegee that may win over those people who "don't do windows."  It all started when Alan Hansen and his wife, Sandra, built a house in Lake Oswego, Ore., that had a shower with clear glass doors.  To keep them clean, the Hansens bought a traditional T-shaped squeegee, but didn't care much for its looks.  So the couple got Ziba Design Inc. of Beaverton, Ore., to create a better looking, more efficient squeegee, which is now being produced by Mr. Hansen.  In its research, Ziba discovered that the conventional T-form isn't the most efficient shape for a squeegee.  "Most users position their hand close to the blade," says Ziba's Sohrab Vossoughi.  "They seldom grip the stalk."  Ziba designed a tubular, twin-bladed, plastic squeegee.  The Cleret Glass Cleaner is moved across glass or mirrors with a wiping motion that, according to Mr. Vossoughi, reduces strain and fatigue to the hand and wrist.  The Cleret Glass Cleaner is one of 12 products that won a 1989 award for excellence from the Industrial Designers Society of America.  The winners, who will receive their awards tonight, were chosen from 372 entries from designers in firms ranging from large corporations to one-person consulting offices.  Digital Design Boosts  X-Ray Mobility, Safety  DIGITAL technology makes X-ray machines more mobile and safer.  Thomas Dempsey and Clay Johnson, students of industrial design at Auburn University, figured they could make a mobile X-ray machine smaller, easier to maneuver and safer if they replaced conventional film with a digitizing pad.  In their Bio-Scan device, the pad receives the X-rays, converts them into digital format and transmits them to the machine's computer, from which an image is sent to a liquid-crystal-display screen near the controls.  Bio-Scan's design eliminates the need for conventional X-ray film and developing and allows the doctor immediately to see the X-ray on the LCD screen.  The digital image can be enlarged and reused in other ways, reducing the need for additional X-rays and minimizing a patient's exposure to radiation.  Messrs.  Dempsey and Johnson say they wanted to design a machine that was both attractive and practical.  For example, the wheel base is short for easy entry into doorways and elevators.  Mr. Johnson, currently an industrial designer with Integraph in Huntsville, Ala., says BioScan's form is "less intimidating" to both the user and the patient.  Existing mobile X-ray machines "look like washing machines rolling down the hall," he says.  The designers society named Bio-Scan best student project.  Toy Periscope Price Is  No Longer Out of Sight  PRICE WAS no object until an entrepreneur tried to turn his periscope into a plaything.  About 15 years ago, George Miller started producing a hand-held periscope for law enforcers, the military and others who need to see over and around things.  Mr. Miller's Peerscope was high quality, with an aluminum case and 11 coated glass lenses.  But when Mr. Miller tried to interest the adult-toy trade, even upscale outfits like Sharper Image balked at the price: as much as $150.  So Mr. Miller asked Lunar Design, Palo Alto, Calif., to find a way to cut the price.  Lunar replaced the aluminum and glass with plastics, trimming the price to $50.  The design firm also made the new Sportscope Periscope collapsible for easy packing.  Sportscope won an excellence award in the designers society's toys and games category.  Odds and Ends  FITCH RichardsonSmith, Worthington, Ohio, won an award for designing a turret-style forklift truck that the operator can run sitting down or standing up, while traveling with loads up to 35 feet high. . . .  The design staffs at Chrysler and Mitsubishi won top prize in the transportation category for their jointly designed 1990 Plymouth Laser and Mitsubishi Eclipse.  Only a year after gaining control of Societe Generale de Belgique in continental Europe's most celebrated takeover battle, Cie.  Financiere de Suez launched France's largest takeover bid ever, a hostile 15.9 billion-franc ($2.48 billion) offer for control of Cie.  Industrielle.  Cie.  Industrielle is a holding company whose main asset is a predominant stake in insurer Groupe Victoire, which less than two weeks ago announced a spectacular friendly acquisition of West Germany's second-biggest insurer, Colonia Versicherung AG.  This transaction wouldn't be threatened by Suez's plans.  Suez said its move is designed to resolve a long-simmering shareholders' feud at Victoire and give Suez full control of the French insurance group, in which it already holds a minority stake.  The takeover would make Suez, long considered a rich but slumbering giant, a genuine financial powerhouse, with strong banking, insurance and industrial assets in several European countries.  But Suez could be facing as hard a fight this time as it faced last year when it defeated Italian financier Carlo De Benedetti in a fierce six-month takeover battle for Generale de Belgique, the sprawling Belgian holding company.  In a telephone interview, Cie.  Industrielle Chairman Jean-Marc Vernes said he will fight the bid and hinted he would seek to enlist the support of powerful allies.  "When you fight a war alone, you lose," said the fiery Mr. Vernes, who is also the chairman of the Beghin-Say sugar group controlled by Italy's Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A.  "We have friends," he added, but he wouldn't elaborate on who these friends could be.  Financial sources speculated that these could include Ferruzzi or the insurance company it controls, La Fondiaria Assicurazioni S.p.A., as well as France's Cie.  Financiere de Paribas and Cie. de Navigation Mixte.  None of these groups would say yesterday whether they were prepared to enter into a full-fledged takeover battle.  Both Ferruzzi and Navigation Mixte were rumored to have bought shares either in Victoire or in Cie.  Industrielle last week, prompting Suez to request last Friday the suspension of trading in shares of Victoire and Cie.  Industrielle while it attempted to work out a modus vivendi with Mr. Vernes that would give Suez a greater say in Victoire's management.  The failure of these efforts precipitated Suez's move yesterday.  Cie.  Industrielle and Suez have long shared power in Victoire through a delicate balance of shareholdings.  Suez already controls an 18.5% stake in Cie.  Industrielle, as well as 30% of Victoire's capital and 34% of its voting rights.  But its hopes of playing a more important role in Victoire have been blocked by Mr. Vernes and Cie.  Industrielle, which controls 40% of Victoire's capital and 48% of its voting rights.  Mr. Vernes is also a major shareholder in Societe Centrale d'Investissements, which is Cie.  Industrielle's biggest holder with a 25% stake.  The already complex situation suddenly became more acute with the announcement late last month of Victoire's acquisition of Colonia.  That move propelled Victoire from fifth to second place among French insurers, with annual premiums of about 50 billion francs, making it a much more attractive asset to hold.  Suez was hoping that Victoire's need for fresh cash to fund its acquisition of Colonia -- estimated at about 15 billion francs -- would provide the opening it had long been seeking to raise its stake in the insurer or in Cie.  Industrielle.  But instead, Suez sources say, Mr. Vernes sought to bring in Ferruzzi and other allies to fend off Suez's claim and create a majority bloc within Cie.  Industrielle.  Ferruzzi wouldn't comment yesterday on whether it has any part in the battle.  Unwilling to play the role of a minority shareholder in the newly enlarged Victoire, Suez has decided that the only way to break the impasse is to seek control of Cie.  Industrielle -- or dispose of its shares at a high price.  "Vernes wouldn't give Suez any say, so Suez decided it had two options: gain control of Victoire or sell its stake entirely," says one financial source with knowledge of the transaction.  "The dice are cast and Victoire will go to the one willing to pay most."  Suez is offering 13,000 francs ($2,031) a share for the 81.5% of Cie.  Industrielle it doesn't already hold, a significant premium over its last quoted price of 9,750 francs a share.  The offer values the entire holding company at about 19.5 billion francs.  Suez also said last night that if it wins the battle, it will offer to buy all outstanding shares in Cie.  Financiere du Groupe Victoire, the insurer's holding company.  This could add another seven billion francs to the cost of the takeover.  If successful, Suez also would have to take charge of the financing of Victoire's Colonia acquisition -- which sources say it could do partly by selling off Victoire's real-estate holdings.  Suez, which had to raise its capital several times last year through rights issues to fund its Belgian battle, says it can fund its acquisition of Cie.  Industrielle out of its cash hoard or through short-term loans.  One source said Suez, if victorious, would likely resell part of its stake in Cie.  Industrielle, to recoup part of its costs.  It could also sell off Cie.  Industrielle assets, such as real estate and minority industrial holdings, estimated at between one billion and two billion francs.  Smith Corona Corp. was added to the office equipment industry group of the Dow Jones Equity Market Index, effective yesterday.  Nacco Industries Inc. is being moved to the heavy machinery industry group from the coal group because of a recent acquisition.  Ashland Coal Inc. is being added to the coal industry group.  Both changes are effective today.  Empress Maria Theresa wore one, at her coronation.  So did George Washington as part of his Masonic regalia.  Middle Europeans believed wrapping a newborn boy in one could keep him from becoming a skirt-chaser, while Scandinavian folklore said the girl who burned a hole in hers would soon be married.  The subject is aprons, long-overlooked objects that have now come out of the galley and into the gallery at the Metropolitan Museum.  But the dozens of beaded, embroidered and beribboned examples on display at its Costume Institute through Sept. 3 have about as much in common with their household cousins as Marie Antoinette and Betty Crocker. (Though no baker, Marie was an apron-wearer; the Bo Peep costume in which she played at being a shepherdess sparked a brief vogue for voluminous pinafores.)  "Our primary purpose was to show beautiful objects that are unexpected," said Beth Alberty, the exhibit's curator, whose own charcoal-and-white ensemble included an understated pinafore.  "In our culture we're inclined to think about aprons as utilitarian, certainly not fashionable."  That thinking should change after a visit to "Apropos Aprons."  The array here, ranging from the rococo creations of anonymous seamstresses to sleek interpretations by couturiers including Mainbocher, amply demonstrates the fashion potential of this humble garment.  In many cases, such as an 18th-century English example whose cream-colored cloth is all but obscured by a botanic garden of silk and gold embroidery, the apron becomes a canvas for artistic expression.  But there's more to aprons than meets the eye.  As Ms. Alberty explains in the lively wall labels accompanying the exhibit -- there is no catalog -- over the centuries aprons have communicated a variety of messages, often pertaining to sex and work.  It's no accident, she suggests, that when soldiers returning from World War II wanted the factory jobs women had been filling, aprons began sprouting on the fashion scene.  "It was symbolic of the interest in getting women back to the home," the curator observed.  "Not that anybody actually said, 'Wear an apron and get back to the kitchen.'"  Much apron talk is pretty plain.  As the show illustrates, in some cultures the garment proclaimed the wearer's marital status or profession.  Among the Ndebele tribe of South Africa a girl entering puberty would wear a square, beaded apron; upon marriage she'd switch to one with a five-pendant hem like that on display.  During the Middle Ages many European trades adopted distinctive aprons, such as the smithy's leather.  It was from the medieval builder's work apron that the Masonic ceremonial garb evolved.  An image in the exhibit shows Washington, a lodge grand master at the time of his election to the presidency, wearing an apron embroidered by Mme. de Lafayette.  So closely associated were aprons and work at one point that the French expression meaning to resign from a job is rendre son tablier -- literally, to give back one's apron.  Interestingly aprons also came to symbolize the leisure class.  As they moved from peasant clothing into fashionable European dress in the 16th century, the garments' generous use of luxury items such as linen and lace trumpeted that their wearers were above needing them.  Ladies like Mary, Countess Howe, painted by Gainsborough in her long, gauzy apron, would wear them when receiving callers or strolling in the garden.  By the mid-1700s they were sufficiently fashionable that Maria Theresa donned a jewel-trimmed lace apron with her red coronation robes when ascending the Hapsburg throne of the Holy Roman Empire.  The apron's heyday in Europe and America arrived during the 19th century, when white pinafores became a virtual uniform for girls.  But judging by the examples in the exhibit, its artistic flowering came in the extravagantly embroidered creations of the previous era.  In recent years designer use of the apron has turned primarily tongue-in-chic, like the 1979 tartan ensemble by Malcolm McLaren and Vivienne Westwood displayed on a spike-haired male mannequin.  Ms. Alberty's commentary reads: "The kilt, symbol of Scottish manliness, has been reduced here to apronlike front and back panels worn over bondage pants." (What will Jesse Helms make of this?)  Besides the garments culled from the Metropolitan's collection of more than 300 aprons, the exhibition contains related engravings, photographs and fashion plates.  Because of the nature of the museum's holdings the focus is on Europe, but there's a sampling from other cultures.  Of particular interest are some Southeast Asian works appliqued with bold geometric designs and a pair of celadon-colored silk aprons from 19th-century China embroidered with the delicacy of a watercolor.  Almost as intriguing as the aprons is the folklore they've fostered.  As Ms. Alberty writes in the section on folk practices, Pennsylvania Germans believed the best remedy for a horse's sprained leg was to tie it with a stolen apron string.  And for those with other kinds of apron strings on their mind, the East Prussians had the answer.  "To catch a man," the tale went, "a woman waits for the opportunity to make him dry his hands in her apron."  Five insiders at Houston Industries Inc. junked their stakes in the company shortly before its debt was downgraded and the company reported sharply lower second-quarter earnings.  The insiders, who include Don D. Sykora, president of the company's Houston Power & Light unit, sold their stock at $31.25 to $33 a share, according to reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The price of the stock has trended higher since the sales, closing unchanged yesterday at $34.625, just below its 12-month high.  Four of the five insiders unloaded all their holdings.  Mr. Sykora kept a token 15 shares.  Their stakes weren't very big to begin with, ranging from 44 to 3,843 shares.  The Houston Industries officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Sandra Brendler, spokeswoman for the company, said the stock that the insiders sold was from a terminated Employee Stock Ownership Program.  "We discontinued our ESOP {in December 1986}, and these people's shares were subject to a six-month holding requirement."  The insiders sold the holdings "as soon as they were eligible to sell them," she said.  All the insiders sold between June 16 and July 17.  On July 6, Duff & Phelps downgraded Houston Industries' senior debt to triple-B-minus from single-A-minus.  Then on Friday, Houston Industries released second-quarter results, which showed a 40% decline in per-share earnings to 45 cents from 75 cents in the year-earlier period.  Daniel Rudakas, a Duff & Phelps analyst who follows the company, said Houston Industries has run into cash-flow problems because of its costly acquisition of some cable television assets.  Mr. Rudakas said he found the stock sales unusual but not worrisome.  "I would think that anybody who makes a sufficient paycheck in upper management would buy stock in his own company," the analyst said.  But, in retrospect, the insiders "should have hung onto it -- it's gone up," he said.  The largest insider sale, according to the SEC filings, was by D. Eugene Simmons, group vice president of power operations, who sold his 3,843 shares for $32 each, or $122,976.  If Mr. Simmons had sold yesterday, instead of July 7, the day of the rating downgrade, he would have realized $10,088 more.  The other insiders sold much smaller stakes.  What the insiders did with the money "is beyond what the public has a right to know," said Ms. Brendler of Houston Industries.  ---  FAMILY BUSINESS: Shortly before Williams Cos. reported a second-quarter loss, its former chairman sold a third of his stock in the Tulsa, Okla.-based energy and telecommunications company, SEC filings show.  John H. Williams, a director and cousin of the current chairman, sold 100,000 shares in mid-July for $3.9 million.  Last Wednesday, the company reported an unaudited net loss of $5.9 million, or 21 cents a share.  Williams stock dipped on the bad news, but has since trended higher.  It closed yesterday up 50 cents at $40.375 a share.  Both Mr. Williams and the company declined to comment.  Mr. Williams still holds 206,017 Williams shares, directly and indirectly, according to SEC filings.  Foster Corwith, a securities analyst who follows the company for Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., said there's been a "short-term, negative impact on earnings" from Williams Cos.' recent expansion into the telecommunications business.  "But, long-term, we're expecting significant profits."  ---  STAKE OF GRACE: Now that celebrity money-manager Peter S. Lynch is a director of W.R. Grace & Co., he can't buy shares in the specialty chemical company for his huge Fidelity Magellan fund.  But he recently picked up a few shares for himself.  Mr. Lynch bought 1,000 shares of Grace on July 5 for $31,380, according to a filing with the SEC.  The purchase followed his election to Grace's board of directors in May.  The price of Grace stock has risen more than $3 a share since he made the purchase.  Grace closed yesterday at $34.75 a share, up $1.  Mr. Lynch, executive vice president of Fidelity Management & Research Co., said Grace shares had previously been "a small part" of the Magellan fund that he manages.  But he said the fund "sold out well before I became a director."  Mr. Lynch said Fidelity policy precludes him from buying the shares for the fund as long as he serves as a director.  Nicaragua's "president," Daniel Ortega, cut through the diplomat-chat coming out of the accord that he and four frightened Central American presidents signed Monday to disband the Contras.  Mr. Ortega said, "The Contras' death sentence has been signed."  If little else, we've always found the "comandante" to be a remarkably plain-spoken man on such matters.  Indeed, only last week, an official of Mr. Bush's State Department confirmed that the Sandinista army has been conducting "search-and-destroy operations in northern Nicaragua aimed at the family members and supporters of the resistance."  So it is disconcerting to be reminded in the stories about the accord that the Bush administration won't give the Contras and their families green cards for resettlement into the United States.  This takes U.S. policy a step beyond the precedents established in Vietnam, Laos and Cambodia.  At least when the U.S. pulled the plug on its allies in those efforts, it put as many of them as possible on boats and planes back to the U.S., where they've led extraordinarily productive lives -- exactly what they'd have done if they had prevailed over the communists.  But now the U.S. apparently has a new attitude: After it pulls the plug on its allies, it grabs a plunger and forces them all back down the drain. (The White House yesterday went to great lengths to say the Contras' return has to be "voluntary.")  Though the accord itself is being described as a dramatic blow to U.S. policy, it merely ratifies a political judgment made by Ronald Reagan last fall, when the President let it be known that he was considering admitting the Contras to the U.S. as refugees.  We took this as Mr. Reagan's concession speech on Nicaragua.  With Soviet ships still offloading vast amounts of East-bloc war materiel at Nicaraguan ports while congressional Democrats were limiting the Contras to gauze pads, it was hardly surprising that the leadership of the surrounding democracies would want to negotiate a separate peace with the Sandinistas.  Still, it was consistent with Ronald Reagan's character that he should want to give the Contras and their families refuge in the U.S., rather than consign them to Mr. Ortega's tender mercies.  By contrast, the Bush team wants the Contras to return to Nicaragua to become a political force in the elections the Sandinistas claim they'll hold next February.  We suppose there is a certain, elegant State Department logic in this scenario, though Mr. Ortega's "death sentence" remark doesn't sound like someone who expects to lose power through a sudden surge in voter registrations.  A more likely script already is unfolding: Denied refuge in the U.S., the Contras said yesterday they'll go into Nicaragua alright -- to fight.  And with that, Mr. Ortega will declare a "moratorium" on February's election.  The congressional Democrats, incidentally, believe they've got Mr. Bush and his lieutenants neutralized; their reading of the agreement Secretary Baker signed with them is that Mr. Bush's only option is to support the Central Americans' "peace" accord.  Meanwhile, off in another ring of the Central American big top, the communist guerrillas trying to topple El Salvador's recently elected government are staging one of the most amazing acts we've seen in some time.  The Farabundo Marti National Liberation Front (FMLN) issued a press release August 2, via fax, from its Washington office, announcing the opening of a terrorist offensive in San Salvador.  We reprint it nearby.(See: "Notables & Quotables" -- WSJ Aug. 9, 1989).  Press contact: Jose Aguirre.  We might add that Salvadorans fleeing into the U.S. to escape the guerrillas' assault are also subject to the administration's down-the-drain policy on refugees.  The Immigration Service now forces Salvadorans back across the border.  It is understandable that the Bush team might want to cut its losses and get the Nicaraguan issue behind it.  The subject imposed considerable paralysis on the last few years of the Reagan presidency.  Be that as it may, we're not certain that it's possible to simply lance this boil and move on.  The aftereffects will remain, and they will haunt the U.S. as it purports to exercise its leadership role in the world.  The decision to deny the Contras entry into the U.S. and instead force them back into Nicaragua is dishonorable.  If the policy were at all persuasive, its cold-bloodedness might be defensible.  But it is not persuasive.  It has the look of a Washington policymaking environment that too often appears to reflect little more than the strange political life of the Beltway.  Surely no one understands this better than the folks cheerfully announcing FMLN military offensives by fax from Washington.  Despite all the talk about William Lucas's lack of legal experience, a key reason for the Senate Judiciary Committee's rejection was that he had switched parties and become a Republican.  More and more public officials -- 125 in just the past six months -- feel the Democratic Party no longer represents them and have decided to leave it.  Democrats know one way to slow the hemorrhaging is to make it clear what kind of grilling any apostates will face if they ever come up for Senate confirmation.  Democrats certainly have cause for concern.  Three prominent Democrats recently have announced they are joining the GOP.  They apparently are being joined by hundreds of thousands of voters.  A recent Gallup Poll found that 40% of those surveyed considered themselves Democrats and 33% Republicans; last year, the gap was 42% to 30%.  The most surprising party switch is that of Maurice Turner, the black police chief of Washington, D.C., who announced his decision after a meeting with President Bush.  If Mr. Turner runs for Mayor he'll be the first Republican in history to have a real chance of carrying the District.  Louisiana Secretary of State Fox McKeithen also announced that he is now a Republican.  Mr. McKeithen, the son of a former Governor, said he finally decided the Democratic Party was "out of touch with normal people."  Mr. McKeithen may challenge Democratic Senator Bennett Johnston next year.  The day after Mr. Turner's switch, Tommy Robinson of Arkansas joined Florida Rep. Bill Grant as the second Democratic Congressman to bolt to the GOP this year.  Mr. Robinson, a former sheriff of Little Rock, said he had waited for years for signs that he could live with the liberal House leadership.  Earlier this year, he was removed from a key committee for being too friendly with Republicans.  Mr. Robinson hoped things would improve under the new Speaker, Tom Foley, but notes, "Nothing has changed."  Liberal House Democrats dismissed the Robinson switch as irrelevant, but they are privately worried.  Unlike previous party switchers such as Phil Gramm, Messrs.  Robinson and Grant are basically moderates who often backed the Democratic leadership.  The liberal Americans for Democratic Action gave Mr. Grant a 50% score in 1988.  Mr. Robinson's rating was 55%.  If moderates can't stomach the lock-step liberalism of the Democratic Caucus, the party's center of gravity is clearly out of sync with that of the public.  Mr. Robinson says the only reason many of his colleagues remain in the Democratic Party is its continued control of the House, maintained through the use of artful gerrymandering and other incumbent-protection devices.  Still liberal Democrats claim their control of Congress is proof that the voters agree with them.  They refuse to admit that Ronald Reagan fundamentally changed the political landscape.  Their current jihad against a capital-gains tax cut is a attempt to revive 1930s-style attacks on "economic royalists," i.e. the rich.  They fail to realize that many Americans of modest means see a lower rate as the best way to climb on the bandwagon of upward mobility.  None of the defectors represent a crippling blow to the Democratic Party.  However, they are a warning that the party's liberalism is creating more and more disaffected moderates.  But rather than respond in any significant way to their concerns, the smearing of William Lucas is more evidence that liberal Democrats prefer to bring out the political truncheons to show moderates that they put their careers at risk if they leave the party.  Ampco-Pittsburgh Corp. bought a 6.6% stake in Midway Airlines Inc., Chicago, for $10.3 million, but it isn't clear whether the industrial concern intends to try to take over the regional air carrier.  Ampco-Pittsburgh, a producer of rolls for steel and aluminum rolling mills, and fans and other products, refused to answer any questions about the airline investment.  Midway stock jumped on the news, closing up $1.50 a share at $20.50 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Some analysts speculate that Ampco-Pittsburgh may be attempting to make a quick profit on Midway stock by putting the carrier into play.  Airline takeover attempts have been major market movers in recent weeks, following the takeover of NWA Inc., the holding company of Northwest Airlines, and an effort by an investor group to take over UAL Corp., parent of United Airlines.  Midway said in a brief statement that it hasn't been contacted by Ampco-Pittsburgh.  Midway serves 51 cities in the U.S. and the Caribbean from Chicago's Midway Airport, which is much closer to downtown than O'Hare, the city's main airport.  Ampco-Pittsburgh filed a 13D statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission saying it has no present plans to seek control of Midway.  However, the filing said Ampco-Pittsburgh has explored and will further explore strategies for obtaining control of Midway, including the possibility of entering into a partnership with one or more third parties for the purpose of acquiring more Midway shares or making a proposal for a business combination.  According to the 13D filing, Ampco-Pittsburgh bought 662,600 Midway common shares between July 25 and Aug. 3, at prices ranging from $14.625 to $18 a share.  The 13D filing doesn't necessarily mean Midway is in play, said Thomas Longman, an analyst at Bear, Stearns & Co.  He thinks Ampco-Pittsburgh is making a "passive" investment.  I don't think it wants to own an airline," he said.  Midway might be worth $22 to $23 a share to a possible buyer as an airline, Mr. Longman said.  But it will take delivery of new aircraft this year, he added, and that delivery position could be a "kicker" raising the company's value.  There is a waiting list several years long for new aircraft.  Midway management and directors own 11% of the stock, First Chicago Corp. owns 6.8%, and the rest of the shares are widely held, according to the most recent prospectus.  Ampco-Pittsburgh has undergone a major restructuring in the last three years, selling off businesses that accounted for about half of its sales.  Management pulled out of such basic industry businesses as steel production, rail cars, farm implements, steel forgings and materials handling equipment.  Businesses since discontinued contributed $199.5 million of sales in 1986, according to last year's annual report.  For the first half, Ampco-Pittsburgh earned $6.2 million, or 65 cents a share, on sales of $115.1 million, up from net of $1 million, or 11 cents a share, a year earlier, on sales of $103.4 million.  In both years, the company had special credits from tax loss carryforwards that arose from losses on the discontinued businesses.  Dart Drug Stores Inc., saddled with heavy debt and costs of an extensive store-renovation program, filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Two months ago, the Landover, Md.-based discount retailer predicted it would achieve a positive cash flow by Aug. 1.  At the time, it deliberately delayed making some interest payments in junk bonds in hopes of gaining some breathing room.  But as the interest payments and other pressures mounted, the company indicated it felt compelled to seek court protection.  Under Chapter 11, a company is shielded from creditor suits while it works out a plan to repay its debt.  The filing, made in federal court in Rockville, Md., was announced yesterday afternoon.  Dart Drug shares didn't trade yesterday, but were quoted in over-the-counter trading Monday at a bid price of $1.  Dart Drug said that, subject to court and creditor approval, it will repay in full all of its secured creditors through newly arranged financing of as much as $30 million from Mellon Bank, a unit of Pittsburgh-based Mellon Bank Corp.  The company identified Security Pacific Businesses Credit Inc., a unit of Security Pacific Corp., and Arlie Group Limited Partnership, a Connecticut investment concern, as its major creditors.  Security Pacific, Los Angeles, is owed about $17 million; Arlie Group about $3 million, according to James N. Schwarz, Dart Drug's executive vice president and general counsel.  He also identified the trustees for the largest groups of unsecured bondholders as Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Co., with about $101 million, and Signet Trust Co., with about $29 million.  Sheldon W. Fantle, Dart Drug's chairman, said in a brief prepared statement that the company "simply could not afford to continue to make payments" on its debt, which is believed to exceed $130 million.  "Our board determined that it was far better to take this step now, while our company has substantial resources to implement a plan of reorganization, than to wait too long," Mr. Fantle said.  An investor group led by Mr. Fantle acquired control of the company in November 1987, inheriting about $164 million in bond and bank debt.  The group spearheaded a major overhaul of the chain's 74 stores, renaming many of the outlets Fantle's and installing computerized checkout scanners that automatically read the UPC codes.  Dart also placed a greater emphasis on customer service, including free delivery of prescriptions and a charity donation program.  But there were signs that the debt load, particularly the $105 million in bonds, was getting too heavy to carry.  In June, the company decided to delay payment of about $1.8 million of interest due on about $29 million of high-yield junk bonds for the full 30-day grace period.  Last month, Dart did the same with $2.3 million of interest due on a further $76 million of bonds.  Kaye Handley, an analyst with R.D. Smith & Co., said she wasn't surprised by the bankruptcy-law filing.  "We were expecting some kind of financial restructuring," she said.  The company had indicated an intention to "do refinancing," she said.  According to her estimates, the company has secured bank debt of about $16 million and it owes vendors $15 million to $20 million.  It wasn't immediately clear how the bankruptcy filing will affect attitudes of vendors and other suppliers and customers of the retail chain.  But Mr. Fantle has a reputation for success in negotiating with vendors.  Filing for bankruptcy-law protection was a wise move, said Ms. Handley, because it temporarily frees Dart Drug of the onerous interest payments.  "The real question is how willing the bondholders are to go along with" the reorganization plan, she said.  Dart Drug said it will continue to donate a portion of its receipts to charities under its Good Neighbor program, which it considers essential to its reorganization.  Aug. 21, 1987, was a day of near-panic at SmithKline Beckman Corp.  That was when Dyazide, the Philadelphia company's No. 2 drug, got generic competition.  "Nobody was more surprised than the president and chief operating officer at SmithKline," says George Ebright, who held those positions at the time.  Evidence now suggests that one generic drug company's chicanery and another's lobbying of the Food and Drug Administration brought about that surprise, hurting SmithKline while it was vulnerable and helping to trigger its recent merger with Beecham Group PLC.  In 1988 -- the first full year after the initial generic form of Dyazide was approved -- Dyazide sales in the U.S. plummeted 53% from a year earlier to $153 million.  That decline increased pressure on SmithKline just as it was also struggling to stem the erosion of sales of its No. 1 drug, the ulcer medicine Tagamet.  Now Dyazide, a blood-pressure medicine, is at the center of a widening congressional inquiry into how certain generic-drug companies won governmental approvals for their versions of the controversial drug.  Vitarine Pharmaceuticals Inc., has admitted that employees filled Vitarine capsules with SmithKline's Dyazide to win FDA approval of a generic version of the hot-seller.  The FDA, spurred by a congressional subcommittee, is looking into whether Bolar Pharmaceutical Co. pulled the same trick.  Bolar categorically denies any wrongdoing.  Dyazide was an obvious target for generics companies: Introduced in the U.S. in 1965, it became the most widely prescribed drug in the country once doctors began to treat hypertension more aggressively.  All the while, SmithKline wasn't bashful about boosting the drug's price.  The arrival of generic competition stunned the company even though its patent on the drug had expired seven years earlier.  SmithKline wrongly assumed that the FDA wouldn't approve a generic version until the company resolved a drawn-out clinical issue concerning Dyazide's bioavailability -- how easily it is absorbed by the body.  By many accounts, the FDA strongly signaled that it would only approve generic copies of a new, more easily absorbed Dyazide formulation that SmithKline was to develop.  "The fact is we heard that all the time," says Peter Hutt, a Washington lawyer who worked for SmithKline on the matter.  An FDA spokesman differs with this account.  He says the agency was bound eventually to approve generic versions of the original Dyazide formulation if they passed the required tests.  But makers of generics say they felt put off by the agency.  And, as they saw it, clinical questions about Dyazide perversely worked in SmithKline's favor.  They allege the company delayed the new formulation to keep its lock on the market.  "I don't know how SmithKline got away with it," says Roy McKnight, the chief executive of Mylan Laboratories Inc., a generics maker in Pittsburgh.  Mylan, for its part, managed to come up with its own new formulation, called Maxzide, and won FDA approval for it in 1984.  Sales of Dyazide, however, continued without decline, helped by its strong reputation with physicians and years of SmithKline marketing.  So, despite the availability of Mylan's drug, the impetus to develop a generic version of Dyazide remained strong.  But some generics companies faced another obstacle.  In congressional testimony last month, Marvin Seife, formerly head of the FDA's generic division, said the companies had trouble copying the original Dyazide because of its low bioavailability.  "You have to formulate down in order to mimic the SmithKline product," he said.  SmithKline denies any regulatory gamesmanship.  The company says it complied with all the FDA's instructions about coming up with a new formulation and then testing it.  Because some four million people were taking Dyazide daily, the company says, it took pains to make sure any switch to a new formulation would be safe.  "It was something that had to be done carefully," a spokesman says.  He adds that, in the end, the tests didn't show any differences in effectiveness or safety between the old and new formulations, so long as dosages were adjusted to bioavailability.  The Dyazide on the market today is still the original formulation.  In any case, the FDA approved the Bolar product in 1987, dumbfounding SmithKline.  Mr. Ebright, the former SmithKline president and now chief executive of Cytogen Corp., a Princeton, N.J., biotechnology company, recalls cutting short his vacation to deal with the emergency.  How did the approval catch SmithKline off guard?  Even now the details aren't entirely clear.  But Dr. Seife testified that "there was an undue amount of pressure" placed on him to approve the Bolar product by Bolar's joint-venture partner, Schein Pharmaceutical Inc., of Port Washington, New York.  "I had frequent visits, frequent telephone calls," he said.  Robert Shulman, Bolar's president, says his company entered into the agreement with Schein "to help us get our product approved."  In return, Bolar agreed to split profits from sales of its copy of Dyazide with Schein.  Mr. Shulman identified the source of Schein's influence as its vice chairman, William Haddad, who is politically well-connected and was once president of a generic-drug industry group.  Mr. Haddad denies pressuring Dr. Seife.  "No congressman or senator visited him," Mr. Haddad says.  "Nobody called him on the product.  I didn't put any pressure on him.  It's not my style."  Mr. Haddad says he had only one, 15-minute meeting with Dr. Seife on behalf of Bolar in which he suggested that Bolar's version of Dyazide as originally formulated had to be approved by the FDA under a 1984 law encouraging generic competition to off-patent drugs.  Mr. Haddad played a part in helping shape that law, which fueled the growth of the generic drug industry.  Mr. Haddad also says that he urged Dr. Seife to be "ultra cautious" in making sure SmithKline wasn't tipped off about the Bolar product.  He says he feared SmithKline would have quickly introduced a new Dyazide formulation, thus again heightening the bioavailability issue and stalling generic competition.  "We had called SmithKline's bluff," he says.  Bolar won its approval in an "unusually fast" six months, Dr. Seife testified.  Vitarine followed with its approval in February 1988.  How rapidly generics changed Dyazide's market is evident from sales trends.  Hemant Shah, a generic-drug industry analyst in Warren, N.J., says total dollar sales for this drug class have dropped even as unit volume has held steady or picked up a bit.  The reason, of course, is the heavy discounting by the generics companies.  By contrast, SmithKline, like other big companies faced with generic competition, quickly boosted the price of Dyazide, hoping to offset loss of market share with wider profit margins.  But still the company was wounded.  "If there hadn't been any generic Dyazides, I don't think SmithKline would have had to merge with Beecham" Mr. Shah says.  That merger, producing SmithKline Beecham PLC, was completed in July.  Others doubt this line of speculation, to be sure.  As a recent flurry of mergers makes clear, drug companies see all sorts of reasons to combine their operations, such as pooling their research efforts and extending their marketing reach.  "Could you say {the competition to} Dyazide toppled the company?  No," declares James Cavanaugh, formerly head of SmithKline's U.S. drug unit., now the president of HealthCare Investment Corp., an Edison, N.J., investment concern.  "Could you say it shot a five-inch shell at the water line?  Sure."  Now the events leading up to that blast are getting renewed scrutiny.  Last week, a House Energy and Commerce subcommittee said it has information suggesting that Bolar, based in Copiague, N.Y., passed off SmithKline's Dyazide as its own generic drug to satisfy bioequivalence tests, which determine whether the bioavailability of a generic drug is the same as that of the pioneer drug being copied.  Rep. John Dingell, a Michigan Democrat who heads the subcommittee, said Bolar's drug should come off the market, barring proof that Bolar didn't substitute SmithKline's product for its own during the bioequivalence tests.  Vitarine, of Springfield Gardens, N.Y., has already recalled its product.  A Bolar attorney says the FDA may have an answer for the congressman as early as this week and that Bolar will be found blameless.  Our friends at the ACLU's national office try to impress on us from time to time that the ACLU is a "decentralized" organization.  A few more cases like the following, and we may have to sign on to this explanation.  The ACLU in Providence, Rhode Island, got a tax administrator to rule that a coven of witches is entitled to the same tax-exempt treatment as any established religion.  "With this ruling," said the high priestess of Rosegate Coven, "we witches will definitely be able to come out of the closet and take our place in society."  Who would doubt it?  If the IRS doesn't drive a stake through this latest ACLU creation, expect more Americans to declare themselves operators of a "religion."  The federal government issued rules designed to police scientific fraud by researchers at universities, hospitals and other recipients of funds from the Public Health Service.  Regulations published by the Department of Health and Human Services in the Federal Register yesterday require institutions that apply for federal research grants "to establish uniform policies and procedures for investigating and reporting instances of alleged or apparent misconduct involving research."  Universities and hospitals that don't have such procedures in place by next Jan. 1 won't be eligible for Public Health Service research funds.  Most of these grants are awarded by the National Institutes of Health, which will distribute about $7 billion to outside researchers this year.  The new rules, first proposed last September, will "formalize a process that many institutions already have under way," said Suzanne Hadley of the Office of Scientific Integrity at the NIH.  "I don't believe it's going to be a qualitative change.  It may accelerate the process."  In announcing final adoption of the rules, HHS Secretary Louis Sullivan said that "misconduct in science is rare, but when it occurs, it undermines the public's faith and it can jeopardize subsequent research and even proper medical treatment."  Scientific misconduct includes fabrication, falsification and plagiarism, the rules say.  Scientific fraud has become a growing problem in medical research in recent years.  Pressures to build scientific reputations, competition for federal research money, and commercial races to develop biomedical and pharmaceutical products are among the reasons.  There have been well-publicized cases of scientific misconduct at Yale University, Harvard Medical School and other prestigious institutions.  Recently, a congressional committee has been investigating reports of scientific misconduct by David Baltimore, a Nobel laureate at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  The NIH's Ms. Hadley said her office, established earlier this year, currently is looking into about 20 cases of alleged scientific misconduct.  In deciding how to reduce capital-gains taxes, Congress is choosing between helping the hares or the tortoises of the economy.  The hares are the storybook entrepreneurs racing for the big kills.  The tortoises, of course, are the plodding, cautious, buy-and-hold crowd.  Stripped of bells, whistles and partisan political maneuvering, the basic choice lawmakers face is whether to cut the tax rate on capital gains or instead to tax only those gains exceeding inflation, an approach called "indexing."  "A rate cut benefits the hares," says Joel Slemrod, a University of Michigan economist.  "Indexing benefits the tortoises."  Democrats like House Speaker Thomas Foley figure there are more tortoises than hares.  They favor indexing.  Bush administration officials like Budget Director Richard Darman say that, for the good of the economy, the hares deserve the break.  These officials prefer lower tax rates on capital gains.  Of course, the current choice facing a Congress that appears headed for some sort of capital-gains tax reduction isn't a clean one between indexing and a lower tax rate.  With the backing of President Bush and other Republicans, Rep. Ed Jenkins (D., Ga.) would cut tax rates on capital gains -- and switch to indexing sometime in the future.  In response, House Ways and Means Chairman Dan Rostenskowski (D., Ill.) proposes to go to indexing immediately -- but offer a carrot to those venture capitalists with patience.  Rep. Jenkins would reward all investors, no matter when they made their investment; Rep. Rostenkowski would only reward new investment.  Neither plan would affect investments made by corporations.  The Jenkins plan, which has attracted support from five other Democratic members of the Ways and Means Committee, would cut the top tax bite on capital gains to 19.6% -- but only for the next 2 1/2 years.  After that, he would raise it to 28% but introduce indexing.  Capital gains, or profits from the sale of assets, currently are taxed at the same rate as ordinary income, as much as 33% for many taxpayers.  In response, Rep. Rostenkowski last week proposed to leave the rate unchanged -- but to begin indexing immediately for new investments.  He also would offer an alternative intended to appeal to the administration's wish to reward entrepreneurs: If they hold their assets for five years, they could pay tax on 75% of the sale price regardless of the actual profit; after 10 years, they could pay tax on 50% of the sales price.  This option would appeal only to investors with enormous profits, like those who sink money into start-up companies that succeed.  The business lobby, including venture capitalists, remains solidly behind Rep. Jenkins for several reasons.  The biggest one is that they want a cut in capital-gains taxes to apply to existing investments as well as new ones.  "In the venture-capital industry, we've got thousands of investments that we've made over the last 10 years," says Ted McCourtney, president of the National Venture Capital Association.  This points up another split among advocates of a capital-gains tax cut.  One group, including some key Bush administration officials, is most interested in shaping a capital-gains tax cut so it increases incentives for new investment.  They focus almost exclusively on the broad economic impact of any change.  They care only about the future.  The other group, including business lobbyists and some congressmen, talks about the future, but looks also to the past.  They're pressing for a tax break for investments already made.  Unable to find any economic logic for this position, they argue for fairness: "Why should we penalize those savers who have done the best thing for the U.S. economy?" asks the American Council for Capital Formation.  But pressing for lower capital-gains taxes on the grounds of fairness is always difficult since most of the benefits go to the rich.  Indexing long has been attractive to those who strive to make the tax system as fair and economically rational as possible.  If an investor simply matches the inflation rate, they reason, he really has no gain at all.  "If you're not making gains, why should you pay taxes on them?" says Alan Auerbach of the University of Pennsylvania.  Adds Mr. Slemrod: "It's an attempt to measure income correctly."  Some fans of the 1986 Tax Reform Act, who hold tight to the principle that all income should be taxed alike, lean toward the indexing alternative because they so strongly oppose distinguishing between income from wages and income from the sale of stock.  Although he hasn't taken a position on indexing, Sen. Bill Bradley (D., N.J.), a major force behind tax overhaul, is already distributing buttons that say: "No New Loopholes."  Now Speaker Foley and Rep. Rostenkowski have embraced indexing as the populist route to reducing capital-gains taxes.  They have realized that the benefits of indexing are shared by more people than simply cutting rates.  The most successful investors are better off with lower rates.  But on average, investors earn only a few percentage points more than inflation.  Congressional tax analysts estimate that taxpayers who earn more than $200,000 a year are better off with lower rates; the rest are better off with indexing.  Eugene Steurle, a former Treasury tax analyst, says unpublished Treasury studies of 1981 tax returns show that taxpayers in middle-income brackets benefit more from indexing than from a cut in the tax rate.  Rich people, not surprisingly, tend to be more successful investors and are more willing to make risky investments that pay off handsomely, he says.  "Equity arguments tend to favor indexing," he says.  Even some fans of indexing, though, find this a weak argument.  "There's no way any kind of capital-gains tax reduction is going to be anything but a benefit for upper-income people," says Mr. Auerbach.  "Maybe with indexing, it will be a little less so.  Not the top 1%, but the top 5% will get most of the benefit."  And a few economists warn that indexing, for all its intellectual appeal, could actually encourage inflation.  "If you accommodate inflation," argues Harvard University economist Lawrence Summers, "you eliminate the political pressures that would be brought to bear to mitigate inflation."  A more widely held objection to indexing is that it doesn't do enough to encourage and reward investment in risky, entrepreneurial ventures.  "Indexing is sort of a quarter of a loaf," says Edward Zschau, a former congressman who is now chairman of Censtor Corp., a San Jose, Calif., start-up electronics company.  "It is fairer than the current setup.  But in order to inspire patient, long-term risk capital, you have to go further."  To an investor who anticipates returns of 30% or more, a change in the tax law that allows him to escape taxes on the first four or five percentage points of profit isn't much incentive.  That's all that indexing by itself would offer.  "We want something that would also reward the true job creators and innovators, the risk-takers and sweat-equity people who are key to keeping America No. 1," Mr. Darman said last week, explaining why the administration is pressing for something more than indexing.  Some economists see all the talk about venture capitalists as little more than a screen behind which advocates of capital-gains tax cuts hide for respectability.  Venture capitalists, for all the attention they get, represent a small proportion of all investors, they argue.  Venture Economics, a Needham, Mass., firm, estimates that only 11% of the money committed to venture-capital pools last year came from individuals; most of the rest came from pension funds, college endowments and other institutions that don't pay taxes. (The numbers don't include investments entrpreneurs make in their own companies, but that's a small part of the total.) "It's a big mistake to let the venture-capitalist tail wag the whole dog," Mr. Summers says.  Besides, says John Makin, an economist at the conservative American Enterprise Institute and a fan of indexing, "If you're talking about the risk-taker and the entrepreneur who hopes to make 25% or 30% return . . . they're not really all that worried about taxes."  ---  @ Capital-Gains Taxes: Current and Proposed  @ CURRENT LAW -- Capital gains are taxed at the same rate as other income, a maximum effective rate of 33%.  @ ORIGINAL BUSH PLAN -- Cut top tax rate on capital gains to15% on assets held more than one year.  After 1993, assets must be held for two years to qualify; after 1995, three years.  Applies to securities and land, but not to other real estate, timber or collectibles.  @ JENKINS PLAN -- (now endorsed by Bush) Cut tax rate on capital gains on assets held more than a year to 19.6% for the richest taxpayers if sold before the end of 1991.  Boost the top rate to 28% after that, but only tax gains in excess of the inflation rate.  Applies to most assets except collectibles.  @ ROSTENKOWSKI PLAN -- Keep the tax rate unchanged but only tax gains in excess of inflation for assets purchased after July 31, 1989.  But for assets held more than five years, taxpayer could choose to pay tax on 75% of sale price regardless of actual gain; for assets held more than 10 years, on 50% of sale price.  Applies to corporate stock, real estate and timber, but not preferred stock, bonds, stock in foreign corporations or intangibles such as trademarks.  Americans of all political persuasions have discovered that "the family is in crisis."  Conservatives and liberals seek custody of the pro-family issue, each charging that the other's policies have caused the "breakdown of the family," which has in turn led to feminization of poverty, maltreatment of children, and the deteriorating position of minorities.  Each recycles its old pet projects as new measures to "strengthen the family."  Such a seeming convergence of analysis ought to give one pause.  Historically, Americans have become most preoccupied with personal morality and family organization when they have felt overwhelmed by harder issues of public morality and social organization.  The first family crisis was discovered in the 1820s, as wage labor undermined an older household economy and post-revolutionary politicians committed themselves to military expansion against Indians and Mexicans.  A new family crisis was proclaimed at the turn of the century, when industrialization transformed work patterns, urban segregation worsened, and the country first began to see steadily declining voter turnout.  In each case, those who suffered from the changes were accused of bringing the crisis on themselves by their "unfit" personal values or "unworthy" families.  The current family crisis follows a major economic and political restructuring going on since the 1960s: the eclipse of traditional employment centers, destruction of formerly high-paid union jobs, and the mounting dilemmas of welfare capitalism.  Now, as in the past, many people fancy that if only the family could be made to function properly, other social issues could be avoided.  Certainly, this restructuring has been accompanied by far-reaching family rearrangements and pressing new problems such as the impoverishment of children.  But the extent to which family composition causes such problems has been grossly overestimated.  Take the issue of female-headed families, which usually dominates discussion of the fact that one in five U.S. children -- almost one in two black children -- is poor.  To be sure, female-headed families are much more likely to be poor than two-parent families of the same race, both because women earn less than men and because it is increasingly difficult for one wage-earner of either sex to support a family.  But how much childhood poverty is caused by family dissolution or could be cured by reviving "traditional" family structures and values?  Surprisingly little.  University of Wisconsin researchers Christine Ross and George Slotsve estimate that the poverty rate in 1985 was only 1.3% higher than it would have been without any of the demographic changes since 1967.  The University of Michigan Panel Study of Income Dynamics, which has followed a representative sample of 5,000 families since 1968, found that only one-seventh of childhood transitions into long-term poverty were associated with family dissolution, while more than half were linked to changes in labor-market participation and remuneration.  A majority of the increase in family poverty since 1979 has occurred in families with both spouses present, with only 38% concentrated in single-parent families, according to Stephen J. Rose in his Pantheon-published reference work on the U.S. economy.  In fact, the percentage of the poor living in female-headed families has declined slightly since 1978.  Forty percent of America's poor children live in two-parent homes.  Family dissolution, moreover, is often the consequence rather than the cause of the economic reshuffling we are seeing in America.  While it is true that complex cultural changes have created a steady rise in divorce and illegitimacy during most of the 20th century (the U.S. has had the highest divorce rate in the world since 1899), people with the lowest educational attainment and greatest vulnerability to poverty have historically had the highest rates of divorce, illegitimacy and child neglect. (Sexual abuse is much more evenly distributed across class lines.) These are the people who have been the big losers since the late 1960s.  In 1963, 60% of men aged 20 to 24 earned enough to keep a family of three out of poverty; by 1984 only 42% could do so.  Since 1967 the increased demand for college graduates has been largely at the expense of high school-only graduates.  Between 1979 and 1986 the wages of people with a high school education or less declined by 17%, while their numbers grew: from 1979 to 1986 the percentage of young men with at best a high school degree rose to 54% from 50% while the group with a college degree fell to 25% from 27%.  Even families that have survived these pressures intact have avoided poverty only to the extent that they have broken with "traditional" family arrangements.  Without the work of wives, the entire bottom 60% of U.S. households would have experienced a loss of real income between 1979 and 1986.  Thus many rearrangements in "traditional" family relations are consequences of deeper structural transformations in the economy and polity.  A focus on "family breakdown" may seriously divert us from the research and programs necessary to deal with those changes.  A good example is the attempt by some to explain the deteriorating position of American minorities by their "explosion" of unwed motherhood.  The birth rates of unmarried black women have actually declined by 13% since 1970, but because married black women's childbearing rates have dropped much more sharply, by 38%, statistics show an increase in the proportion of total births out of wedlock.  Both the plunge in married childbearing and the relative increase in unwed births correlate with a long-term decline in the proportion of black men who can support a family.  The economic marginalization of black men began in the 1950s, as blacks were displaced from agriculture without being absorbed into manufacturing.  Since the 1970s, record numbers of competitors for jobs and two back-to-back recessions seem to have pushed young blacks, especially those with little education, ever further behind.  Despite the fact that young black college graduates have increased their real earnings since 1973, the average real income for young black men who head families has fallen by 50%, according to the Children's Defense Fund.  University of Chicago sociologist William Julius Wilson estimates that there are only 50 employed black men aged 20 to 24 for every 100 black women in this age group, a fact that does more to explain the high rate of female-headed households in the black community than lamentations about "immoral" subcultures or the supposed "breeding" incentives of welfare.  Black poverty cannot be explained by non-traditional family structure alone.  Black children living with two parents have a lower standard of living than white children living with only one parent.  Harvard economists David Ellwood and David Wise calculate that family type can explain "at most only two points" in the huge labor-market performance differential between young blacks and whites.  "Even if family structures and income for blacks were identical to those of whites, the overall employment rate for black teen-agers living at home would rise only from 21 to 27 percent." (The corresponding white employment rate, by contrast, is 48%.)  Indeed, "traditional" family values may be part of the problem rather than the solution.  Studies show that the men most likely to leave their families when faced with unemployment or income loss tend to subscribe most firmly to the idea of a self-reliant male breadwinner.  Families most prone to react to stress with abuse report the strongest approval of male authoritarianism and female passivity.  Similarly, "tradition" provides no answer to teen-age pregnancy, which made its sharpest 20th-century jump during the 1950s, though the problems associated with this were obscured by the falling age of marriage.  In 1959, 97 of every 1,000 girls aged 15 to 19 gave birth, compared to 52 of every 1,000 in 1983.  Fifties' teens didn't "say no"; they slipped on wedding rings.  The fact that teen-age births increasingly create single mothers today is in many ways due to the persistence of "traditional" values in an economic climate that makes early marriage less viable.  Girls who get pregnant in high school are those least likely to report any perception that women can succeed at education or rewarding work; three-fourths of high-school mothers leave school. (High-school dropouts -- not career women -- have the highest divorce rates, while one study shows battered women are eight times more likely than others to have abortions.)  A program to solve current social problems by recreating "traditional" families would involve staggeringly Draconian measures -- and it would almost certainly fail.  To establish the family wage system, in which married men supposedly support all mothers and children within self-sufficient families, would require either mandating abortion and birth control for our nation's unmarried women or equipping them with chastity belts, prohibiting divorce except among the rich, obliging unwed mothers to give up their children for adoption, and forcing prospective adoptive couples to accept the black, racially mixed, older white, and disabled children who now cannot find homes.  It would also mean prohibiting employers from replacing formerly unionized, male-dominated jobs with cheaper female, foreign or part-time labor.  Poverty derives from class, race and work relations, not family ones.  Liberals who avoid confronting this by hitching their wagons to the warm fuzzy of "family protection" are simply ceding initiative to the conservative "pro-family" lobby.  Given the unwillingness of that group to support larger reforms, one cannot help but suspect that much of the agitation for "preserving the family" camouflages an agenda for acceleration of economic and political inequality.  ---  Ms. Coontz wrote "The Social Origins of Private Life: A History of American Families" (Verso, 1988).  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ MUNICIPALS  Connecticut -- $150.7 million of general obligation bonds, 1989 Series B-1 to B-5, due 1990-1993, 1995-2001 and 2003-2007, through a Marine Midland Capital Markets Corp. group.  The bonds, rated double-A-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and double-A-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., were priced to yield overall from 5.70% in 1990 to 6.70% in 2006 and 2007.  Virgin Islands Public Finance Authority -- $138.4 million of revenue bonds (Virgin Islands General Obligation/Matching Fund Loan Note), Series 1989 A, priced at par by a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group.  There are $17,225,000 of 7.2% bonds due 2009 and $121,185,000 of 7.3% bonds due 2018.  The bonds are backed by a letter of credit from Marine Midland Bank and are rated single-A-1 by Moody's and single-A by S&P.  Port Everglades Authority, Fla. -- $117.4 million of port facilities refunding revenue bonds, Series 1989A, with current coupon bonds due 1997, 1998, 2012 and 2016 and capital appreciation bonds due 1999-2005 and 2010, priced by a Bear, Stearns & Co. group to yield from 7% in 1997 to 7.5% in 2012.  Bonds due 1997 and 1998 yield 7% and 7.10%, respectively.  There are $22.1 million of 7 1/2% term bonds due 2012, priced at par, and $53,185,000 of 5% term bonds due 2016, priced to yield 7.30%.  Capital appreciation serial bonds yield to maturity from 7.25% in 1999 to 7.40% in 2002-2005.  The term bonds yield 7.45% to maturity in 2010.  The bonds are rated triple-B by S&P.  California Health Facilities Financing Authority -- $98.4 million of hospital revenue bonds (Sutter Health), Series 1989 A, due 1996-2004, 2010 and 2013, tentatively priced by a PaineWebber Inc. group to yield from 6.50% in 1996 to about 7.14% in 2010.  Serial bonds are priced to yield to 6.95% in 2003 and 2004.  Term bonds due 2010 have a 7% coupon and were priced at 98 1/2 to yield about 7.14%.  Term bonds due 2013 have a 6 3/4% coupon and were priced at 95 3/4 to yield 7.125%.  The bonds are rated single-A-1 by Moody's.  Nevada -- $95 million of limited tax general obigation building bonds, Series 1989A, due 1991-2008, through a Prudential-Bache Capital Markets group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 6.20% in 1991 to 6.90% in 2007 and 2008.  Bonds due 1991 were all sold, according to the lead underwriter.  Also, a First Boston Corp. group is underwriting $24.3 million of Nevada's reservoir refunding bonds and Nevada Municipal Bond Bank refunding Project No. 4 bonds, offered at the same time.  The bonds are priced to yield from 5.85% in 1990 to 6.85% in 2005.  Rutgers (State University of New Jersey) -- $74,815,000 of general obligation bonds, 1989 Series A, due 1990-2002, 2005, 2009 and 2019, through Chemical Securities Inc.  The bonds, rated single-A-1 by Moody's and double-A by S&P, were priced to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to about 7.03% in 2019.  Serial bonds were priced to yield to 5.75% in 2002.  Bonds due 1990-1999 carry 6 1/2% coupons, and the remaining serial bonds were priced at par.  Term bonds due 2005, which carry a 6 7/8% coupon, aren't being formally reoffered.  Term bonds due 2009 were priced at 99 1/2 to yield about 6.95%, and term bonds due 2019 were priced at 99 5/8 to yield about 7.03%.  @ EUROBONDS  Electricite de France -- $50 million of 9 1/2% bonds due March 8, 1999, priced at 106 5/8, via JP Morgan Securities Ltd. Fungible with EDF's outstanding $500 million of 9 1/2% bonds due 1999.  Guaranteed by the Republic of France.  Hokkaido Bank (Japan) -- 200 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1993, with an indicated 0.5% coupon at par via Swiss Bank Corp. Put option Sept. 30, 1991, at indicated 107 3/4 to yield 4.07%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Sept. 7, 1989, to Sept. 20, 1993, at 5% premium over closing share price Aug. 15, when terms fixed.  CS First Boston Inc., the holding company for First Boston Corp. and its European and Asian investment banking affiliates, said it sold 13.25% of its equity to seven Japanese financial institutions and a Belgian finance company.  The New York-based company said it expects to sell an additional 2.25% stake to U.S. institutions within the next month.  Terms of the transaction weren't disclosed.  But the total value of the CS First Boston stake that was sold is almost $300 million, people familiar with the purchase said.  The sale completes most of the global restructuring of New York-based First Boston and London-based Credit Suisse First Boston into a closely held, international securities firm with an initial value of about $2 billion.  "This gives us a real solid, balanced" shareholding, said Peter T. Buchanan, president and chief executive officer of CS First Boston.  The 55-year-old Mr. Buchanan, who plans to retire from the firm Sept. 30, said CS First Boston probably will complete the restructuring before he steps down, by selling 2.25% to U.S. institutions, which he declined to identify.  "I couldn't be more pleased with the way this has turned out," he said.  The 13.25% stake is part of a 30.5% CS First Boston holding that the Middle Eastern investor Sulliman Olayan agreed to acquire temporarily when First Boston merged with Credit Suisse First Boston last December.  CS Holdings, the holding company for Zurich-based Credit Suisse, Switzerland's third-largest bank, owns 44.5% of CS First Boston.  The investment bank's management owns the other 25%.  In April, in the first step of dividing up the Olayan temporary holding, Metropolitan Life Insurance Co., New York, purchased about 10% of CS First Boston for about $200 million.  Mr. Olayan, who said last year he planned to be a permanent shareholder in the firm, has converted his temporary stake to a 5% long-term holding, First Boston officials said.  In its merger with Credit Suisse First Boston, First Boston's 15.7 million publicly held shares, and certain shares held by First Boston employees, Credit Suisse and Credit Suisse First Boston, were bought for $52.50 each, or a total of about $2 billion.  Among the Japanese investors in the latest CS First Boston transaction, Mitsui Trust & Banking Co. holds the largest amount, with a 5% stake.  Dai-Ichi Mutual Life Insurance Co. bought a 2% holding.  Five other insurers each took 1% shareholdings: Asahi Mutual Life Insurance Co., Daihyaku Mutual Life Insurance Co., Meiji Mutual Life Insurance Co., Mitsui Mutual Life Insurance Co. and Nippon Life Insurance Co.  The Belgian finance company, Sofina S.A., holds 1.25%.  To hear William Koch tell it, his brother Charles is a liar, a cheater and a racketeer.  Charles responds that William has "various psychiatric ailments" and is dead set on ruining the family business.  The siblings are squabbling over Koch Industries, the second largest closely held company in America after Cargill Inc. of Minneapolis.  Koch, pronounced "Coke," is a big oil pipeline operator, driller and refiner, a chemical maker, a coal miner and a cattle rancher.  Although it is virtually unknown outside the oil patch, Koch had net income last year of about $400 million on revenue of about $16 billion, according to people close to the Koch family, which owns almost all of it.  Charles, 53 years old, is the company's chairman, and that alone enrages William, who is 49 and doesn't work there because Charles fired him.  In the past decade, William, sometimes in concert with the eldest brother, Frederick, has sued Charles and the company four times in federal court seeking a bigger share of the $3 billion family fortune and alleging a host of management misdeeds including racketeering.  Until recently, William's lawsuits and other wrangling have been nothing but a powerful nuisance.  He and Frederick haven't won any of the court battles, and they lost -- albeit narrowly -- the proxy fight they mounted in 1980.  They both sold their stakes to Charles and another brother, David, in 1983 for a combined $800 million, leaving themselves with no say in company affairs but with plenty of money for lawyers and private investigators.  Last year, William turned over to a U.S. Senate committee evidence his private eyes had gathered suggesting that Koch Industries had been stealing oil from wells owned by American Indians.  The committee later began investigating Koch, and in May an agent of the Federal Bureau of Investigation told the Senate committee he had actually witnessed the oil theft.  Koch executives, who insist they are innocent, are awaiting the results of a Justice Department review of the investigation.  They fret about the damage that an indictment could do to their business.  Sitting near a portrait of his late father and company founder, Fred Koch, that hangs in his office, Charles says dad would be "mortified" by the blood feud that has developed.  "Why would someone in your own family try to get the U.S. government to brand you as a racketeer?" he asks.  Basically, says William, because all is fair in brotherly love and war.  "When you go into battle, the only way to do it is to assume you are going to fight to the finish."  The feud, which has drawn in the entire Koch clan, has ranged far beyond the family business.  Charles and David have sued William for allegedly breaking an agreement to yield his stake in the family homestead in return for their share of father Fred's gold coin collection.  That suit is still pending.  Concerning a lawsuit they filed last year over the operation of the family's nonprofit foundation, William and Frederick, through attorneys, subpoenaed their 80-year-old mother Mary to appear in court as a defendant only weeks after her doctor said she had suffered a slight stroke.  The lawyers insisted that she was just fine.  "She was able to play tennis with her stroke," grumbles William's attorney, Joseph R. Ryan of Boston.  Mary "just cried like a baby" over the incident, says businessman and family friend George Ablah.  Mary, who declined to be interviewed for this story, was later spared a court appearance by the judge.  All this feuding has torn apart what was never a close-knit but was at least a cordial family relationship.  "Christmas used to be a time when we would all get together," says David, a Koch Industries executive vice president.  "Now it's just Momma, Charles and myself."  Funny thing is, patriarch Fred Koch realized many years ago that his young boys might have trouble sharing the empire he was building.  In 1936, the refinery builder wrote his sons a letter: "When you are 21, you will receive what seems now to be a large sum of money.  It will be yours to do with what you will.  It may be either a blessing or a curse."  Fred Koch was stubborn and fiercely competitive.  The son of a frontier newspaperman, he developed a new method of refining crude oil in the 1920s and then spent the next 23 years battling the big oil companies that were determined to shut him down.  Fred's larger competitors were making good money at the time selling their own refining process to a slew of smaller, independent oil companies.  While he was being sued repeatedly by Big Oil in the U.S., he built refineries abroad, the only place he could find clients.  Among them were the Soviet Union.  By the early 1950s, Fred Koch had beaten back some 40 lawsuits, but the prolonged battle had forged him into a hard-edged, intensely private man, people who knew him say.  He shunned interviews and refused to attach his name to most of the corporate entities he controlled.  His experiences working in the Soviet Union made him an ardent anti-Communist, and he was a co-founder of the ultra-conservative John Birch Society.  Fred's four boys grew up around the family business, then known as Rock Island Oil & Refining Co.  They spent summers cutting brush and digging ditches at company pipelines, but working together didn't make them close.  Charles stood out from the start as the most aggressive of the siblings.  William remembers Charles as the bully standing at the top of the family's Kansas storm cellar pushing his siblings down a mound of dirt in games of "King of the Hill."  Says William, "I almost wish I would have started a fight with him 30 years ago."  The eldest son, Frederick, was an artistic and sensitive child who didn't take to the physical labor demanded by father, family members say.  Frederick, now 55 years old, refused to be interviewed for this article.  William was a gawky boy who says he wanted to be like the rambunctious Charles but never quite made it.  Even his successes were overshadowed within the family.  While William made the varsity basketball team at Massachusetts Institute of Technology, twin brother David became captain of the same squad and set a still-standing MIT record by scoring 41 points in one home game.  Fred Koch, plagued by heart troubles throughout the 1960s, died in 1967 and was succeeded by Charles, who had earned an engineering degree at MIT.  Charles Koch moved quickly to put his own stamp on the profitable but stodgy firm, which earned $8 million on revenue of $250 million in 1967.  He renamed the company Koch Industries, built a gleaming new headquarters on the outskirts of Wichita, acquired control of a refinery and of an oil-trading company, moved the company into new businesses such as chemicals and lured young talent away from major oil companies with hefty raises and the promise of an entrepreneurial environment.  In the tradition of his father, he used to call only one or two board meetings a year.  He watched spending so closely that executives joked that he knew how many vegetables were sold in the company cafeteria, and he logged so many hours at the office that he proposed to his wife over the telephone.  Charles also grew somewhat reclusive, carrying on his father's suspicion of outsiders and of publicity; he even replaced the split-rail fence Fred had built around the family compound in Wichita with a six-foot-high brick wall.  He shared his father's taste for fringe politics, pouring $5 million into causes espoused by the generally anti-government Libertarian Party.  He has since split with Libertarian Party regulars, who named his party faction "The Kochtopus."  Occasionally under Charles, Koch's aggressive nature has gotten a bit out of hand.  In 1972, Koch lost $4.8 million in a civil fraud suit in federal court in Wichita that involved Koch's purchase of an oil-trading unit.  Two years later, the Federal Energy Administration ordered Koch to refund $10 million in fuel overcharges.  In 1980, the company and three of its nonfamily executives pleaded guilty in federal court in Denver to charges of illegally obtaining oil and gas leases on federal lands.  And that same year, the Carter Administration inflation fighters blasted Koch for refusing to voluntarily supply the government with pricing information.  William and David Koch joined the company in the early 1970s as executives.  Like Charles, they sat on the seven-member board of directors, and each sibling owned 21% of the company.  Frederick was written out of his father's will when he moved East to study the arts, but he owned 14% of the company through his share of a family trust; he had a representative on the board.  Also represented on the board were the families of two men who were close to Fred Koch: his cousin, L.B. Simmons, and his early partner, J. Howard Marshall II.  The two families together owned about 22% of Koch Industries.  William received regular promotions and pay raises at Koch Industries.  By 1979, people familiar with the company say, William was earning more than $1 million a year in salary and bonus as vice president for corporate development.  David was also rising up the company ladder and says now he was always happy with brother Charles's leadership.  But William, a chemical engineer, felt he deserved more power.  He owned 21% of the company, after all, but Charles kept him on a $10,000 expense-account limit and forced him to report to nonfamily executives.  William's pet projects, such as a cholesterol-fighting drug known as "the onion pill," got lukewarm support at best from Charles.  For William, the last straw came in 1979, when he learned that Charles had asked a Koch Industries attorney to draft a plan dealing with how William's stake in the company would be disposed of in the event of his death.  In a burst of memo writing, William accused Charles of hoarding power, withholding information from shareholders and making it hard for them to sell any part of their stake.  Teaming with eldest brother Frederick, who had become a well-known New York arts patron, William nearly toppled Charles in a 1980 proxy fight, but Charles was saved by the support of brother David and other shareholders.  He then fired William and consolidated his power by handing out shares of stock to loyal company executives.  Charles also returned unopened the Christmas presents William sent to Charles's children that year.  Christmas for the Koch's hasn't been the same since.  William launched his first legal assault in 1982, alleging in federal court in Wichita that Charles and David had used fraud to defeat his proxy fight by hiding from shareholders the extent to which they were running the company for their own benefit: allegedly paying themselves extravagant salaries and bonuses and giving company funds to Libertarian Party causes.  In response, Charles and David filed a $167 million libel suit against William.  Aware that Koch Industries had paid for William's visits to a psychiatrist in the 1970s, the brothers charged in their suit that William was mentally unstable. (William says he is in fine mental health, adding, "I had gone to a shrink a few times a week for about three years."  Charles "thinks that qualifies me as being insane.")  The suits were dropped in 1983 when Charles and David borrowed more than $1 billion from banks to buy out William, Frederick, and some other dissident shareholders.  William took his $470 million and spent three months hiking in Switzerland and racing sailboats in the U.S.  (Charles and David now together own 80% of Koch; the Marshalls own 16% and Koch executives the other 4%.)  In 1985, William sued again, charging in federal court in Wichita that Charles had shortchanged him on the sale of his stake by, among other things, hiding the company's ownership of certain properties.  When he lost this suit, William revamped it with some new charges and filed it in Kansas City, Kan.  There, he accused his two brothers of a pattern of racketeering and sought $3 billion in damages.  In May of last year, that court dealt William another loss.  This time, Federal Judge Dale E. Saffels rebuked William for "running to a different city within the district and filing a new case" every time he loses elsewhere.  William appealed the decision to the 10th Circuit in Denver, where the case is still pending.  William wasn't through.  He hired a raft of private detectives to investigate various rumors he had heard about Koch Industries' operations.  The private eyes interviewed dozens of former Koch employees about such things as the way it measures oil that it picks up from producers who sell to Koch.  Armed with the investigators' evidence, William then revived his 1985 lawsuit filed in Wichita to add the charge that Koch systematically stole oil from producers.  William also shared this information with the U.S. Senate Select Committee on Indian Affairs.  Last October, investigators from the committee appeared at Koch Industries headquarters to depose 12 top executives, including Charles.  Senate committee staffers say William in no way influenced their decision to begin investigating Koch Industries, but that they were aware of the information William developed as part of his legal campaign against the company.  At a Senate hearing in May, FBI agent Richard Elroy, on assignment for the committee, testified that, while hiding in ditches and among some cattle, he observed Koch employees mismeasuring oil at six of eight tanks owned by American Indians in Oklahoma.  "They were stealing oil," he testified.  Other witnesses told the committee that Koch made at least $7 million from the allegedly systematic oil-skimming scheme.  People familiar with the investigation say evidence is now being reviewed by the U.S. attorney's office in Oklahoma City.  The acting U.S. attorney there, Robert Mydans, declines to comment.  The company has strenuously denied any wrongdoing.  Once-publicity-shy Koch produced for customers and the media a 57-page response to the Senate hearing and a videotape of company executives rebutting the allegations.  Koch officials note that the oil-purchasing and refining operation that is under scrutiny produced only a tiny portion of its profits, that its dealings with the Indians actually lost money for Koch, and that Koch hasn't lost any significant business since the allegations surfaced.  In June, a federal judge in Wichita dismissed William's latest racketeering charges against Charles and David, which included William's allegations about oil theft.  The judge's ruling allows William, however, to continue to pursue allegations that Charles and David gypped him in the 1983 buy-out, since William's latest suit includes what he claims is new evidence that certain company assets were hidden and others undervalued.  And even if that court effort ends in failure, William is unlikely to yield.  Says Charles, "I fully expect {the feud} to continue as long as he has breath or money."  Darn right, says William, who is now running his own energy company in Boston.  "I don't give up."  Hanson Industries, the U.S. arm of Hanson PLC, said it plans to spend about $67.5 million to expand its titanium dioxide operations in Ashtabula, Ohio, more than doubling current capacity.  The operation is part of Hanson's SCM Chemicals unit, which expects that construction will be completed and the startup will take place by early 1991.  Titanium dioxide is used in making coatings, plastics and papers.  Hanson also has interests in tools, fitness products, batteries, cooking ware, tobacco and building products.  Sure, ad agency Chiat/Day is known in the ad business as a creative hot shop.  But for Robert Wolf, who heads up the home office here, that just isn't enough.  "It's a double-edged sword," Mr. Wolf gripes.  "The perception is if you're that good {creatively}, you must not be good at other things, like marketing or research.  The problem is perception, not reality."  But Chiat/Day, a master at creating images for clients including Nynex yellow pages and Reebok, is working just as hard to change perceptions about itself.  It intends to prove that it is a national -- indeed, an international -- advertising power, a full-service ad agency that offers more than just a bunch of flaky California dudes with long hair and surfboards (although it has its share of them, too).  The agency recently completed its merger with Australia-based Mojo, boosting its billings to close to $1 billion and allowing it to lay claim to offices in Sydney, London, Singapore and elsewhere.  Mr. Wolf says an alliance with a European network is next and Chiat/Day will probably make a European deal "in the next year to 18 months."  Meanwhile, the agency is pouring at least $20 million into new showcase headquarters just across the street from its funky warehouse quarters in Venice Beach, barely a block off the Pacific.  In an ad last week touting the Mojo merger, Chiat/Day -- which on Aug. 15 will be rechristened Chiat/Day/Mojo -- focused not just on its high-profile creative work, but on its "international resources and capabilities."  It reeled off awards it's won for advertising effectiveness and added, "Not bad for one of those, you know, 'creative' agencies."  Chiat/Day's goal, to hear its top creative director, Lee Clow, tell it, is to become a major player, one taken seriously by major corporations, while preserving its "open corporate culture."  The warehouse cum-office here, designed by architect Frank Gehry, is dotted with free-standing rooms shaped like fish and pyramids, with groovy names like "Three Mile Island" and "Battleship Galactica."  There are no walls, no doors, no corner offices.  The place is as self-consciously trendy as they come, in a way endemic only to native Californians and to transplanted New Yorkers with converts' zeal -- both of which are plentiful here.  "Nobody gets anybody coffee," says Mr. Clow, 46, who, with his short-shorts, sandals and graying beard stands out even in this mecca of studied-casual chic.  "The receptionist is as important as a creative director.  Nothing is subservient."  Mr. Clow lives just a few blocks away and keeps a surfboard in the office.  Still, Chiat/Day is having its share of growing pains as it strains to grow bigger and international.  Mojo didn't have an office in Los Angeles, but its San Francisco operation could hardly have been more different from Chiat/Day's San Francisco office.  When those two offices were merged, about half of Mojo San Francisco's 80 staffers and a third of its billings walked out the door.  Among the clients who walked: the $13 million Northern California Toyota Dealers, which posed a conflict with Chiat/Day's largest account, Nissan.  And clients weren't the only cause of conflicts.  While Mojo in Australia is very similar to Chiat/Day in its freewheeling style, Mojo in San Francisco -- formerly an independent agency -- was a conservative place.  "It was old, it was dirty, it was dark . . . they had doors, and you know we don't like doors," says Fred Goldberg, who heads Chiat/Day's pristine, brightly lit San Francisco office.  Especially problematic, Mr. Goldberg says, were a number of Mojo account executives, many of whom ultimately left on their own and some of whom Chiat/Day fired.  "There were some old-line golfers, and we don't give good golf here," he says.  "Some of the people we never would have hired in a million years -- they were from a different culture."  But Mr. Goldberg adds that many of the Mojo creative people were strong, and that the two agencies have begun to blend.  Chiat/Day, which already offers a gym and aerobics classes on its premises, even adapted a Mojo custom of offering staffers a breakfast buffet each morning and beer each night.  Chiat/Day executives insist, meanwhile, that their set-up will be better for clients than that of the bigger, megamerged ad agencies because Chiat/Day's organization is more intimate.  Chiat/Day's chairman and founder, Jay Chiat, now works out of the New York office but stays in close contact with the West Coast.  At Chiat/Day's Los Angeles-based design unit, Bright & Associates, meanwhile, president Keith Bright says his firm has already gotten projects and new business leads from the merger.  His firm is handling a project for Qantas Airways and has done some packaging work for Philip Morris, both Mojo clients.  "And we're just touching it, we aren't deep into it yet," Mr. Bright says.  "We're linking ourselves up and telling each other what we're doing."  It remains to be seen whether Chiat/Day's quest to become an international presence ultimately succeeds, and whether it can maintain good relationships with clients as it grows.  The agency already has a somewhat tumultuous history of client relations.  It created award-winning work for Nike and Apple, both of which then dropped the agency, and more recently came under fire for its Reebok "U.B.U" commercials; it is currently working on a new Reebok approach.  It also has drawn the ire of some ad executives with its Nissan "Built for the Human Race" campaign, and critics have questioned whether the $250 million account was too big for Chiat/Day to handle.  Back in Venice Beach, though, Mr. Wolf -- an Easterner who persists in wearing his conservative dark suits and ties -- says Chiat/Day in fact is looking for other large accounts.  "Our second-largest account is probably about $50 million.  We have a gap in the $75 million level," Mr. Wolf says.  He says the agency is "proactively going after" several accounts of that size in the fast food, airline and telecommunications areas.  Chiat/Day's creative guru Mr. Clow, seated in a conference room beneath a huge photograph of himself sitting on a floor with a dog, doesn't see any problems with growing from creative boutique to international monolith.  He muses that his "idol" is the late Walt Disney, who "stayed true to his ideals, and yet succeeded by any capitalist yardstick."  He adds, "We don't want to be just, 'they were a terrific creative agency.' We want to be the best agency that was."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   EARNINGS: WPP Group reported net for the six months ended June 30 rose 48% to $23 million, or $1.125 cents per American depositary receipt, from $15.4 million, or 81.2 cents, in the year-earlier period.  Each ADR represents two ordinary shares.  HISPANIC TRACKING: Telemundo Group and Univision Holdings, as expected, signed a contract with A.C. Nielsen for the development of a national Hispanic TV rating service using people meters.  NEW ACCOUNTS: Crystal Brands Jewelry Group, New York, awarded its Monet, Trifari and Marvella lines to Margeotes Fertitta & Weiss, New York.  The previous agency was Partners & Shevack, New York. . . .  Toy Soldiers Inc., Minneapolis, named Saatchi & Saatchi's Campbell-Mithun-Esty unit, Minneapolis, agency of record.  The newly formed toy maker, staffed by former top executives of Mattel, Tonka & Hasbro, will unveil its first products this fall.  MONITORING ADS: Arbitron said it will begin monitoring TV commercials with a system that allows advertisers to ascertain when their ads -- and those of their competitors -- are aired.  The service, called MediaWatch, will collect data from 75 markets and will compete with a similar service from A.C. Nielsen, Monitor-Plus, which tracks commercials in 23 markets.  Highland Superstores Inc. said fiscal second-quarter results improved substantially from the first quarter, when it had an $8.5 million loss.  The company didn't elaborate further.  It had net income of $1.7 million, or nine cents a share, in the year-earlier quarter.  Highland said July sales were $65.7 million, down 11% from $73.6 million a year earlier.  The company said sales for the second quarter ended July 31 were $198.5 million, down 5% from $208 million a year earlier.  In June, Highland said it was trimming its work force and also reducing the number of new store openings in 1989.  A seat on the Chicago Board of Trade was sold for $340,000, up $5,000 from the previous sale last Wednesday.  Seats are quoted at $340,000, bid, and $360,000, asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange, a commodity-trading market, is $550,000, set in August 1987.  With closing arguments completed in the first-ever racketeering trial of securities-firm officials, defense lawyers repaired to a downtown bar to celebrate the end of an arduous trial.  They appeared confident that they had swayed the jury with their sophisticated defense against charges of illegal trading by officials of the investment firm of Princeton/Newport L.P. Following the five-week trial, they expected complete exoneration for their clients.  But they couldn't have been more mistaken.  Last Monday, after barely two days of deliberation, the jurors returned with convictions on 63 of 64 counts, including racketeering charges.  Interviews since with six of the 12 jurors disclose the jury never bought the defense's case.  Crucial to their verdict, jurors say, were tape-recordings that appeared to catch the defendants in the act of arranging unlawful trades.  What seemed to the defense team to be a complex case involving fine-line interpretations of federal tax and racketeering laws was a cut-and-dried matter to the jury.  "The tapes were devastating," says juror Michelle Rodriguez.  "They showed that the trades were prearranged, which under the law made them illegal."  The jurors' decision appears to be bad news for other targets of the government's continuing investigation of fraudulent trading.  The speed with which the jury reached the guilty verdicts feeds the worst nightmares of defense lawyers: that wealthy Wall Street professionals are unlikely to win much sympathy with a typical jury.  Further, the convictions could induce one or more of the defendants to cooperate with the government in related future cases in exchange for lenient treatment.  Attorneys for the government's most prominent target, former Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. junk-bond chief Michael Milken, are said to have called the verdict "a fluke."  They are said to believe the jury didn't understand the judge's instructions and never deliberated on the issues.  People close to Mr. Milken said the verdict hasn't weakened his resolve to fight the racketeering charges against him.  Some of the charges against him involve trading with Princeton/Newport, but apparently none of the conversations allegedly at issue in his case were tape-recorded.  Five Princeton/Newport officials and a former Drexel trader were convicted in the case last week.  The jury found that between 1984 and 1986 Princeton/Newport entered into 57 securities trades under which the firm would sell stock to realize paper losses for tax purposes and then repurchase the shares at a prearranged price and date.  The government had said the trades were specifically designed to cheat the government out of taxes, in a practice that has become known on Wall Street as "parking."  The defendants, who continue to assert their innocence, are expected to appeal.  Jack Arseneault, a Newark, N.J., attorney, says he and other defense lawyers in the case knew at the outset of the trial that cases involving tapes are among the hardest to win.  "We thought this case was a calculated gamble, but we never thought it was a suicide walk," he says.  The tapes, made by the investment firm as part of its normal business procedures, were seized from Princeton/Newport's offices in a December 1987 raid.  They proved Mr. Arseneault's gamble wrong.  On one tape, Paul A. Berkman, a Princeton/Newport general partner, told a Merrill Lynch & Co. trader: "The easiest thing to do is I sell you things today and then, over the next couple of days, I buy them back from you in varying amounts, just to make it all look kosher.  That way, nothing really changes hands."  A team of defense lawyers led by Theodore Wells, of the Roseland, N.J., firm of Lowenstein, Sandler, Kohl, Fisher & Boylan, offered detailed explanations of why the trades weren't as bad as they sounded.  Among other things, James Sutton Regan, the managing general partner of Princeton/Newport and the lead defendant in the case, testified that there had been no prearranged trading -- only a "hope and an expectation and an understanding" that Princeton/Newport would get its parked positions back.  Prearranged trading, he admitted, would have been illegal.  While many jurors liked Mr. Regan's demeanor on the witness stand, they didn't believe him.  Deliberations began late Thursday, July 27.  According to jurors, the group spent the afternoon sharing their feelings about the case.  At least seven quickly concluded that all of the defendants were guilty.  But some of the rest argued that perhaps certain defendants, particularly Steven B. Smotrich, Princeton/Newport's comptroller, were innocent because they were just following Mr. Regan's orders.  On Friday, the jurors reviewed the judge's charge to them and began deliberating on the first count of the indictment, which alleged conspiracy.  By early afternoon, 11 of the 12 jurors agreed that each of the defendants had conspired to defraud the government out of taxes, according to the six jurors interviewed.  But one juror, Joseph Pastina, was concerned about the consequences of a conviction under the potent Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, or RICO, which carries prison terms of as long as 20 years on each count.  "These were family men and it troubled me that they would be put in prison," said Mr. Pastina, a retired delicatessen manager.  "I didn't want to be a juror to begin with because I didn't want to be put in the position of deciding people's fate."  Mr. Pastina held out not because he had a reasonable doubt about the defendants' guilt, he said, but because he feared the consequences of his decision.  First, Mr. Pastina tried to convince his peers that the case should end in a hung jury.  Then, he refused to participate in deliberations.  Finally, at day's end, he relented.  After a weekend off, jurors returned on Monday to vote on the remaining counts.  Later that day, they returned their verdict.  Afterward, the jurors were particularly adamant in their view that the defense had tried to confuse the issues in the case.  "The lawyers were trying to convince us that the words on the tapes didn't mean what they meant," says Faith Aaron, a recent college graduate and a juror.  "If they thought these trades were definitely legal and not prearranged, they would have been able to simplify their explanation."  Morgen & Oswood Construction Co. was issued a $15.5 million contract from the Army Corps of Engineers to build a fish hatchery.  Tuesday, August 8, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.725% 28 to 44 days; 8.50% 45 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.75% 30 days; 8.60% 60 days; 8.50% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.14% one month; 8.09% two months; 8.04% three months; 7.97% six months; 7.89% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.75% one month; 8.55% three months; 8.45% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.65% 30 days; 8.50% 60 days; 8.32% 90 days; 8.28% 120 days; 8.15% 150 days; 8.07% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% one month; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% two months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% three months; 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% four months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% five months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 7/8% one month; 8 3/4% three months; 8 5/8% six months; 8 9/ 16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 7, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.70% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.95%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.90%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.85%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.53%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  The trickle of high-level executives from American Express Co. has hardly grown into a flood, but it's continuing at a pace that is catching the attention of people who watch the company.  Yesterday, Lawrence R. Ricciardi, executive vice president and general counsel of the Travel Related Services division, resigned to become executive vice president and general counsel at RJR Nabisco Inc.  The resignation of Mr. Ricciardi, 48 years old, is the third major executive loss at American Express in the past six months.  Yesterday, analysts voiced some concern about the management drain but said the company should be able to weather the losses.  In March, American Express President Louis V. Gerstner Jr. resigned to become RJR's chairman and chief executive officer.  Earlier this month, Harry L. Freeman, executive vice president of corporate affairs and communications, said he would retire as a result of the company's effort to discredit international banker Edmond Safra.  "American Express isn't crippled, but they have lost some very experienced people," said John Keefe, an analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "You have a big staff with a lot of bench talent, but it isn't beneficial to lose all these guys at once."  "Companies the size of American Express always have some turnover," said Brenda McCoy of PaineWebber Inc. "Sometimes turnover reflects real problems, but this doesn't appear to be the case."  Ms. McCoy noted that Mr. Freeman's departure wasn't related to the other two.  Yesterday, American Express shares closed at $37.50 a share, down 75 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  American Express named Andrew B. Somers Jr., 48, to succeed Mr. Ricciardi at Travel Related Services.  The unit is the company's largest, despite the separation earlier this year of Information Services Co., an information processing and communications business.  For fiscal 1988, Travel Related Services generated $7.4 billion against $6 billion in 1987.  An American Express spokesman discounted the significance of the recent departures.  "We have more than 100 senior executives at the company," the spokesman said.  "A turnover rate of 2% or 3% a year isn't very great."  Mr. Ricciardi is the third American Express executive to join Mr. Gerstner.  The others are David Kalis, formerly senior vice president of world-wide communications for American Express's Travel Related Services division, named to the same post with RJR, and Roger Semerad, formerly senior vice president for policy development of American Express, named RJR's senior vice president in charge of public-policy issues and chairman of its charitable foundation.  According to people close to the situation, Mr. Gerstner has promised not to raid American Express to grab key employees.  Mr. Ricciardi, the most senior executive hired by Mr. Gerstner, made the initial approach to Mr. Gerstner, an American Express executive said.  Mr. Ricciardi couldn't be reached for comment.  As general counsel, Mr. Ricciardi will have responsibility for RJR's tobacco litigation, always nettlesome to a cigarette maker.  RJR has never lost a tobacco-liability suit, but the cases still pose a risk to it and other cigarette makers.  In April, for example, the Minnesota Supreme Court ruled that RJR's cigarette warning labels don't provide blanket immunity from suits alleging defective design, misrepresentation, or breach of warranty.  A trial in that case is now pending.  In addition to the losses of Messrs.  Gerstner, Freeman and Ricciardi, American Express also suffered a setback in April when Aldo Papone, then the highly regarded president and chief executive of Travel Related Services, reduced his workweek because of a heart condition.  As a direct result of Mr. Papone's decision, American Express gave three divisional presidents the title of chief executive and announced that they would each report directly to American Express Chairman James Robinson III. Mr. Papone was named chairman of the newly created Office of the Presidents.  The promotions went to Edwin M. Cooperman, 45, president and chief executive of Travel Related Services North America; Jonathan S. Linen, 45, president and chief executive of Direct Marketing & Travelers Cheques; and G. Richard Thoman, 45, president and chief executive of American Express International.  The moves were seen as a sign that they were the top candidates competing in-house to succeed Mr. Gerstner.  The following press release was faxed out Aug. 2 by the Washington, D.C., office of the FMLN, the Marxist coalition of guerrilla groups seeking the overthrow of El Salvador's democratic government.  A related editorial appears today {See: "REVIEW & OUTLOOK (Editorial): Down the Drain" -- WSJ Aug. 9, 1989}:  In early morning daylight hours today, the capital city of San Salvador continues to be the scene of a major offensive of the urban forces of the Farabundo Marti National Liberation Front (FMLN) beginning yesterday afternoon with coordinated attacks throughought {sic} greater metropolitan San Salvador.  The urban operation is part of a national military maneuver which now includes actions in 9 of the 14 provinces of the country.  The General Command of the FMLN announced the offensive, designated "Everyone Against the Fascist Government" in its August 1 communique indicating that it is the response of the FMLN to the government Army's counterinsurgency "PLAN RED".  The Army plan is aimed at terrorizing the Church, universities, opposition political parties and humanitarian organizations as well as the trade union movement with search and seizure operations, torture and assasinations {sic}.  The FMLN offensive is also a response to the ARENA party's economic package which implements prohibitive price increases in transportation, food and other basic survival items for the population ingeneral.  The evaluation of the advance indicated in the major concentration of FMLN urban forces and in the continuing national offensive, according to the August 1 communique, is that it is "a qualitative leap in the coordination of our urban forces in simultaneous attacks."  The General Command's August 2 communique qualifies the offensive as "prolonged daylight combat increasing in territory and duration."  The current FMLN offensive contrasts with recent news reports evaluating the "renewed capabilities" of the Salvadoran Armed Forces.  Skittish investors nudged stock prices slightly higher, but bond prices and the dollar slipped.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 4.18 points to close at 2699.17, a post-crash high.  The blue-chip indicator passed the 2700 mark several times during the day as investors bent on taking profits dueled with traders and money managers hoping for a continuation of Monday's 41-point rally.  Bond investors and currency traders retreated to the sidelines to await clearer indications of where the economy is headed.  Bond prices were off slightly, and the dollar was modestly lower.  Few analysts doubt that the Dow Jones Industrial Average will break through its record high of 2722.42 in the next several days, fueled by a combination of factors.  One is the continuing shift in investment strategies away from defensive stocks toward cyclical issues that would benefit from a gently expanding economy.  Also helping are the excitement of takeovers and the influence of program trading.  "Despite the fact that some fundamentalists might argue that stock prices are overvalued, the dynamics of the market indicate that not only will we equal 2722, but that we'll go past it," said Hugh Johnson, chief investment officer at First Albany Corp.  Meanwhile, bond investors are trying to gauge the market's appetite for the $29.5 billion of three-year, 10-year and 30-year notes and bonds the Treasury is auctioning this week.  The first phase of the Treasury's August refinancing operations, the sale of $10 billion of three-year notes, had a lukewarm reception.  But traders said that Japanese investors, often the key to the relative success of refunding operations, tend to prefer long-term issues.  Both bond and currency traders are awaiting the release today of the Federal Reserve's Beige Book, a summary of economic conditions around the nation.  Currency traders said the dollar's slump wasn't surprising in light of expectations that the Fed won't ease soon.  But they said the currency could gain a little if foreign investors are active bidders today and tomorrow at the Treasury auctions.  In major market activity:  Stock prices inched higher in heavy trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 200.3 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners, 834 to 688.  Bond prices were off slightly.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue posted a slight drop.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.09%.  The dollar fell.  In late New York trading the currency was quoted at 1.8925 marks and 138.75 yen, compared with 1.9162 marks and 140.05 yen Monday.  Soybean-futures prices sank amid projections that the U.S. crop will increase about 27% from last year's drought-stricken harvest.  Many market analysts released crop estimates yesterday because the federal government is slated tomorrow to release its first official projection of the corn and soybean harvests.  Earlier this year, many analysts were concerned about the prospects for the 1989 harvests because the Midwest drought exhausted the subsoil moisture upon which the crops depend during dry spells.  However, timely rains this summer apparently have persuaded analysts to project nearly average yields for corn and soybeans.  Based on Aug. 1 conditions, most analysts expect a fall soybean harvest of 1.95 billion bushels compared with the 1988 harvest of 1.54 billion bushels.  The consensus is for a 1989 corn crop of 7.53 billion bushels, about 53% higher than the 4.92 billion bushels harvested last year after the drought.  In trading yesterday at the Chicago Board of Trade, the price of the soybean contract for November delivery fell to a life-of-contract low before rebounding slightly to settle at $5.64 a bushel, down 16.5 cents a bushel.  Conrad Leslie, a closely watched crop analyst here, said he is projecting that U.S. farmers will harvest 7.72 billion bushels of corn and 1.98 billion bushels of soybeans.  Mr. Leslie's projection is based on a monthly survey of elevator managers and grain handlers, among others.  Some analysts are more conservative, in part because they suspect that prolonged spring rains prevented some farmers in the eastern Corn Belt states of Ohio and Indiana from planting corn in time for a full growing season.  Likewise, rain in states such as Arkansas and Mississippi might have trimmed the planting of soybeans.  The Agriculture Department is expected to release a special survey of crop conditions in these states tomorrow.  Although tomorrow's crop estimate by the Agriculture Department will be the first based on government field surveys, some analysts have extrapolated from previous reports that government economists have been expecting a fall harvest of 7.45 billion bushels of corn and 1.95 billion bushels of soybeans.  Despite any rebound in the corn crop, analysts aren't expecting the re-emergence of the type of burdensome stockpiles that plagued U.S. agriculture earlier this decade.  Before the corn harvest begins in earnest in September, U.S. stockpiles are expected to have fallen to about 1.83 billion bushels, less than half the level of September 1988.  Based on estimates for strong demand for U.S. corn by the Soviet Union, among other things, analysts don't expect U.S. stockpiles to grow enough to depress corn prices from current levels.  About two years ago, the U.S. stockpile of corn had swollen to about 60% of annual production.  In other U.S. commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Petroleum futures rallied in what some traders called a technical correction to recent price declines.  The futures price of West Texas Intermediate crude for September delivery rose 21 cents to settle at $18.12 a barrel.  October and November crudes were up 21 cents and 13 cents, respectively, on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  There was little market-affecting news except for comments by Secretary-General Subroto of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  In a speech in Tulsa, Okla., Mr. Subroto reiterated an earlier prediction that demand for OPEC's oil could reach 22 million barrels a day in the fourth quarter.  He also said he expects OPEC's target price of $18 a barrel to be maintained in the fourth quarter.  Still, oil trading was thin.  In the U.S. futures market, "people were waiting on the APIs," said one trader -- a reference to the closely watched weekly report on U.S. oil statistics released every Tuesday by the American Petroleum Institute.  The report, issued after futures trading had ended for the day, showed that U.S. crude oil inventories, which had been expected to decline in the week ended last Friday, increased instead by 3.4 million barrels.  There was also a modest gain in U.S. gasoline inventories and a more substantial increase -- nearly 2.5 million barrels -- in distillate fuel stocks.  SUGAR: Futures prices ended lower after being unable to sustain an early rally.  The October delivery settled at 13.81 cents a pound, for a loss of 0.13 cent.  At one point, October traded as high as 14.10 cents.  According to one analyst, the progress of the European beet crop, as indicated by the first tests in Sweden and West Germany, which show the beets to be of good size and with a high sugar content, might have influenced some selling.  Another analyst observed that significant buying of physical sugar has been absent in the world market.  Traders who had bought futures contracts in anticipation that prices would rise on news of purchases of physical sugar may have become tired of waiting and are selling their holdings, he said.  COTTON: Futures prices recovered from Monday's sharp declines with advances approaching the daily limit of two cents a pound.  The December contract rose 1.90 cents a pound to 75.86 cents.  Ernest Simon, cotton specialist for Prudential-Bache Securities, New York, pointed out that the fluctuations were all part of a consolidation that is taking place.  "The fundamentals haven't changed," he said.  "We still are facing smaller crops world-wide, consumption is up, and there will be a drawdown of stocks."  Another analyst said that the market had no real reason to fall or rise so sharply, but that it was oversold Monday and then overbought yesterday.  Some contracts were bought by dealers, thought to be hedging sales of physical cotton to Japan, he said.  While out of the limelight during the latest hostage crisis, Syria provides the hostage-takers a vital refuge in Lebanon's Bekaa Valley, where they are protected from U.S. retaliation by Soviet-supplied and Syrian-operated advanced anti-aircraft missiles.  Because of his military might and his history of obstinate resistance to peace, Syria's President Hafez Assad is thought by many in the West to be immune to influence.  In fact, the West today can do much to curtail the flow of funds on which Syria depends.  The numbers on Syria's external dependence are stunning.  From 1977 through 1988, Syria spent about $77 billion on imports, only $35 billion of which was financed by exports and workers' remittances.  The remaining $42 billion came from grants and loans, of which about $23 billion was supplied by the Soviets, $3 billion by the Iranians, $12 billion by the Saudis, Kuwaitis and other Gulf Arabs, and $4 billion by the West.  The $42 billion in aid was more than the $39 billion Syria spent on the military in 1977-88.  The basic cause of Syria's poverty is the mistrust between the ruling Baath Party, dominated by Alawites, a disdained Moslem sect, and the businessmen who belong to the Sunni Moslem majority.  As a result, Syria's strong entrepreneurial tradition and vibrant business community were squashed when the Baath Party took over in 1963.  When he first assumed power in 1970, Mr. Assad was less doctrinaire than his fellow Baathists.  He instituted a policy of "infiraj" (relaxation), which encouraged entrepreneurs.  The result was growth of 10% per year between 1970 and 1977.  But Mr. Assad's unwillingness to share power and his foreign adventures stirred opposition from the Sunni majority; this escalated in 1981-82 into armed rebellion, which Mr. Assad put down with extreme cruelty.  Since the mid-1970s, the government has reverted to type and poured national resources into inefficient public enterprises while placing restrictions on the private sector.  Inappropriate investments have absorbed perhaps $10 billion.  The worst public project was a dam and irrigation network on the Euphrates.  The new land was infertile and the high-cost technology worked so badly that farmers on the older areas reverted to their traditional lowtechnology, water-delivery techniques.  Other poor investments include a $110 million paper mill that rarely works and an ammonia-urea plant that had to be converted to natural gas at a cost of an extra $100 million.  Growth rates in the 1980s have been less than 1% a year.  The economy slipped into a crisis by 1985, with shortages everywhere.  The government refused to recognize its failure, instead tolerating black markets so that corrupt officials could extort a share of the profits.  Mr. Assad had hoped that recent oil discoveries would end the crisis, but they were insufficient: Syria's oil income will barely keep up with the needs of the expanding population at the current low living standard, much less allow for growth.  The outlook for 1989 is particularly grim because of a drought that may have cut wheat output in half.  In short, Syria cannot generate the resources to pay for its military without liberalizing its economy -- and that would threaten Mr. Assad's political grip because he lacks the support of businessmen.  Syrians are not ready to make substantial sacrifices for Mr. Assad's foreign policy aims and Mr. Assad has not been willing to force them to do so.  One sign of his fiscal caution is that Syria's tax burden is lower than in Egypt or Jordan, much less Israel.  Even so, Syria has a lower growth rate than any of its local rivals.  And so Syria remains entirely dependent on Soviet and Arab financing to sustain its military machine.  This should give the West leverage over Syria.  One small step would be to stop all remaining Western finance by banning credit lines from banks and suppliers, offering no privileges to Syrian exports and prohibiting Western oil companies from developing the oil fields that this year will produce $1.5 billion in oil, mostly for domestic consumption.  Brown & Root, Marathon, Union Oil, Pecten, and other U.S. companies are involved in developing Syria's oil industry, which has never been placed off limits by U.S. government restrictions.  But the strongest influence the West could exert on Mr. Assad is through the Soviets, Saudis and Kuwaitis.  The West has not been willing to make a linkage between relations with the Soviets or moderate Arabs and their support for Mr. Assad.  Today, Western pressure to curtail aid to Syria would have a good chance of success because it would reinforce the natural inclination of the donors.  The Soviets and the Gulf Arabs have financial problems of their own.  Furthermore, the Soviets are no longer as interested as they once were in sustaining radical regimes with chronically ill economies, and the Arab states are less afraid of Syrian-inspired terrorism against them.  Indeed, the Soviets and Saudis have already cut aid significantly since 1984, with the result that Syria has had to halve its military budget (after inflation) and move two divisions to reserve status.  Mr. Assad's muted reaction to the PLO statements that led to the opening of discussions between the U.S. and the PLO is a good example of how he has had to respond to the wishes of his friends in Riyadh and Moscow, who have made it clear that they do not want him to kill the peace process.  Mr. Assad must be made to pay a higher price for supporting terrorism.  Syria permits Palestinian, Kurdish and Iranian terrorists to operate training camps in Syrian-controlled areas such as the Bekaa Valley.  Ahmed Jabril, a Damascus-based Palestinian leader, is suspected of involvement in the bombing of Pan Am Flight 103 over Scotland last December and the murder of those on board.  It would be too much to hope for to expect the Soviets to stop arming their ally altogether, but we should hold them responsible when they provide the advanced missiles that limit our ability to attack the hostage takers' bases.  The U.S. has been extending its diplomatic dialogue with Syria in recent months, and has been discussing the fighting in Lebanon, where Syria continues to be the main culprit.  Some in the State Department are even talking about establishing wider business ties, which Mr. Assad badly wants.  But U.S. policy shouldn't be more carrot, but more stick.  The U.S. should send a clear message that it holds Syria, not just Iran, responsible for the fate of the American hostages.  Before rewarding Mr. Assad for his minimal steps in the past week on the hostages -- steps mostly designed to bring Hezbollah under his control -- the U.S. should first increase the pressure on him to stop rewarding terrorists.  ---  Mr. Clawson, formerly at the IMF and World Bank, is associated with the Washington Institute for Near East Policy and the Foreign Policy Research Institute.  Michael L. Lomax, the pick of the city's business establishment to be the next mayor, abruptly withdrew from the race yesterday, leaving former Mayor Maynard H. Jackson as a shoo-in for the October election.  The decision, which comes just days before both candidates were to qualify officially for the race, stunned the city and cut short what had promised to become a divisive and possibly racially charged battle between the two black candidates.  Mr. Lomax, who had planned to quit his job as Fulton County Commission chairman next week, had been trailing in opinion polls.  He said yesterday that he hadn't been able to narrow the gap sufficiently and that to continue his campaign would have been too costly.  "This city will be healed by what I did," he said.  "It would not benefit from a divisive race between two of its sons."  Mr. Lomax's lackluster showing in the polls had begun to hurt his fund raising, according to campaign officials.  He was also set back when an ad campaign aimed at discrediting Mr. Jackson's public-safety record was criticized by some blacks as racist because it depicted two prominent white Atlantans discussing their concerns about crime.  In recent weeks, it became increasingly apparent that Mr. Lomax wouldn't be able to chip away at the popularity of Mr. Jackson, Atlanta's first black mayor, whose policies during the period from 1974 to 1982 had angered many of the city's business leaders but made him a legend among the city's blacks.  Mr. Lomax, young and erudite, was a hit with some of the city's biggest business leaders, such as architect-developer John Portman, and Ira C. Herbert, president of Coca-Cola Co.'s USA division.  He shares some of the same pro-development views of current Mayor Andrew Young, whose eight-year tenure has been an unprecedented boom time for Atlanta.  Mr. Lomax has been identified as part of a new generation of pragmatic black politicians.  A native Californian and an English professor, he is also known for his tailored clothes, and love of gourmet food and the opera.  It may have been some of those uppercrust qualities that hurt him most with many low-income and middle-income blacks.  "Michael engenders jealousy, Maynard doesn't," said Michael Leven, president of Atlanta-based Days Inns of America Corp. and a Lomax supporter.  Not that Mr. Jackson is exactly poverty-stricken.  But while he is a bond attorney who lives in Atlanta's ritzy Buckhead section, he grew up as the son of a pastor at one of the city's oldest black churches.  Mr. Jackson emerged from the mayor's office as a "poor people's champion," according to William H. Boone, a political scientist at Atlanta University.  "The downtown business interests were constantly at him, and quite frankly, that made him look good to blacks."  During that time, Mr. Jackson pushed for things like increased minority participation not only in business contracts but on boards of local companies, clubs and organizations.  There were "tremendous fights," recalled Dan E. Sweat Jr., a business leader who worked closely with Mr. Jackson while he was mayor.  "There are still a lot of those scars."  Mr. Sweat said he hopes Mr. Jackson will be more mellow this time.  And Mr. Jackson will be, his spokesman said.  There is no longer a need to be as aggressive in some of those areas, he said.  In fact, Mr. Jackson said he has been garnering increasing support from Atlanta's business community.  What Mr. Jackson said he will be aggressive about now, among other things, is crime.  "We're going to fight drugs and crime until the drug dealers' teeth rattle," he said yesterday.  The passing of the baton will come at a crucial time for Atlanta.  By law, Mayor Young can't run for a third term.  While his administration has recently succeeded in pushing through several major development projects, the city's economic growth has slowed and its real-estate market is in a slump.  Surveys have shown for several years the city's crime problem to be among the worst in the country.  "We can't look back now, we really have to address some of our problems," says Mr. Sweat.  Frederick A. Wang, president and chief operating officer of beleaguered Wang Laboratories Inc., was apparently forced out by his father, founder and Chairman An Wang, who said the board will seek an outsider for the posts.  The move comes just days after the family controlled computer giant reported a $424.3 million net loss for the year ended June 30 and said it might seek to sell part of the company.  Wang also is struggling to renegotiate credit lines with its bankers.  In a statement, the company said only that its board accepted Mr. Wang's resignation Monday.  It came at the end of the elder Mr. Wang's first day back at work after undergoing surgery last month for esophageal cancer, a disease that is often fatal.  "Dr.  Wang and Fred decided together that the company needed to make a dramatic statement, that it was no longer business as usual at Wang Laboratories," said Paul Guzzi, senior vice president at the company.  Neither father nor son was available for comment.  Investors reacted positively to the move, driving up Wang shares $1.125 to a close of $6.875 in American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  More than 2.8 million shares changed hands.  The stock, which peaked at $42.50 in 1984, slumped to 10-year low of $5.375 last week.  Mr. Wang's departure signals a sweeping change for the company, which has always had a Wang at the helm.  It is meant to show both customers and creditors that the company is serious about a turnaround.  Wang faces an Aug. 10 deadline to renegotiate credit agreements with its bankers, because steep write-downs in the latest quarter forced the company out of compliance with the agreements.  Wang has taken on a staggering $900 million in short and long-term debt, analysts said.  Mr. Guzzi denied that the company's banks had demanded Mr. Wang's departure.  "The decision was a difficult one, but both Dr. Wang and Fred agreed it was in the best interest of Wang Labs," he said.  "Ultimately, one person is accountable for the company's recent results, and Fred never shrank from that responsibility."  When Mr. Wang, 38 years old, took operating control of the company nearly three years ago, critics questioned whether he was up to the task.  Although the company managed a modest rebound from a slump in the mid-1980s, it has taken a sharp turn for the worse in the last year as sales stalled and losses mounted.  Mr. Wang has been criticized for moving too slowly to cut costs and shift product strategy.  In a recent interview, the elder Mr. Wang graded his son "at 75%."  Analysts applauded the change at Wang, though some said the father had to bear much of the burden of the company's problems.  "In a way, Fred is the sacrificial lamb here," said Judith Hurwitz, a consultant with Patricia Seybold's Office Computing Group in Boston.  "Dr.  Wang could never really let go."  The elder Mr. Wang also may have had policy disagreements with his son.  Earlier this year, sources said, a European company was interested in buying Wang's money-losing Intecom unit, and the younger Mr. Wang favored its sale, but the move was vetoed by the elder Mr. Wang, 69, who is also chief executive officer of the company.  Wang's board appointed Vice Chairman Harry H.S. Chou to succeed Mr. Wang as acting president and chief operating officer.  Mr. Chou, 66, is close to the elder Mr. Wang and has worked for him since 1969, serving much of that time as treasurer and chief financial officer.  The younger Mr. Wang will continue to serve on the board and take on special projects, the company said.  The board appointed a three-man search committee to find a successor, "someone of national and even international standing in the industry, who understands the challenges of a turnaround situation," Mr. Guzzi said.  Because of the elder Mr. Wang's failing health, his son's successor could well become heir to the chairman's job.  Although Mr. Wang is said to have recovered quickly from surgery last month, esophageal cancer can progress rapidly.  One possible successor is former Wang President John Cunningham, who left the company in 1985 when it became clear that Mr. Wang wanted his son to succeed him.  But Mr. Cunningham said in an interview last week that he hadn't been approached and that he had no plans to return.  "As traumatic as it is for the family and the company, {hiring an outsider} is the right thing to do," said Jay P. Stevens, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  The Wang family still controls 80% of Class C shares, which elect a majority of seats to the 11-member board.  The huge net loss that Wang reported last week compared with net income of $92.7 million, or 56 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue fell to $3.03 billion from $3.07 billion in fiscal 1988.  PERSONAL TAXES rose only slightly in 1987, tax revision's transition year.  The IRS's first estimates of the effects on 1987 returns of the 1986 tax act's lower rates and broader base show that they varied widely.  But total personal income tax rose just 1.1% to $371 billion.  And while adjusted gross income, the usual tax measure, rose 12.3%, total income was up only 1%.  Tax liability as a share of AGI dropped sharply to 13.3% from 14.8% -- but as a share of total income, it held steady at 13.2%.  The effects must be viewed cautiously, the IRS notes, because of the big jump in 1986 capital-gains income, in anticipation of the end of the gains preference after 1986; realized capital gains fell to $133.5 billion in 1987 from $295.9 billion in 1986.  Overall, effective tax rates were lower for income classes under $50,000 and higher for those above; the effective rate on total income over $1 million rose to 29.3% from 21.7%.  With new limits, deductions for payments into individual retirement accounts dropped 62.5% to $14.1 billion.  Alternative minimum taxes were reported on 114,330 returns and totaled $1.23 billion.  AVERAGE DEDUCTIONS on 1987 returns show tax revision's impact.  That year, sales-tax deductions were eliminated; medical, interest, and miscellaneous deductions were curtailed.  The number of personal returns with itemized deductions fell 12.7% to 35.5 million.  From preliminary IRS data on 1987 deductions, publisher Research Institute of America figured unofficial averages, with interesting results.  The number of returns with medical deductions nearly was halved, but average deductions rose -- apparently because only large medical expenses could be deducted.  Deductions for taxes and interest fell from 1986's.  And average donations at high-income levels dropped, RIA notes; on returns showing income of $100,000 to $200,000, the average fell to $3,926 from $4,308.  The 1987 averages by adjusted-gross-income group for medical, tax, charitable-gift, and interest deductions follow.  They are no guarantee of what the IRS actually may allow.  @ Income Med.  Tax Gift Int.  @ (-000)  @ $ 25- 30 2,125 1,818 941 3,605  @ $ 30- 40 2,303 2,240 1,005 4,195  @ $ 40- 50 3,042 2,807 1,130 4,928  @ $ 50- 75 4,015 3,812 1,450 5,991  @ $ 75-100 7,292 5,684 2,135 8,217  @ $100-200 16,417 9,161 3,926 11,962  @ $200-500 34,869 20,233 8,320 18,371  SAVINGS-BOND INTEREST can be saved from kiddie tax under new rules.  Income from U.S. Series E or EE savings bonds is taxable when a bond is redeemed or disposed of, unless you elect to report the income annually as it accrues.  Before the 1986 tax act, many parents made the election for their childrens' bonds, so the interest would avoid tax or be taxed at a low rate, says Kevin Duvall of Ernst & Young, CPAs.  Then tax revision unleashed the kiddie tax, imposing the parents' rate on unearned income of children under 14.  Before, the election could be reversed only by getting IRS consent, a complex process.  Now, Revenue Procedure 89-46 offers simplified automatic consent if Form 3115 is filed with a return, including an amended 1988 return.  Reversal can defer income until redemption after a child turns 14, when his lower rate applies, Duvall notes.  Once the election is reversed this way, the bondholder can't change the reporting method again for five years.  COMFORT RULINGS -- private rulings just to confirm a taxpayer's understanding of a planned transaction's effect -- would be curtailed as an unnecessary burden, the IRS said in May.  But owing to protests, it will delay action for six months and consider alternatives, acting Chief Counsel Scott tells tax lawyers meeting in Honolulu.  DON'T DALLY A DAY: Returns to be filed under an automatic four-month extension are due Aug. 15 -- Tuesday -- even though the original due date was April 17 (because April 15 fell on Saturday).  You may request an extension to Oct. 15 on Form 2688.  SOUTH CAROLINA has imposed withholding of income tax on certain proceeds of non-residents' sales of real estate there.  The rates are 7% for individuals and 5% for businesses.  The seller is responsible for collecting the tax.  LOW-INCOME HOUSING spends a greater share of equity on front-end costs.  So says the General Accounting Office, after comparing 19 publicly offered partnerships that get the low-income-housing credit with 46 real-estate partnerships that don't.  The credit-earners have an average debt load of 77% and devote an average 27% of equity to commissions, offering costs, and such front-end fees and expenses; the credit is based on total costs, including debt.  The other concerns have average debt of 39% and front-end costs of 21% of equity.  Still, the GAO said, proportional spending by the credit-earners is within the widely accepted guidelines set by the North American Securities Administrators Association.  And the spending varies from 17% to 34% of equity.  Concerned about costs that trim equity available for construction, Rep. Rangel (D., N.Y.) asked for the study.  Some partnerships use brokers to acquire properties, while others don't.  BRIEFS: The child-care credit was claimed on 5% fewer returns for 1987 than for 1986; credits rose 1.5% to $3.5 billion. . . .  Harvey S. Rosen, 40, a Princeton economics professor, was named deputy assistant Treasury secretary for tax analysis.  Ford Motor Co. announced two separate recalls, one of 9,200 Cargo trucks to check a switch that monitors pressure in air brakes, the other of 3,807 1989-model F-150, F-250 and F-350 trucks with manual transmissions and gasoline engines to install fuel tank shields.  The Bush administration is trying to dispel any notion that it might allow Iran's assets in the U.S. to be put on the table in bargaining over hostages in Lebanon.  Administration aides suggested that the Iranian assets, held in the U.S. since the crisis over the seizure of the American embassy in Tehran in 1979, might be discussed with Tehran but only after a marked improvment in U.S.-Iranian relations.  And that improvement, officials say, should begin with the release of the eight U.S. hostages still held in Lebanon.  Iranian officials appeared to send a signal through a newspaper story yesterday that they would like to link the assets to current bargaining over Western hostages held by Shiite extremists in Lebanon.  The Tehran Times carried a report saying Iran might be more helpful in gaining the hostages' release if the assets were released.  The newspaper quoted someone close to the new Iranian president, Hashemi Rafsanjani, as saying: "The first step should be taken by the U.S., and if Tehran is satisfied that its assets will certainly be unfrozen, then the second step will definitely come from Iran."  White House officials said that Iran hasn't demanded that the assets be unfrozen in the messages that Washington and Tehran have exchanged recently through the Swiss government and other intermediaries.  But the White House insisted that it rejects any such feelers, whether official or unofficial.  "We are not willing to link the Iranian assets questions to the hostage question," said White House press secretary Marlin Fitzwater.  "That fits within the definition of our policy of not trading arms or money, or whatever, for hostages and of not paying ransom for hostages."  U.S. officials say they aren't even clear what Iranian officials mean when they refer to frozen assets.  The Iranians apparently are referring to escrow accounts Iran maintains here and to military equipment the U.S. has refused to deliver.  The accounts were established in 1981 as part of the negotiations that resulted in the freeing of American hostages from the embassy in Tehran.  At that time, the U.S. and Iran agreed to submit to international arbitration billions of dollars in claims the two countries held against each other.  Iran agreed to set up a series of escrow accounts to provide funds for settling claims by American companies and individuals who lost property in the Iranian revolution.  Those accounts once held nearly $10 billion, but their value has dropped to less than $1.5 billion as claims have been settled, U.S. officials said.  Iran has claimed that it is owed some $11 billion for undelivered or defective military equipment that it contracted to buy during the reign of the late Shah.  U.S. officials consider that figure wildly exaggerated, and say they are working under instructions from the claims tribunal to set a value for equipment that wasn't delivered to Iran.  The following issue was recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Air Products & Chemicals Inc., shelf offering of up to $200 million of medium-term notes, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Brown Brothers Harriman & Co., New York, said it organized the 1818 Fund, a limited partnership in which it is general partner, with $325 million in capital.  The fund will make long-term investments in medium-sized, publicly held companies in the U.S. with aggregate market values generally between $250 million and $750 million.  An average fund investment is expected to be $40 million to $60 million, and the fund generally will negotiate directly with each company to buy newly issued preferred shares that are convertible to common.  Lawrence C. Tucker, a Brown Brothers partner, will manage the fund with T. Michael Long, another Brown Brothers partner.  The fund, a Delaware limited partnership, has 13 limited partners, which include major U.S. corporations and international financial institutions with an average investment of $25 million each.  Brown Brothers, founded in 1818, is owned by 33 general partners and limited partners.  As a private bank, its deposits aren't insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  Former U.S. Treasury Secretary William E. Simon emerged as an equity investor in Sir James Goldsmith's bid for B.A.T Industries PLC and said he is a potential buyer of Farmers Group Inc., B.A.T's U.S. insurance unit.  Mr. Simon said he "would clearly be interested in Farmers . . . if it was to be spun off" under Sir James's planned break-up of the British tobacco, financial-services, retailing and paper conglomerate.  Sir James wants to keep B.A.T's tobacco business and sell the rest, including Farmers, which B.A.T acquired late last year for $5.2 billion.  In any Goldsmith sale of Farmers, "you have to consider Bill Simon an interested player," Mr. Simon said in a phone interview.  Since leaving government service, Mr. Simon has become a pioneer of leveraged buy-outs in the U.S., leading an independent investor group.  His unexpected intervention in Europe's biggest takeover could lend new credibility to Sir James's campaign to acquire B.A.T.  In the past two weeks, Sir James's Hoylake Investments Ltd. investor group has faced mounting skepticism as its efforts to secure U.S. regulatory approval for the #13.35 billion ($21.35 billion) bid have bogged down.  Hoylake has filed nine lawsuits to take the bid's insurance aspects away from U.S. state regulators and put them in federal court.  Unveiling his formal offer document, Sir James hinted at ways to surmount U.S. regulatory problems, which he said he had expected.  But the 74-page document, while giving details of more terms of the all-paper, highly leveraged offer, left many institutional investors and analysts highly skeptical of its prospects unless the Hoylake group sweetens and restructures it by adding cash.  Mr. Simon stressed that there aren't any firm proposals for a Hoylake sale of Farmers and indicated his interest was preliminary.  But he said the investors intend to explore whether "it makes a difference {to U.S. insurance regulators} if we are going to be the acquirer of the spunoff" Farmers unit.  Mr. Simon said that Farmers would be "a pretty big mouthful" and might preclude his interest in other B.A.T units.  He noted that other groups may be interested in other B.A.T businesses, which include U.S. retailers Saks Fifth Avenue and Marshall Field.  California, Texas and Kansas state insurance officials said they couldn't speculate as to whether the agencies would respond more favorably to a Simon-led Farmers purchase.  But Joseph Hennelly Jr., deputy director of the Arizona Department of Insurance, said, "It's certainly something we'd consider in a hearing."  Several state insurance regulatory officials said they didn't know Mr. Simon and were unaware of his possible interest in Farmers.  According to Hoylake's offer document, Mr. Simon has invested #1 million in the group's planned #868 million of equity.  WSGP International Inc., an investment-banking company owned by Mr. Simon and Los Angeles attorney Gerald L. Parsky, has invested another #750,000.  Other investors disclosed yesterday include Britain's Duke of Beaufort; a member of the French Stern banking family; and Baron Philippe Lambert.  Britain's General Electric Co., France's Banque Paribas, and Italy's Agnelli family were disclosed earlier as investors.  Acquiring Farmers would be a substantial leap forward for Mr. Simon's ambitions to expand in West Coast financial services.  In various ventures, he and Mr. Parsky have acquired both troubled and healthy California savings and loan companies, and have plans to develop a merchant-banking business dealing with the Pacific Rim.  Buying Farmers also would represent a huge step up in size for Mr. Simon.  Last year, in his largest single acquisition so far, a Simon-led group spent about $225 million to acquire two thrifts that had total assets of about $4.3 billion.  However, Mr. Simon often has had bigger targets in his sights.  During 1987, a group including Mr. Simon and Mr. Parsky talked to federal regulators about taking control of Financial Corp. of America, then the parent of the nation's biggest troubled thrift, with massive government aid.  The thrift had about $30 billion in assets but a huge portfolio of troubled real estate loans.  The Simon group dropped out of the negotiations, however, after it became clear that the regulators weren't going to move fast and would continue to negotiate simultaneously with other bidders, including Ford Motor Co.  Mr. Simon said the B.A.T deal was an opportunity to expand in Europe.  "I want to be involved in the British market and I like everything going on in Europe" as it approaches its 1992 target for removing barriers to a unified market.  He said his interest in Hoylake arose when he spoke with Sir James during Britain's Wimbledon tennis championships earlier this summer.  Mr. Simon also knows the Agnelli family of Italy, which has invested in some of his U.S. thrift acquisitions.  Sir James is offering B.A.T shareholders an 80%-debt, 20% equity package of securities, which Hoylake's financial advisers currently value at 878 pence a share.  At a news conference, Sir James renewed his attack on B.A.T, saying that if the company "fights on its record, it is dead in the water."  He said Hoylake also hopes to announce soon three trustees to head a voting trust into which Hoylake would put Farmers, another arrangement to surmount U.S. regulatory opposition.  Sir James said it would be "barmy" to make a cash bid and incur hundreds of millions of pounds in investment-banking fees, until he gets a better idea of chances for overcoming U.S. regulatory obstacles.  He also said financial advisers Bankers Trust International Ltd., which has invested #20 million in the bidding group, and Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., still are exploring ways to provide liquidity for the debt instruments.  Hoylake said the expenses of its bid, if successful, would total about #165 million.  Its three financial advisers would share much of that, and could reap substantially more if the offer is underwritten.  If the bid is completed, Hoylake's financial advisers would split a $100 million success fee, not less than $50 million of which would go to Drexel.  Drexel already has been paid $5 million.  Bankers Trust could receive $25 million or more, and Hambros Bank Ltd., Hoylake's U.K. merchant bank, would receive about $30 million.  B.A.T reiterated its criticism of the Hoylake offer and urged shareholders to reject it.  "Not only does it ignore the group's excellent prospects but it consists of a bundle of paper of dubious value."  People close to B.A.T also said Mr. Simon, if he eventually makes a proposal for Farmers, might seek a leveraged buy-out that also could run into regulatory roadblocks.  On London's Stock Exchange, B.A.T shares gained three pence to 848 pence.  Analysts and institutions remain skeptical about the current Hoylake offer's chances of success.  One B.A.T institutional holder said he would be surprised if the current offer drew many acceptances before its first closing date, Aug. 29.  Andrew Threadgold, chief executive officer of Postel, a British institutional investor that controls just over 2% of B.A.T, said the Goldsmith offer document "is the first shot across the bow" of a battle that will run for several more weeks.  Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis named a price of $240 a share, or $5.4 billion, in his proposal to take over UAL Corp., according to people familiar with the parent of United Airlines.  In a letter sent last week to UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf, Mr. Davis also indicated he would consider raising his offer after a review of confidential UAL information.  Mr. Davis and Mr. Wolf are said to have spoken briefly by telephone before the letter was sent.  The proposal, which remains just a letter without any known financing, is well above the current UAL stock price even after a powerful two-day rally in UAL shares.  The stock rose $8.50 a share yesterday to close at $219.25, on top of a $46.25 gain Monday.  Though the UAL board, which is to meet this afternoon regarding Mr. Davis's proposal, may snub the offer because of its informal nature, there are indications some directors may eventually consider some kind of leveraged buy-out or other transaction.  Ralph Strangis, a Minneapolis attorney and UAL board member, said in an interview that he couldn't comment on the Davis offer or the board's possible response.  But he said a management-led buy-out "always surfaces as a possibility whenever this type of activity occurs."  Asked about carriers such as Trans World Airlines or Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc. which have gone private, Mr. Strangis said "privatization isn't necessarily a bad thing for an airline.  It's less an issue of public vs. private.  What's important is whether a transaction leaves the company with the ability to be competitive."  If the UAL board balks, some takeover stock traders believe Mr. Davis is willing to pursue a procedure known as a consent solicitation to oust the current board members.  Mr. Davis briefly began a proxy fight for NWA last spring before the board put Northwest up for sale.  Since the Davis offer became known, UAL trading volume has totaled 3.9 million shares.  The company has 21.6 million shares outstanding.  An acquirer would have to buy 22.5 million UAL shares on a fully diluted basis, counting unexercised options.  The price of Mr. Davis's opening bid may be higher than expected because it approaches the $250-to-$300 range in which most analysts have valued UAL in a takeover in the two months since the price of the Northwest purchase became known.  But some estimates run far higher.  A confidential study by Salomon Brothers Inc., a financial adviser to the UAL pilot union, estimated that the airline is worth $325 a share in a leveraged buyout, but only $285 a share in a recession scenario.  The study, called "Project Frequent Flyer," was obtained from market sources who asked to remain unidentified.  The Salomon study envisions piling $5.3 billion in new debt and $1.5 billion in equity on top of United's existing debt of $1.2 billion.  It also outlines possible buy-outs of AMR Corp., parent of American Airlines, at $130 a share; Delta Air Lines at $110 a share, and USAir Group Inc. at $75 a share.  Delta and AMR stock continued to surge yesterday on takeover speculation, with AMR up $2.375 a share to $73.875 and Delta rising $2.25 to $76.75.  But USAir fell $1.625 to $51.375 because the airline announced after the market closed Monday that Berkshire Hathaway Inc. would buy 12%, complicating a hostile bid.  On the other hand, one of UAL's largest shareholders has been selling during the run-up in the stock price that began in June.  Alliance Capital Management Inc., which earlier this year held nearly four million shares, has cut its stake by more than half in order to cash in on the gains, according to Alfred Harrison, an Alliance portfolio manager in Minneapolis.  Mr. Wolf and the UAL pilots, as well as the board, are expected to have a lot to say about who buys United.  Mr. Davis and other bidders are likely to try to negotiate with both labor and management.  Whomever labor sides with could have an advantage in potential wage or profit-sharing concessions.  But enlisting both labor and management in one bid could be difficult, particularly since the pilots have said they want to put together their own offer.  During the NWA takeover auction, the pilots never acted cohesively to influence the outcome.  One reason was that, even three years after Northwest merged with Republic, the union was still divided into a Northwest faction and a Republic faction.  However, the UAL pilots have shown they can act together.  Another reason cited for UAL's stock strength late Monday and yesterday is that Mr. Davis is working with David Batchelder, a La Jolla, Calif., merger adviser who formerly worked for corporate raider T. Boone Pickens.  Mr. Batchelder, who guided Mr. Davis during his pursuit of NWA, also did some consulting for the UAL pilots during their 1987 attempt to buy the airline.  UAL is being advised by First Boston Corp.  Commodore International Ltd. reported a $10.1 million operating loss for the fourth quarter ended June 30, slightly less than the company had projected last month.  The Westchester, Pa., personal computer maker had said it might lose as much as $12 million because of a stronger dollar and weaker sales in key overseas markets.  Including a $1.2 million benefit from a tax-loss carry-forward, the loss was $8.9 million.  A year ago, the company earned $12.2 million, or 38 cents a share.  Sales declined 16% to $180.3 million from $215.2 million.  The company said it has cut some manufacturing costs by consolidating operations in Asia.  Irving Gould, chairman, repeated last month's predictions that Commodore will be profitable in the next quarter.  He said the latest quarter's earnings were affected by increased operating and marketing expenses for new products that will bolster next year's results.  New York Times Co.'s magazine group named McCall's publisher John J. Beni, 57 years old, to the additional post of president of the magazine.  New York Times acquired McCall's July 27.  William T. Kerr, president of New York Times' magazine group, made several other appointments on the business side of McCall's, mixing in several executives from Family Circle magazine, also owned by the company.  Among other appointments, Susan Baron, formerly vice president and national advertising manager of Family Circle, was named vice president, advertising director, of McCall's.  Great artists often lead lives of torment, and that goes double for the world's top panflute player.  Most people have never heard of him, and many who have laugh at his music.  Such is the realm of Gheorghe Zamfir (pronounced George Zamfear).  At first glance his life seems a virtuoso's dream come true.  He is the master of an obscure instrument and the current king of music albums sold on late-night television in the U.S.  Without benefit of even one hit song played by radio disk jockeys to bolster sales in record stores, the 48-year-old Romanian is peddling enough albums through ads on cable TV to keep him in Rolls-Royces, $200-a-bottle wines and the Italian fashions he loves.  "He hadn't even been heard of in the U.S. until 3 1/2 years ago.  Now he is the longest-running album seller on Cable News Network," says Charlotte Leonard, the cable channel's manager of direct-response advertising.  "CNN made Zamfir," she says.  Tune into late-night cable and see Zamfir, his dark chest heaving, his gold chain glistening, the spotlight carefully aimed to leave his wrinkles in shadow.  Song-titles roll across vistas of seashores, sunsets over palm trees, majestic mountains, and the magic of Zamfir is revealed -- in his rendition of "Yesterday," "Somewhere My Love" and "Amazing Grace."  But success in the New World holds many sour notes for the Romanian emigrant: recording lounge-lizard tunes he despises instead of his beloved Romanian folk songs, scorn from music critics, suspicions that he was shortchanged on concert fees and a mismanaged tour of the U.S. that drowned in red ink.  He recently sold his house in Montreal, fired his agent and tour manager and moved to France.  He is refusing press interviews.  Today, Mr. Zamfir's cosmos is far from the one described on his late-night ads: "Relax, as Zamfir sweeps you away to a world of haunting, tranquil beauty."  In reality, he spends most of his time behind a steel door framed in an expanse of steel wall in a Paris apartment.  He fears Soviet secret agents, associates say, having fled to France from Communist Romania about 12 years ago.  What happened?  Mr. Zamfir began his musical life playing the accordion; at age 14, he took up the panflute, also called panpipes -- a simple wind instrument in which tones are obtained by bundling up to 30 wood pipes of different sizes together and blowing into the openings.  He conducted a Romanian folk ensemble in the '60s and later gave panflute concerts, at $10,000 a performance.  In l983 he moved from Paris to Canada, where his folk songs and original compositions for the panflute are popular.  Concert fees rose to $30,000.  The Zamfir known to Americans, however, has little to do with folk-song and originality.  About four years ago, Mr. Zamfir signed with Welk Group, a Los Angeles-based company that packages albums on the Heartland Music label, and sells them on a cable channel, often between midnight and 6 a.m., when a two-minute spot costs about $500.  Lawrence Welk Jr., co-owner of Welk Group and son of the famous bandleader, says he considered Mr. Zamfir's sound a high risk.  "I wouldn't have been surprised if it had bombed.  But we dictated the repertoire we wanted."  The Group used the formula that sells well in the land of the insomniacs.  "Too much original material, even if it's great, is hard on our customers.  If they love an Irish tenor doing 'Ave Maria,' they'll love Zamfir doing it," says Ira Pittelman, president of Heartland.  Thus, Mr. Zamfir's TV platter, "The Magic of Zamfir," contains "Ave Maria," and the album cover promotes Irish tenor Frank Patterson's version of it on another Heartland record.  Mr. Patterson's album also contains "Amazing Grace" and "Annie's Song."  Those tunes are also found on "Zamfir Plays the World's Most Beautiful Melodies."  Mr. Zamfir's distributors and promoters hail him as the most successful panflutist in the world, though they can't name any others.  But U.S. music critics aren't impressed -- by his sound or his promoters' claims.  "It's Muzak for people who are snobby about Muzak," says Tim Page, chief classical music critic at Newsday.  "Banal tootling," says Michael Fleming of the St. Paul Pioneer Press Dispatch.  Paul Grein, a columnist for Billboard, a music-industry weekly, dismisses Mr. Zamfir as a "manufactured star," and scoffs at Heartland's claim that he has sold more than 20 million records world-wide.  "That's to make the public think, 'He's a big star I don't know about, so I'm missing out,'" Mr. Grein says.  Curiously, Heartland Music officials can't offer details about where all those 20 million records were sold.  Turns out their source is Mr. Zamfir's non-TV record company, Polygram Records Inc.  A Polygram official says she can't document either those sales or claims that more than 60 of his records have sold enough to be "Gold" and "Platinum."  Still, Mr. Zamfir has his admirers: Heartland and cable officials agree that TV sales of Zamfir albums have reached 750,000, enough to make him a millionaire.  He is known as a handsome "ladies' man," fond of giving flowers, according to Nancy Zannini, vice president of a division of Polygram Records Inc., the New York company that sells his non-TV albums.  "He makes women feel beautiful.  He's very continental.  Of course Romanian is just a hop, skip and a jump from Italian," she adds.  He is also betrothed, according to Susan Nichols, the mother of his three-year-old son.  Ms. Nichols, who works at the U.S. Consulate in Montreal, says she will wed Mr. Zamfir in December.  "George is looking for a castle outside Paris," where the three will live, she says.  But Mr. Zamfir should be in the U.S. right now, capitalizing on his TV-sales success, associates say.  He is missing out on millions of potential dollars in concert appearances and album sales by being in Europe, estimates Polygram's Ms. Zannini.  "The public is the guilty party.  They make him play 'The Shadow of Your Smile' and 'Just the Way You Are.' That's what they want, but he's a serious musician," says Ms. Zannini.  Polygram has recorded Zamfir's own pieces, though Ms. Zannini admits they don't sell well and she's about to lean on him to record an album of her favorite Spanish tangos.  His failed 1985 tour of a dozen or so U.S. cities was doomed when a manager absconded with expense money and plane tickets, according to Ms. Nichols.  "George went on with the musicians but the whole thing was so poorly managed it cost him more than a million dollars," she says.  Though he now lives in Paris, some good memories of the New World remain, in keepsakes and notes sent by his many fans -- a gold-leaf Bible, an ostrich egg-shaped music box and sketches and paintings admirers have drawn of their beloved Zamfir.  Perhaps reflecting the lives of the thousands who have been moved to buy "The Magic of Zamfir," a housewife from Osage Beach, Mo., wrote him this note: Your music takes "all the stress, anger or nervousness right out of me.  I have a stressful job, a sick husband and a dog that bites me."  Xerox Corp. said it will buy about 11.5 million of its common shares at $68 a share under a self-tender offer which expired Monday.  About 12.6 million shares were tendered under the offer; the office-equipment and financial services company had invited shareholders to sell shares at prices between $62 and $70 a share, and said it would pick a price under which it could purchase the desired number of shares.  Xerox, based in Stamford, Conn., offered to purchase the shares to offset dilution due to planned issuance of $785 million of convertible preferred shares to a new employee stock ownership plan.  Xerox said it would buy about 92% of the tendered shares, which amount to about 11% of its 103 million common shares outstanding.  Singapore's official foreign reserves rose 432.1 million Singapore dollars (US$221 million) to S$35.11 billion (US$17.96 billion) in May from S$34.68 billion in April, the Monetary Authority of Singapore said in its monthly bulletin.  The MAS, which acts as the country's central bank, said holdings in gold and foreign exchange climbed S$441.1 million to S$34.66 billion on the month.  Holdings in special drawing rights, however, fell by S$2.2 million to S$228.5 million, and the republic's reserve position with the International Monetary Fund fell by S$6.8 million to S$214.5 million.  Mesaba Aviation Inc. said its July traffic rose 89.9% to 16.6 million revenue passenger miles from 8.7 million a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying pasenger flown one mile.  The AirTran Corp. unit said its load factor for the month, or the number of available seats filled, rose to 60.5% from 57.7%.  Dravo Corp. of Pittsburgh said it agreed to sell its construction material business in Houston to Phibro Refining Inc., Greenwich, Conn., but declined to disclose the proposed price.  Dravo said it owns two asphalt plants and an aggregates distribution facility in Houston, but doesn't have a quarry to provide its own source of aggregates.  Because the company was unable to buy a quarry, Dravo decided to leave the Houston market, a spokesman said.  The sale is expected to be completed in September, Dravo said.  It isn't likely to have a material effect on earnings, the company said.  Dravo is a natural resources concern whose principal operations include construction aggregates and lime.  Singapore's gross domestic product expanded faster than expected in the first half, the government said, but growth continues to slow from the crackling pace set in 1988.  The Ministry of Trade and Industry said the republic's second-quarter GDP grew 9% from a year earlier.  First-quarter growth, previously estimated at 8.4%, was revised to 9.2%.  The ministry also lifted its overall 6% to 7% growth projection for the year to 7.5% to 8.5%.  In 1988, GDP grew 11%, compared with the previous year.  Both the ministry report and private sector economists noted, however, that despite the better-than-expected growth rate, the economy continued to show signs of slowing, particularly in the previously booming manufacturing sector, until now the mainstay of the republic's economic recovery from recession in 1985.  Tri-State Motor Transit Co., Joplin, Mo., said its board accepted Trism Inc.'s merger offer, with certain modifications.  Trism, a New York-based investment firm, proposed to buy the trucking concern by offering shareholders a choice of accepting one of the following: $21.25 a share in cash, $22.50 a share in a note bearing interest at 14 7/8% a year and due Dec. 15, 1996, $21.87 a share payable 50% in cash and 50% in a note, or $21.56 a share payable 75% in cash and 25% in a note.  The proposal, however, places a maximum cash payment to shareholders equal to $21.9 million.  Tri-State said it is willing to execute an agreement in principle and submit the matter to a shareholder vote, if Trism would agree, among other things, to obtain a commitment for financing by Aug. 29, and to raise the total cash consideration available to stockholders to $23.1 million.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Tri-State shares closed yesterday at $18.875, up 87.5 cents.  Tri-State said the transaction would be completed by Nov. 1.  PaineWebber Group Inc. directors approved repurchase of as many as 6.5 million shares of the investment and brokerage firm's common, an increase of 1.5 million shares from the previously authorized level.  As of July 31, the company had repurchased 3.7 million shares under the program.  GenCorp Inc. said a subsidiary, RKO General Inc., reached agreement on sale of its Fort Lauderdale, Fla., radio station, WAXY-FM to Ackerley Communications Inc. of Seattle.  Ackerley will pay $21 million, of which GenCorp will receive $12.6 million and challengers for the license will receive $8.4 million, GenCorp said.  The challengers have agreed to the license transfer, but the transaction is subject to approval by the Federal Communications Commission.  GenCorp, a Fairlawn, Ohio, aerospace, automotive and polymer products concern, has been selling its broadcasting properties to settle a long-standing controversy over whether the company is an acceptable license holder.  Challengers for RKO's radio and television broadcasting licenses alleged that RKO provided misleading information to the FCC.  GenCorp has agreements to sell a Memphis, Tenn., television station and a New York radio station awaiting FCC approval.  Ackerley has interests in television, outdoor advertising and radio.  The index that measures the aggregate value of orders to Italian industry rose 14.9% in April from a year earlier, the state statistical institute, Istat, said.  The industrial orders index measures only orders made on the basis of a contract.  The April increase compared with a rise of only 5% in the previous month.  Industrial orders from Italian sources rose 9.7% in April from a year earlier, while foreign orders soared 26%.  For the first four months of this year, orders to Italian industry rose 10.7% from the year-earlier period.  Domestic orders rose 7.8%, and foreign orders increased 17.2%.  Tokyo stocks rebounded from earlier losses to close higher for the first time in four trading days.  London share prices ended stronger, but well below the day's highs, as the market responded to recent movements on Wall Street.  Traders in Tokyo attributed the advance there largely to buy orders that streamed in for Nintendo, which closed at a limit high of 16,400 yen ($117.06) after the company announced a bigger-than-expected free-share offering.  Traders said the interest in Nintendo spread to some related issues, and many of these posted substantial gains that were magnified by the thin dealings through most of the market.  But brokers said that trading, although an improvement on recent days, was still thin because of sluggish participation by the market's major players.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues rose 129.10 points to 34759.48 after falling 111.61 points Monday.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 450 million shares, up from 306.03 million shares Monday.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 465 to 391, and 231 issues were unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which was up 2.21 points Monday, gained 9.22 points to 2624.70.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index rose 63.23 points to 34822.71.  Nintendo said it will carry out a 50% gratis issue, meaning it will distribute to its shareholders one free share for every two held.  Brokers said the market had been expecting the company to announce a gratis issue of around 10%.  What one broker called the "Nintendo effect" boosted other blue-chip issues as speculation grew that these companies, because of strong earnings performances recently, will feel pressure to follow with larger-scale gratis issues or other rewards for shareholders.  Among the winners were Fanuc, which gained 210 yen to 6,960, Kyocera, up 210 yen at 6,660, and Sony, up 330 yen to 8,300, a record.  Other gainers included Seven Eleven, which gained 410 yen to close at 7,630.  Sanrio was up 170 yen at 5,420.  Canon Sales rose 290 yen to 3,790.  Traders said the interest spurred by Nintendo generated momentum for higher-priced issues after many had already managed gains recently for technical reasons.  The issues are believed to move in a wider range when volume is thin, and therefore to present greater opportunities for short-term gains.  Electric utilities were also higher.  Kansai Electric was up 130 yen at 4,880.  Tokyo Electric Power gained 60 yen to 6,270, and Chubu was up 50 yen at 4,530.  The market's response to the Liberal Democratic Party's elections was minimal, traders said.  The party Tuesday voted to make Toshiki Kaifu the new party president.  He is expected to become prime minister Wednesday, when the Lower House, still controlled by the LDP, votes on a replacement for outgoing Prime Minister Sosuke Uno.  Meanwhile, in London, the market also got support from continuing takeover speculation, as well as a general lack of selling pressure.  The market moved sharply higher in early trading in response to Wall Street's sharp rally Monday.  But it retreated during the afternoon as investor interest waned, prompting market makers to mark prices lower to revive interest.  Despite the market's gain, several traders remained skeptical the momentum can be maintained.  "The market is being driven higher by the sheer weight of money being thrown at it," a trader said.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended up 6.6 points at 2348.1, below the day's peak of 2357.9.  At its lowest, the index touched 2347.7.  "Most people are feeling a bit edgy at these levels, but no one wants to be left on the sidelines if the market rises again," a trader noted.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index ended up 5.3 points at 1962.3.  B.A.T ended up three pence (4.8 cents) at 848 ($13.56), following the publication of Hoylake's offer document for the U.K. conglomerate.  The document reiterated arguments that B.A.T holders have been short changed, and said the group wouldn't specify how it might make the debt package behind its offer more marketable until the bid's standing with U.S. regulators is clear.  Pharmaceutical stocks continued to coax investor interest as players speculated on the potential for future merger and bid activity in the sector.  SmithKline Beecham advanced 7 pence to 592, and Fisons rose 2 1/2 pence to 359.  Lucas climbed 10 pence to 703 after its 17-pence rise Monday.  Dealers said the stock has benefited from a revised rating, amid speculation that the motor components sector is set for strong growth.  At the close, turnover was 541.4 million shares, up from 344.7 million.  In Frankfurt, share prices surged to a post-crash high, paced by a rally in automobile stocks.  Equities soared at the opening amid active foreign demand for blue chips.  Despite profit-taking, most shares held on to their gains, brokers said.  Share prices in Amsterdam closed at a record for the third consecutive session, boosted by Wall Street's surge on Monday and continuing optimism about expected earnings results.  Elsewhere, stocks closed higher in Paris, Zurich and Stockholm, mixed in Milan and lower in Brussels.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  In Hong Kong, shares soared 1.7% in moderately active trading, fueled by the New York market's overnight rally and rumors swirling around Shui On Group.  Shares in Sydney extended their rally to seven straight gains as Wall Street's surge inspired the local market to make its biggest single-day gain of the current advance.  The market in Taipei breached the 10,000-point psychological barrier on extremely active buying.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Seoul, Singapore and Wellington and mixed in Manila.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 7 Aug 4 Year  @ U.S. .................... 321.7 316.7 + 25.6  @ Britain ................. 706.9 702.8 + 29.4  @ Canada .................. 433.0 433.0 + 17.9  @ Japan ................... 1549.1 1546.5 + 9.1  @ France .................. 520.4 523.2 + 17.6  @ Germany ................. 248.9 249.0 + 19.7  @ Hong Kong ............... 1910.3 1922.3 - 5.9  @ Switzerland ............. 230.5 228.4 + 33.3  @ Australia ............... 337.3 335.7 + 16.2  @ World index ............. 543.7 542.0 + 10.0  The ailing Las Vegas Sun, carried for years by late founder and editor Hank Greenspun, and the healthy Las Vegas Review-Journal said they plan to combine business operations.  The two papers are the latest to file for a so-called joint-operating agreement, which must be approved by the U.S. attorney general's office.  Newspapers in 19 other cities are already functioning under the agreements.  Designed to save failing newspapers, they allow a business monopoly while the papers maintain separate news and editorial operations.  The proposal describes the Las Vegas agreement as the last hope for the Sun, which had a $3.6 million loss in 1988 and expects a $2.8 million loss this year on revenue of about $21 million.  Ninety percent of the papers' combined profits would go to the Review-Journal's parent, Donrey Media Group, solely owned by its 82-year-old founder Donald W. Reynolds.  Las Vegas-based Donrey owns 58 other U.S. dailies, 12 outdoor advertising concerns and five cable-television systems.  Donrey would also get 10% of the shares outstanding in Community Cable TV, a Las Vegas system 51%-owned by the Greenspun family.  That sweetener "suggests the Review-Journal might not have been interested in entering into a JOA unless it had the opportunity to invest in the local cable system," said Washington media analyst John Morton.  "I'm not aware of any other JOA application with this kind of wrinkle to it and have no idea how the Justice Department will respond."  David A. Osborn, the Review-Journal's general manager, said the terms of the proposal were obviously acceptable to the Greenspun family, sole owners of the Sun.  "I don't know how the deal would have wound up," he said, if the cable-TV interest hadn't been part of the bargain.  The Sun was the pride and joy of Mr. Greenspun, who died last month from cancer.  A fearless and highly-opinionated newsman who often spoke his mind in front-page editorials, he kept the Sun afloat for the last eight years by borrowing money from banks and other family-owned businesses.  By last Dec. 31, its daily circulation had fallen to 50,515, or less than half the Review-Journal's 121,321.  Under the proposal, both newspapers would maintain separate weekday editions.  The Review-Journal would be a morning paper, while the Sun would be published afternoons.  Editions would be combined on weekends and holidays.  The proposal will be filed with the Justice Department next week.  Approval can be swift or drag on for years, as in the case of the Detroit Free Press, owned by Knight-Ridder Inc., and rival Gannett Co.'s Detroit News.  Their proposal, filed over three years ago, has been awaiting Supreme Court review since last May.  The number of Eastern Airlines pilots abandoning their five-month-old strike and returning to work picked up sharply even as union leaders and most of the rank-and-file appear to be deciding to continue the walkout.  In the last 10 days, at least 164 striking Eastern pilots have come back to work, according to industry officials familiar with the carrier's labor situation.  Previously, the rate of returns had been only a trickle.  The increase in the number of defections is hardly the opening of floodgates, and it is unclear if it is a one-time event triggered by recent discussions within the union about maintaining picket lines at the carrier.  But if it continues, it could alleviate concerns by the Texas Air Corp. unit and its creditors about meeting Eastern's projected fall schedule.  Eastern had planned 390 flights a day as of Aug. 1, but has had to trim that to 350 because not enough replacement pilots could be trained.  Even its reduced schedule has required the leasing of five jets and crews from Continental Airlines, another Texas Air unit.  The latest rash of defections brings to about 535 the number of pilots who have crossed picket lines since March 4, when Eastern's 3,600 pilots went on strike.  That includes about 200 who stayed on the job at the start.  Eastern declined to comment on the latest returns; a spokesman said the carrier stopped as of Monday disclosing the number of so-called "crossovers."  A spokesman for the Air Line Pilots Association said he doesn't have any numbers, but didn't dispute the latest count.  "We anticipated there might be crossovers, but there's no way of knowing how many may have crossed," the spokesman said.  He added that while additional pilots may have gone back to work in recent days, others who crossed earlier have returned to the picket line.  Internal union communications refer to such pilots as "returning from the dark side."  The spokesman said he didn't know how many have criss-crossed, but said it has been "several dozen" since the strike began.  Industry sources said 63 striking pilots went back to work last week.  Nineteen more went back to work over the weekend, 52 crossed Monday and about 30 returned as of midday yesterday.  Pilots returning to work do so in the face of overwhelming sentiment against backing down.  Eastern's pilot-union executive committee voted over the weekend to maintain the picket line, but decided to seek the opinion of its rank-and-file in meetings throughout the country.  In Atlanta, for instance, pilots voted early yesterday to continue the strike by a 493 to 121 vote.  At Eastern's other large hub, Miami, pilots were voting last night, but hard-liners were predicting there would be no conciliatory moves.  "There are fears from the rank and file that if we pull the picket line down, the problem goes away, we're not visible anymore," the ALPA spokesman said.  "We're not going to go away."  Eastern has recruited more than 1,000 replacement pilots, of which about 750 are still in training and 300 are on the job.  If all those in training pass, the recruits plus the crossovers would put Eastern within a few hundred of the total number of pilots it says it needs to fly its new schedules.  Returning pilots, however, would speed the process because they could be back in the air with only a few days' training, in contrast to at least six weeks' training for recruits.  Eastern has been operating under bankruptcy court protection since March 9, four days after pilots and flight attendants honored a machinists strike.  The airline's reorganization plan calls for only about 800 flights a day, down from Eastern's pre-strike 1,100 flights.  Eastern's creditors have approved the plan.  Although the pilots struck in sympathy with the machinists, they have been pivotal in prosecuting the walkout.  The pilots have made control of the carrier their chief issue, and have backed a variety of takeover plans that would take control away from Frank Lorenzo, Texas Air chairman.  Now, with chances of a sale all but dead, the pilots have seen their options narrow.  They hoped the bankruptcy court would refuse to allow Eastern to sell off assets but so far it hasn't.  They are still pressing the court to appoint a trustee to take control away from Texas Air.  The court postponed a trustee hearing until October.  Pilots also are lobbying Congress and the Bush administration to prevent what they call a "controlled liquidation" of the carrier that would be anti-competitive.  Storage Technology Corp. said its board adopted a share purchase rights plan intended to deter hostile takeovers.  The Louisville, Colo., maker of data storage equipment said the action wasn't in response to any effort to acquire the company.  The common stock rights plan, usually called a poison pill, allows current shareholders to buy Storage Technology stock at a discount if any person or group acquires at least 20% of the stock or announces a tender offer for at least 30% of the stock.  The percentages could be lowered to 10% at the board's discretion.  In addition, if a person or group acquires more than 50% of its assets or if the company is involved in a merger, shareholders could buy stock in the acquiring company at a discount.  C.W. Earl Johnson, president and chief executive officer of this maker of oilfield equipment, was elected chairman of the board.  He succeeds John P. Inda, the company's largest shareholder, who, along with his wife, Phyllis Inda, resigned from the board to pursue other interests.  Barton said Pierre J. Stanis, a Coral Gables, Fla., business consultant, also resigned to pursue other interests, reducing the board's size to five members from eight.  New Zealand's seasonally adjusted M3 money supply rose 0.9% in June from May, the Reserve Bank of New Zealand said.  The central bank said M3 rose 5.5% in the 12 months ended June 30.  That figure isn't seasonally adjusted.  M3, the broadest measure of the money supply, includes deposits of most major financial institutions and currency in circulation.  Charles H. Meyer, president of Source Products Co., was elected a director of this maker of audiovisual products and instructional programs, succeeding Walter N. Liberato, who resigned to devote full time to personal business matters.  Comair Holdings Inc. said July traffic on its airline unit rose 32% from a year earlier.  Comair, based here, logged 24.2 million revenue passenger miles last month, up from 18.4 million a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger transported one mile.  The regional carrier said it filled an average of 50% of the seats on its July flights, up from 41% a year earlier.  Fischbach Corp. said directors approved a merger with a group formed by Asher DeVere, a British investor, which would pay holders of the electrical contracting company $29.835 a share, or about $117 million.  Miami Beach financier Victor Posner, who controls 52.9% of the company, indicated he favored the merger, which was approved by eight of Fishbach's 14 directors.  One director abstained.  Mr. DeVere, who has interests in real estate and other businesses, has said his group, FAC Acquisition Inc., has an agreement with a banking house to finance the transaction.  Fischbach stock rose 25 cents yesterday to close at $25 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  J. W. Marriott Jr., chairman of Marriott Corp., a lodging and food-services company, was elected to the auto maker's board.  The election of Mr. Marriott, 57 years old, brings the total number of GM directors to 17, only four of whom are GM officials, compared with five a year ago.  The number of directors had declined to 16, partly because of retirements.  Italy's industrial wholesale sales index in April rose 11.4% from a year earlier, the state statistical institute, Istat, said.  The April increase compared with March's year-to-year rise of 10%.  Domestic wholesale sales in April rose 9.2% from a year earlier, and sales to foreign destinations jumped 19.5%, Istat said.  For the first four months of this year, wholesale sales rose 12.8% from a year earlier, owing to increases of 12.3% in domestic sales and 15.1% in foreign sales.  Istat said sales of capital products to both foreign and domestic destinations in the four months grew 17.5% from a year earlier, and wholesale sales of consumer products rose 7.5%.  Sales of intermediate goods rose 14.4%.  Investors gave a lukewarm reception to the government's sale of three-year notes yesterday, sending bond prices lower and yields slightly higher.  The Treasury's $10 billion note sale was the first part of a huge three-part financing that will total $29.5 billion.  Today, the department will sell about $9.75 billion of 10-year notes, followed by $9.75 billion of 30-year bonds tomorrow.  At yesterday's auction, the average annual yield on the three-year notes was 7.93%.  However in when-issued trading, the yield on the three-year notes moved slightly higher to 7.95%, a sign of lackluster demand.  Traders said the bulk of yesterday's bids came from dealers and speculators seeking to profit on the differences between prices of the notes and prices of similar securities.  "It looked like there was a lot of arbitrage buying," said Charles Lieberman, a managing director at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp.  But retail investors, both domestic and foreign, were somewhat apprehensive about bidding for Treasury securities at a time when the economic and inflation outlook remains cloudy.  Alex Powers, a vice president at Chase Private Banking, a subsidiary of Chase Manhattan Corp., said some money managers like himself were reluctant to bid following Friday's employment report, which showed a stronger-than-expected rise in new jobs, a decline in the unemployment rate and higher wage rates.  "Before last Friday, everybody was looking for a recession, now we're back to the soft-landing scenario," said Mr. Powers.  "We want to sit back and wait a bit to see what happens" before making any further investment decisions.  In a soft landing, the economy slows down without entering a recession and without accelerating inflation.  Individual investors cut back note purchases sharply yesterday, compared with purchases at previous three-year note sales.  For example, non-competitive tenders, which come mainly from small and individual investors, totaled $566 million at yesterday's auction, compared with $1.2 billion at the previous three-year note auction on May 9.  The level of non-competitive bids was the lowest in several years.  Maria Fiorini Ramirez, a managing director and money market economist at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., said lower yields on the three-year notes relative to alternative securities kept many individual investors away.  Because yields on "three-month Treasury bills pay more than the three-year notes, many investors were saying, 'Why buy three-year notes?'" she said.  The average discount rate on the three-month Treasury bill at Monday's auction was 7.94%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.21%.  Moreover, some traders said investors were disappointed by the relatively light interest shown by Japanese investors.  William Brachfeld, an executive vice president at Daiwa Securities America Inc., estimated that the Japanese purchased between 15% and 17% of the new three-year notes.  Earlier, some traders had expected Japanese investors to purchase as much as 30% of the new notes.  "It was a poor auction," said Mr. Brachfeld.  "Buyers bought at the highest price of the day."  Some economists and analysts, however, caution that yesterday's results don't necessarily set the tone for the remaining two auctions.  "The three year is not the prime issue that {Japanese} investors look at," said Scott E. Pardee, co-chairman at Yamaichi International America Inc.  "They are more interested in the 10-year notes and 30-year bonds," he said.  Mr. Pardee estimated that foreign investors, led by the Japanese, bought about 20% of the three-year notes.  In trading, the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond fell slightly, while the yield rose to 8.09% from 8.08% on Monday.  In addition to lackluster demand for the notes, the Treasury market was hurt by the prospect of a large supply of short-term securities that the Treasury will sell as part of the savings and loan industry's bailout plan, dealers and analysts said.  Also, the Treasury's announcement of the unexpectedly large size of the $14.4 billion sale of short-term bills next Monday caused prices of short-term securities to fall, some traders said.  Treasury Securities  Treasury securities were mixed in moderate trading following the government's three-year note auction.  The Treasury's 30-year bonds were quoted late at 108 26/32, down slightly from 108 28/32 Monday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at 107 11/32, to yield 8.02%, compared with a price of 107 15/32 and yield of 8.01% Monday.  Short-term interest rates were mixed.  The discount rate on three-month bills was quoted at 8% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.28%.  The discount rate on the six-month Treasury bills was 7.71% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.14%.  At the note auction, the 7.93% annual yield on the three-year notes was the lowest since 7.42% on Feb. 2, 1988.  The yield was down from 9.12% at the previous three-year note auction in May.  Here are auction details:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  @ 3-Year Notes  @ Applications $28,608,370,000  @ Accepted bids $10,031,330,000  @ Accepted at low price 9%  @ Accepted noncompetitively $566,000,000  @ Average price (Rate) 99.856 (7.93%)  @ High price (Rate) 99.882 (7.92%)  @ Low price (Rate) 99.829 (7.94%)  @ Interest rate 7 7/8%  @ The notes are dated Aug. 15 and mature Aug. 15, 1992.  Corporate Issues  Despite carrying bondholder protection covenants, United Airlines' debt traded at 1989 lows yesterday on news of the takeover bid for its parent, UAL Corp.  The company's 12 1/2% senior subordinated notes due 1995 closed at 100 1/2, down about 2 1/2 points, after falling two points on Monday.  The 13% senior subordinated notes due 1998, which fell two points Monday, closed yesterday at 101, down another two points.  On Monday, UAL confirmed that Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis had proposed a bid believed to be well over $200 a share for its 21.6 million shares outstanding.  In the secondary market, corporate issues were unchanged to a bit lower after sporadic dealings.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were mixed in late dealings, having held to a narrow range for the bulk of the session.  Traders say an uninspired Treasury market and a mixed response to the more than $670 million in new issues of over $50 million each contributed to the lackluster secondary market performance.  "Municipals tried to do better this morning, but a couple of customer bid lists came out" in the afternoon, and with Treasurys off their highs, tax-exempts gave ground, said one trader.  A $150.7 million Connecticut general obligation bond issue topped the day's competitive new-issue slate.  The sale is the largest of tax-exempt bonds by a state scheduled this week.  About $77 million of the bonds remained in late order-taking, according to lead manager Marine Midland Capital Markets Corp.  A Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group was able to trim yields for $138.4 million of Virgin Islands Public Finance Authority's revenue bonds priced yesterday in one of the session's largest negotiated deals.  In the secondary market, New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was up 1/8 at 98 7/8.  The yield was about 7.29%, unchanged.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage-backed securities posted small price gains.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for August delivery were up 3/32 on the day at 98 1/32, implying a yield of 9.41%, assuming a 12-year average life.  The spread between the Ginnie Mae issue and the Treasury 10-year note narrowed to 1.41 percentage points from 1.44 late Monday.  Ginnie Mae 8 1/2% securities were up 4/32 at 95 25/32, and the 9 1/2% securities, at 100, were up 4/32.  Foreign Bonds  Prices of most foreign bonds moved higher.  In Japan, rumors that Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita is on vacation allayed dealers' fears that he might splash cold water on a strong bond market rally, as he has done a few times in recent weeks by voicing his disapproval of "speculative buying."  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at a price of 97.25, up 0.45 yen per 100 yen face value.  It's yield fell to 5.05%.  Volume in the issue was active at 2.125 trillion yen ($15.17 billion) on brokers' screens, up from 1.13 trillion yen Monday.  West German government bonds ended as much as 0.35 point higher.  Bonn's 6 3/4% issue due 1999 rose 0.30 point to 100.75 to yield 6.64%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 rose 0.125 point to 100.125 to yield 6.71%.  Among recent Eurobonds, the World Bank's 6 3/4% issue due 1999 ended at 99.35 to yield 6.84%, up 0.20 point.  In Britain, government bonds moved higher as the pound gained strenth.  Britain's benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 ended 15/32 higher at 115 30/32 to yield 9.61%, while the 12% issue due 1995 rose 13/32 to 106 5/8, to yield 10.36%.  West Germany's capital account deficit widened to 9.970 billion marks in June from a revised 7.697 billion marks in May, the Deutsche Bundesbank said.  The May capital account deficit was originally reported to be 9.190 billion marks.  The West German central bank said the long-term capital account surplus rose to 1.669 billion marks from a 68 million-mark surplus reported in May.  Amax Inc. paid $60.6 million to Chevron Corp. to adjust the price it paid last year to buy back a 15.5% holding of its stock from Chevron.  The additional $4 per share, for 15.2 million shares, was part of an agreement reached when Amax bought back the stock on May 20, 1988.  The original price was $23 a share, or $349 million.  Under the agreement, Chevron held a one-time right, exercisable within two years of the buy-back, to receive an additional payment per share.  If Amax's shares rose above $23, up to $28, Chevron could receive the excess per share.  Amax, a Greenwich, Conn., metals and energy company, said third-quarter earnings will reflect the difference between the value assigned on the original purchase date and the final amount, or about $41.7 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Amax shares closed $27.50, up 50 cents.  Carl Spaulding, 50 years old, was named to the new position of vice president, regional director of stores, of the Kids 'R' Us unit of this toy retailer.  He was general manager for the company's Detroit area.  Sorg Inc., a New York financial printer, said it filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Sorg said it had been unable to renegotiate bank agreements.  The company is in default on about $12 million in secured loan arrangements with Irving Trust Co. and on about $1.4 million in notes issued in connection with a 1987 acquisition.  Gilbert Sorg, chairman and chief executive officer, said, "Recent changes in our market have created serious cash-flow problems."  The financial-printing business hasn't fully recovered from the October 1987 market crash.  Charles P. Young Co., a financial printer owned by Darien, Conn.-based Century Partners Limited Partnership, recently made a Chapter 11 filing, citing a slowdown in business.  Sorg has labor negotiations scheduled for late fall.  The company's biggest plant, which is unionized, is in Manhattan.  Thomas P. Pollock and Charles S. Paul were named directors of this entertainment company.  Mr. Pollock is chairman of MCA Motion Picture Group.  Mr. Paul is president of MCA Enterprises.  Both men were also named executive vice presidents.  French business failures rose to a total of 4,440 in June from 2,447 in the previous month, according to unadjusted data published by the National Statistics Institute.  The state agency said in a communique that the June surge represented a catching up on court cases that were delayed by the high number of public holidays in May.  It didn't provide comparable unadjusted bankruptcy figures from June 1988.  Given the exceptional influence of one-time factors on June's data, the agency didn't give seasonally adjusted results for the month.  It noted, however, that the average number of business failures for May and June was 3,378 on an adjusted basis, compared with 3,247 in April and 3,571 in March.  The total was 3,116 for June 1988 and 3,063 for May 1988.  The latest results put the seasonally adjusted number of business failures for the past 12 months at 38,123, up from 33,173 in the year-earlier period.  Richard A. Voell, president and chief executive officer of Rockefeller Group, a real estate services and communications company, was elected a director of this financial services company.  The board expands to 15 members.  Long-awaited clinical trials to see if "laser sculpturing" of the eye can correct ordinary nearsightedness and farsightedness are under way.  Within the past few weeks, more than a dozen myopic American and German volunteers entered eye research laboratories and seated themselves in front of a computer-controlled laser.  In less than 40 seconds, the laser beam swept painlessly across a tiny circle on the eye surface, vaporizing microscopic layers of the cornea to reshape the lens.  Within two to three days, the patients viewed the world with normal or near-normal vision, unaided by either eyeglasses or contact lenses.  The trials hold considerable interest for the 140 million Americans who wear eyeglasses or contact lenses, as well as for the optical industry and optometric profession.  They also may determine the fates of three small companies -- Summit Technology Inc., Visx Inc. and Taunton Technologies Inc.; each has its own version of the highly specialized laser used in corneal sculpturing and each is racing to beat its two competitors to market with its laser.  Ophthalmology researchers caution that it will be another three to six months before they are confident the new laser sculpturing technique hasn't any untoward effects.  But so far, "it's looking super . . .  I'm very optimistic," says Herbert Kaufman of the Louisiana State University Eye Center in New Orleans.  Within the past month, eight patients have undergone laser sculpturing for nearsightedness at the New Orleans clinic and four more are being treated this week, Dr. Kaufman says.  In the past two months, ophthalmologist Theo Seiler at the University Eye Hospital in West Berlin treated four nearsighted patients with a laser and says he has three more scheduled for laser sculpturing in the next two weeks.  "The market is so large that no company will dominate it, but there's no question that the one who gets there first will have a significant advantage," says Roger Guidi, vice president of marketing for Visx in Sunnyvale, Calif.  In the U.S., Visx said it has approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to test its laser systems on nearsighted patients.  The Visx laser is being used by Dr. Kaufman.  Taunton said it has FDA approval to treat both nearsighted and farsighted patients.  The Taunton system is being used by ophthalmologists in Minneapolis and Oklahoma City, says William B. Telfair, vice president for research, at the company's headquarters in Monroe, Conn.  "Visx got the jump on us {in the U.S.} for normal nearsighted patients," concedes Summit president David Muller in Watertown, Mass.  But, Mr. Muller asserts, when Summit's FDA approval comes through, probably within three to four months, "we can move ahead a lot faster" with clinical trials since the company is already producing its laser system.  The company, he explains, has four clinics in the U.S. and several overseas poised to begin tests on nearsighted patients.  Dr. Seiler in West Berlin, who is already treating myopic patients, is using a Summit laser.  All three laser systems have been successfully tested on the eyes of blind patients and patients whose eyes were about to be removed because of cancer or other eye-destroying diseases.  These tests, on patients who volunteered, showed that the special laser could hone away microscopic layers of the cornea to reshape the lens and do so without producing any scarring or clouding of the lens.  In addition, several clinics have begun treating patients whose corneas have been distorted by infections, accidents, glaucoma or other pathological conditions.  Dr. Seiler in Berlin says that since October 1985, he's sculpted the lenses of 50 sighted patients suffering severe astigmatism, in which tiny bumps and depressions interrupt the smooth curvature of the lens, producing blurred vision.  Only two of the patients experienced no improvement in their vision, he says.  No long-term adverse effects have been seen in these patients.  The first patient, treated three and a half years ago, "is still happy and still doesn't wear glasses," Dr. Seiler says.  But it is in the correction of ordinary myopia (nearsightedness) and hyperopia (farsightedness) that laser sculpturing holds its biggest promise.  Myopia is caused by the lens in the cornea curving too sharply, focusing the light rays in front of the retina so that distant objects appeared blurred.  Hyperopia is caused by the lens being too flat, focusing light rays behind the retina and causing nearby objects to appear blurred.  In theory, the technique could correct any healthy eye that has less than 20-20 vision due to changes in the shape of the lens, which constitutes the vast majority of those who wear eyeglasses or contact lenses.  How extensively the technique will be used, however, depends on the outcome of the clinical trials.  If and when laser sculpting becomes available commercially, it probably will be offered by ophthalmologists at a cost to the patient of $1,000 to $1,500 per eye, both the companies and the researchers say.  The laser systems themselves are expected to cost from $250,000 to $400,000, depending on the amount of equipment purchased.  The idea that a laser could be used to reshape the eye lens grew out of research at International Business Machines Corp.'s laboratories in the early 1980s.  An IBM scientist, R. "Srini" Srinivasan, showed that the then-new excimer laser could vaporize living tissue to depths of only a few millionths of an inch at a time without producing any charring or other heat damage to underlying tissues.  There's some dispute as to who first thought of using the excimer laser to sculpt the corneal lens.  Ophthalmologist Stephen L. Trokel seems to have been the first to talk publicly about such excimer laser sculpturing.  But his Columbia University colleague down the hall, Francis A. L'Esperance Jr., applied for and received patents on the concept.  Dr. L'Esperance assigned the patents to Taunton, which he helped found.  Visx, which Dr. Trokel helped found, has filed interferences against the L'Esperance patents. (Summit's Mr. Muller says his company is a bystander in the patent dispute.)  In the clinical trials, the laser is being used first to correct only severe myopia.  The laser trims down the center of the lens, slightly flattening the curve. (In hyperopia the laser hones away the edges of the lens to increase the curvature.) Dr. Seiler in Berlin says it takes about 10 minutes to train a patient to keep the eye steady for the 30 seconds or so required for the laser to do its sculpting.  Other ophthalmologists say they hold a small ring on the eye to keep it steady.  The laser has a built-in microprocessor that automatically sculpts the lens into the correct shape once the ophthalmologist punches in the degree of correction needed.  Dr. Seiler said his first nearsighted patient was a 25-year-old woman machinist whose severe myopia in the left eye and moderate myopia in the right eye was interfering with her work and forcing her to wear extremely thick glasses.  She couldn't wear contact lenses because of the dirt and dust.  Sculpting restored normal vision to her left eye.  "Now she's really happy and can work using her left eye," he says.  Her right eye hasn't yet been treated, he says.  Up to now, the only way to correct nearsightedness, other than eyeglasses or contact lenses, has been an operation called radial keratotomy in which tiny slits are cut in the edges of the lens, causing it to flatten out.  Initially, radial keratotomy will continue to be used for mild to moderate myopia and laser sculpting will be restricted to moderate to severe cases, predicts ophthalmologist Michael Gordon, who's preparing to test the laser technique at the University of California, San Diego.  "Eventually, as time goes on and the laser proves itself and its range of uses increase, it will take over the whole field," Dr. Gordon says.  "Suppose you had the opportunity to lie under a laser for 20 to 30 seconds, not feel a thing, and have your need for eyeglasses eliminated permanently," he says.  "It sounds pretty good to me."  CONTINENTAL HEALTH AFFILIATES INC. (Englewood Cliffs, N.J.) -- Carl D. Glickman, president of Glickman Organization, a real-estate firm, was elected a director of this health-care services company.  The board expands to seven.  Del Electronics Corp., a maker of high-voltage power conversion systems, said it agreed to buy the RFI Corp. subsidiary of KDI Holdings Inc., which was taken private late last year.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Del cited some technical, marketing and operating efficiencies between it and RFI, which makes electronic filters and owns real estate in Bay Shore, N.Y. Del said RFI was profitable in 1988, on sales of about $10 million.  The transaction is expected to be completed in September.  Canadian Pacific Ltd. reported that second-quarter net income plunged 40%, a drop far more severe than many financial analysts forecast.  Canadian Pacific said net was 136.3 million Canadian dollars (US$116.1 million), or 43 Canadian cents a share, compared with C$230.4 million, or 76 Canadian cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue was C$2.80 billion compared with C$3.26 billion a year earlier.  Financial analysts surveyed by Zacks Investment Research Inc. had a mean net-income estimate of 54 Canadian cents a share.  Canadian Pacific said earnings were hurt in particular by a drop in profit at its CP Rail unit, where continuing weakness in grain traffic chopped profit to C$9.8 million from C$66.5 million.  Profit from forest products, shipping, and real estate operations also declined.  Canadian Pacific said it continues to expect "a good level of earnings this year."  It said it expects to report special gains of about C$155 million in the third quarter from asset sales and anticipates "significant land sales" in the second half.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Canadian Pacific shares closed at $22.25, down 25 cents.  Robert M. Teeter has been named a director of this producer of pickup truckbed liners and bug-and-gravel deflector shields.  Mr. Teeter is president of Coldwater Corp. of Ann Arbor, Mich., a research and analysis firm.  Robert McKee was named senior vice president, investment banking, at this investment firm that controls various apparel companies.  Mr. McKee, 39 years old, had been a vice president at PaineWebber Group Inc.  Corning Inc. said it agreed to dissolve an Australian joint venture.  Corning said it will take over the joint venture's housewares division, which distributes Corning consumer products in Australia.  ACI International Ltd., Corning's Australian partner, will operate the glassware division of the venture, and a science-products division will be sold.  The unit, Crown Corning Ltd., was established in 1972.  Sales last year were $52.6 million.  The companies said they decided they can operate individual business lines in Australia more efficiently.  Corning said the move will have no material effect on 1989 profit.  Thomas E. Walsh, formerly vice president, finance, and treasurer of Hein-Werner Corp., was named group vice president and chief financial officer of this maker of electronic petroleum-monitoring systems.  As chief financial officer, he succeeds Randolph J. Straka, who was named vice president, international division.  David J. Collard, 45 years old, was named chief financial officer and senior vice president, finance and administration, succeeding Harry George, 41, a co-founder of this electronic publishing software and systems maker, which said Mr. George "is resigning for health reasons associated with chronic heart disease."  Mr. George remains a director and will be a consultant.  Mr. Collard previously was vice president, customer service, at Prime Computer Inc.  IMA Holdings Corp., as expected, extended its $28-a-share tender offer for 94% of the shares of American Medical International Inc.  IMA, an investment group that includes the Pritzker family of Chicago and First Boston Corp., extended its $3.35 billion offer for the hospital chain until 12:01 a.m. EDT Aug. 24.  It was to expire today.  The offer is for as many as 68.8 million of American Medical's common shares.  IMA said that as of Monday, it had received tenders for about 6.7 million shares, including shares issuable upon conversion of convertible debentures.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, American Medical shares closed at $24.875, up 25 cents.  IMA said it is extending the offer to further review a congressional committee proposal that could eliminate the tax deductibility of certain interest payments or original issue discounts on debt securities used to finance the offer.  Anthony C. Nicholls, formerly a vice president and general manager at Fisher Scientific Group Inc., was named executive vice president of this maker of diagnostic products, succeeding Robert C.Y. Ting, who was recently named president and chief operating officer.  Scott's Hospitality Inc., Toronto, said it agreed to acquire the 128-outlet Manchu Wok system of Chinese food outlets from its founder, Jack Lew.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Scott's, which has interests in fast food, photography, transportation, and hotels, said Manchu Wok has 83 company-owned outlets and 45 franchised stores throughout Canada and the U.S.  Scott's said it plans to merge its existing chain of Gold Chin Chinese food stores with the Manchu Wok outlets.  The transaction is expected to close later this month.  Troubled generic drug maker Par Pharmaceutical Inc. said its president plans to retire, and the company expects to report a net loss of more than $1.7 million for the fiscal third quarter.  The loss for the quarter ended July 1 included about $3.5 million in after-tax charges relating to product recalls, fines related to guilty pleas by the company in a federal probe of generic drug companies, and certain inventory write-offs.  A year earlier, the company had net income of $2 million, or 18 cents a share, on sales of $24.7 million.  A spokesman said Par's president, Perry Levine, 68 years old, one of the company's founders, plans to retire when the company finds a successor.  A three-member committee has begun a search for a president.  The decision wasn't related to Par's recent legal troubles "except to the extent that there's been a whole lot more tension and pressure," said Richard J. Nadler, vice president, finance and administration.  Mr. Levine's doctor has been advising him to "cut back," because of health problems, Mr. Nadler said.  Mr. Levine couldn't be reached for comment.  Both Par and its Quad Pharmaceutical subsidiary recently pleaded guilty to one count of providing an unlawful gratuity to an employee of the Food and Drug Administration.  A former senior vice president of Par, Ashok Patel, and Dilip P. Shah, former president of Quad, each pleaded guilty to a related charge.  Subsequently, the company disclosed that it had filed false drug information with the FDA, was recalling one of its drugs and had stopped selling two others.  So far, Mr. Nadler said yesterday, the company has recalled three drugs.  Mr. Nadler said the recalls involve about 5% of sales.  An industry analyst, Hemant Shah, said that filling the company's top job will be very difficult due to resignations by other top officials; "you're looking to replace the skeleton of the company," he said.  Par stock fell 25 cents yesterday to close at $7.50 a share in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Sea Containers Ltd. said it's considering recapitalizing as an alternative to Stena AB and Tiphook PLC's $50-a-share unsolicited tender offer.  In a filing with the SEC, Sea Containers said: "A substantial thrust of the effort of management and advisers is to explore a recapitalization of the company which would entitle shareholders to receive a substantial distribution and would permit them to retain a continuing equity interest in the recapitalized company."  As reported, representatives of all three companies met last Thursday and discussed the possibility of a sale of certain assets of Sea Containers' ferry services and container businesses to Stena and Tiphook.  On Monday, Stena and Tiphook said they may sell all, or part, of their stake in Sea Containers.  Sea Containers said it has received indications of interest concerning possible asset sales and has had discussions with certain parties.  The tender offer is valued at about $777 million.  Sea Containers, based in Hamilton, Bermuda, is an equipment leasing and shipping concern.  Stena AB, a shipping concern, is based in Gothenburg, Sweden.  Tiphook is based in London.  Pioneer Electronic Corp. said it has revised upward its earnings projections for the first half ending Sept. 30, because of better-than-expected sales in North America and Europe.  Pioneer, a Japanese manufacturer of audio products, said it expects first-half pretax profit to total 16 billion yen ($115.3 million), up from an original estimate of 12 billion yen made in May and a 49% jump from a year earlier.  Net income is projected at 10.4 billion yen, up from an initial forecast of 9.6 billion yen and double last year's earnings.  Pioneer anticipates sales of some 175 billion yen during the six months, up from the earlier projection of 155 billion yen and a 19% gain from a year before.  McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. said it is extending to Sept. 1 its $110-a-share offer for the 90.2% of LIN Broadcasting Corp. it doesn't already own.  McCaw's $5.9 billion offer was scheduled to expire Friday.  To date, LIN holders have tendered about 1.1 million of the 48.8 million LIN shares not owned by McCaw.  LIN, based in New York, has rejected McCaw offer as inadequate.  McCaw, based in Kirkland, Wash., originally offered $120 a share for LIN but later cut that to the current $110-a-share level.  The dollar was weaker as participants took profits following the currency's gains during the past few days.  The dollar's drive ran out of gas as the market turned to watch the results of a three-day U.S. Treasury quarterly refinancing that started yesterday.  The U.S. producer price index and retail-sales data for July, both scheduled for release Friday, also have begun to draw attention.  The $10 billion in three-year notes auctioned by the Treasury got a lukewarm reception, but foreign-exchange dealers are more interested in today's sale of 10-year bonds and tomorrow's sale of 30-year bonds, both of which should better attract foreign investors.  Investors in the New York Federal Reserve District bought $9.51 billion of three-year notes.  Traders say the longer-term bond sales will win substantial participation from Japanese and other overseas investors, in turn supporting the dollar when they buy the currency to pay for bond purchases.  But dealers differed on how far bondmarket related buying can take the dollar.  Some predicted the currency will linger near 1.90 marks; others called for a rise to as high as 1.9250 marks by tomorrow.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.8925 marks, down from 1.9162 marks late Monday, and at 138.75 yen, below 140.05 yen.  Sterling was trading at $1.6265, up from $1.5991 Monday.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the dollar opened for trading at 138.72 yen, down from Tuesday's Tokyo close of 139.25 yen.  The dollar slid slowly through Asian and European trading Tuesday, when participants decided to take profits on the U.S. currency's sharp gains Friday and Monday.  Uncertainty surrounding the response to the Treasury financing helped trigger the drive to lock in profits.  The dollar remained depressed but above its lows through U.S. dealings in light activity.  Bond prices have fallen and yields have risen on the perception that a recent slide in interest rates, prompted by a series of Fed easings, has for the time being reached the end of its tether, traders said.  As a result, foreign interest in the 10-year and 30-year bonds should be fairly active, many predicted.  Gillie Augeri, vice president and chief dealer at Connecticut National Bank, Hartford, Conn., said she expects healthy purchases of 10-year and 30-year bonds by Japanese investors and an accompanying climb in the dollar.  About $19.5 billion of both bonds will be offered for sale.  However, participants are being kept on their toes by rumors that many Japanese investors have bought the dollars they need for U.S. government bond purchases and that the Bank of Japan will intervene to supply the market with dollars should the yen sink too far, some traders said.  If the response to today's bond auction is worse than expected, traders warned, participants who bought dollars during the past few days, anticipating elevated demand for the currency from abroad, may rush to dump their holdings.  A dollar move in either direction should be limited ahead of the July PPI and retail-sales figures, said Larry Weinman, a trader at the New York branch of Chicago's Harris Trust & Savings Bank.  If the index shows a rebound in prices or if retail sales pick up more than expected, the market will expect the Fed to delay easing credit again until at least the end of this month, opening the door for new dollar gains.  Lower interest rates generally reduce demand for the domestic currency by hurting returns on many interest-bearing investments.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $366.20 an ounce, up 30 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 2.4 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was quoted at $366.35 an ounce.  United Biscuits (Holdings) PLC said it agreed to sell its entire restaurant operation to Grand Metropolitan PLC for #180 million ($293 million).  The British maker of snack foods said the sale would allow it to concentrate on its core manufacturing operations.  United Biscuits' restaurant businesses include the Wimpy, Pizzaland and Perfect Pizza chains.  Grand Met, a British drinks, food and leisure company, last year bought Pillsbury Co. of the U.S., operator of the Burger King fast-food chain.  Private post offices, the storefront packaging and mailing stores cropping up in strip malls across the nation, are beginning to give the U.S. Postal Service a run for its money.  The Postal Service, which has been losing customers left and right to the alternative mail facilities, warned recently in a memorandum to its workers that it needs to meet the competition of the private post offices "head on."  But the service's first attempt to battle back -- an experiment started in October to offer mini-post offices in 10 Sears, Roebuck & Co. stores in suburban Chicago shopping malls -- was dropped by Sears this summer after a postal union complained about job security.  Now who should pop up in a Sears store but a private mailer, Pak Mail Centers of America.  Responding to an entreaty from Sears, Denver-based Pak Mail last spring opened a 900-square-foot outlet in the retailer's first Sears Ltd. specialty store, located on Chicago's North Side.  Pak Mail, along with its chief competitor, San Diego-based Mail Boxes Etc., and similar businesses, are post offices with an array of other services thrown in.  They sell stamps, and wrap and ship packages by mail or by express service.  Many stores have photocopy and fax machines, and sell greeting cards and packing material.  They also rent private post boxes that carry a street address and suite number, rather than a less prestigious P.O. box number.  This appeals to people running one-person businesses from their homes or elsewhere.  Says Evan Lasky, Pak Mail vice president for operations: "I've got customers who live in the woods in Wisconsin and their letterhead says LaSalle Street in Chicago.  That's a Pak Mail store."  Typically, private post offices lease space in strip malls and commercial buildings in suburban areas.  The inner-city Sears connection "is a radical departure for us," says Mr. Lasky.  Five-year-old Pak Mail reported earnings of $170,000 on sales of $1 million for the six months ended May 30.  Mail Boxes Etc., founded in 1980, earned $2.4 million on sales of $19.4 million in the year ended April 30.  The company says it typically costs $60,000 to $75,000 to get a franchise up and running.  Pak Mail has about 200 franchise outlets in 37 states.  Mail Boxes Etc. has about 1,000 franchise outlets in 46 states.  The U.S. Postal Service puts the number of private mail offices at about 7,000 and says they are growing faster than 1,000 a year.  What worries the Postal Service is that these storefront mail facilities serve as conduits that steer packages to private bulk mailers, such as Federal Express Corp. and United Parcel Service.  This means a lot of lost revenue for the Postal Service.  In a candid memo, Deputy Postmaster General Michael Coughlin raised the specter of buy-outs of the private post office chains by bulk shippers.  The result could be "a well-developed chain of retail outlets . . . to enhance their already popular expedited services . . . in effect, a 'postal service.'"  Government post office locations in high-traffic malls are "vital to meeting, head-on, the growing competition from alternative mailing service providers who use such outlets as Mail Boxes Etc. and Pak Mail," Mr. Coughlin wrote.  Ironically, Mail Boxes Etc. President Tony DeSio thinks department stores in giant malls are a bad location for private post offices.  "Our customers want to get in and out quickly.  They don't want to fight through mazes of parking lots," he says.  Mr. DeSio says his company is opening a Mail Boxes Etc. outlet at the rate of one a day.  Pak Mail says its arrangement with Sears avoids the mall traffic crunch.  Its office is located on the store's ground floor, and customers have 24-hour access to their mail boxes through a separate street entrance.  On weekdays, Pak Mail opens for business at 8 a.m., two hours before Sears.  At 10 a.m., when Sears opens its doors, a Pak Mail employee raises a large metal screen and the private post office becomes part of Sears's 34,000-square-foot interior.  Sears Ltd. store manager John Hargrove says Pak Mail -- and a handful of other concessions such as a shoe repair shop and delicatessen -- will help attract "non-Sears shoppers" to his store, a scaled-down version of the usual Sears mall store that offers a narrower range of merchandise tailored to the needs of the nearby residents.  "If they {Sears} roll this concept out, we have the right of first refusal in other parts of the country," says Pak Mail's Mr. Lasky.  Mr. Lasky believes Pak Mail will succeed where the U.S. Postal Service failed in its experiment with Sears.  He recalls wandering into Sears's giant Oak Brook Mall store in suburban Chicago and eventually discovering the post office in a back room on the second floor.  "It took me 20 minutes to find it," he says.  Both the Postal Service and Sears blame the venture's demise on pressure from the American Postal Workers Union.  The fact that the mini-post offices were staffed by Sears employees had drawn the ire of the union.  Jack Arslanian, operator of the Pak Mail outlet at Sears Ltd., says his store offers everything a government post office does, except registered mail, plus a range of other services.  "I may put in a couple of desks and let people come in and rent computers," he says.  Mr. Arslanian charges $20 a month for a mailbox and $1.25 minimum for each box shipped, plus wrapping and postage or freight charges.  He adds a 10% surcharge on stamps: a 25-cent postage stamp goes for 28 cents.  "Most people don't care" about the added charge, he says.  After four months, Mr. Arslanian says his store is pulling 70 to 80 customers a day.  Few continue on into Sears's adjoining retail space, but Mr. Hargrove, the Sears manager, is hopeful.  For Sears, he says, the association with Pak Mail "makes a ton of sense."  Peugeot S.A. said group revenue increased 14% in the first half, to 81.06 billion francs ($12.67 billion) from 71 billion francs a year earlier.  The French auto maker said foreign sales rose 16%, to 45.20 billion francs, while domestic sales increased 12%, to 35.86 billion francs.  Peugeot hasn't reported its earnings for the first half.  For all of 1988, group net income totaled 8.85 billion francs on revenue of 138.45 billion francs.  Analysts have said Peugeot's group profit for all of 1989 could run as high as 10.5 billion francs on sales of almost 155 billion francs.  Peugeot hasn't issued an earnings forecast for the year.  Texas Eastern Corp., a unit of Panhandle Eastern Corp., said it agreed to sell its La Gloria Oil & Gas Co. to Crown Central Petroleum Corp. of Baltimore.  The price wasn't disclosed.  Earlier this year, Houston-based Panhandle merged with Texas Eastern in a $3.22 billion transaction that loaded Panhandle with debt and forced it to sell Texas Eastern's non-pipeline assets.  La Gloria consists of a 50,000-barrel-a-day petroleum refinery, an East Texas pipeline and related assets.  Crown Central is an independent producer, refiner and marketer of petroleum products.  It already operates a 100,000 barrel-a-day refinery in Texas on the Houston Ship Channel.  Panhandle, now operator of one of the nation's largest natural-gas pipeline networks, said it expects that sale to be completed this fall.  The last remaining property from the Texas Eastern acquisition is a downtown Houston real-estate complex with a book value of $540 million.  Three futures traders became the first of 46 traders who were indicted here last week to plead guilty to defrauding customers.  The three, Brian and James Sledz, who are brothers, and Thomas Braniff, were traders in the Chicago Mercantile Exchange's yen-trading pit.  Their guilty pleas, as well as their cooperation with the continuing federal investigation of the futures markets, were expected.  Brian Sledz, 29, and James Sledz, 24, each pleaded guilty to one count of mail or wire fraud, and one count of commodities fraud, relating to yen-futures trades made in 1987.  Mr. Braniff, 33, pleaded guilty to two counts of both mail fraud and commodities fraud.  The Sledz brothers declined comment on their pleas, their attorneys said.  Mr. Braniff couldn't be reached.  The three men no longer are acting as traders.  Many of the remaining 19 yen-futures traders who were indicted are expected to be arraigned before U.S. District Court Judge George Marovich today.  The rest of the 46 traders are expected to be arraigned within two weeks.  As many as 30 of the indicted traders are expected to plead guilty and cooperate with the government's continuing investigation, people familar with the inquiry said.  More indictments are expected in coming months stemming from the two-year undercover investigation of futures trading on the Merc and the Chicago Board of Trade.  The Dow Jones Industrial average moved a bit closer to its record high as investors bought up some big cyclical stocks.  The average rose 4.18 to 2699.17, just 23.25 points below its August 1987 record close of 2722.42.  Gains in Boeing, Aluminum Co. of America, Eastman Kodak and International Business Machines accounted for most of its advance.  Broader averages were narrowly mixed.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index lost 0.06 to 349.35, while the New York Stock Exchange composite index gained 0.06 to 194.13.  New York Stock Exchange volume was heavy for the second consecutive day at 200,340,000 shares, compared with 197,580,000 Monday.  Contributing to the increased volume, traders said, were profit-taking, activity in takeover stocks, portfolio managers moving their holdings between sectors and foreign buying.  Portfolio managers' switch out of recession-resistant stocks and into shares more sensitive to economic growth continued.  Some accounts appear to be turning even more bullish and are jumping into technology stocks, traders said.  IBM gained 7/8 to 118 1/4 on volume of 2.6 million shares, while Digital Equipment rose 3 3/4 to 101 3/4 on 1.6 million shares.  The rush to technology issues also forced bearish speculators who had sold borrowed shares in the hope of buying them back later at lower prices to buy more shares to cover their positions, traders said.  Analysts said the market appeared to be registering a vote of confidence in the Federal Reserve's ability to keep the economy on a non-recessionary growth path.  Bank stocks were sold, a sign that investors don't expect interest rates to drop much further.  But the move to economically sensitive shares reflects expectations of good corporate earnings.  "We are somewhere between a soft landing and good earnings, even if interest rates stay high," one analyst said.  "Investors are walking a tightrope."  James Andrews, head of institutional trading at Janney Montgomery Scott, said the market will be in for a rude awakening if rates don't drop further.  "This market is artificially pumped up by foreign money and pension funds who think they've missed the rally," he said, but those props will give way if investors decide rates won't fall much further.  Among declining bank stocks, First Chicago fell 1 1/8 to 46 7/8, Citicorp slipped 7/8 to 31 7/8, and Chase Manhattan eased 3/8 to 38 3/4.  Insurance company stocks, also sensitive to interest rates, fell as well.  Kemper tumbled 3/4 to 44 5/8, and Loews dropped 1 1/8 to 120 1/4.  Yesterday, however, investors clearly weren't focusing on interest rates but on the market's ability to rally.  Buy orders materialized whenever stocks traded lower.  "The sell-offs just aren't lasting," said Sid Dorr, vice president, sales and trading, at Charles Schwab & Co. in San Francisco.  Takeover speculation fueled much of the interest.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average, which posted a historic single-day rise of 94.06 Monday, gained an additional 11.74 to 1355.80.  UAL, the subject of a takeover offer, again led the average higher, rising 8 1/2 to 219 1/4 on nearly two million shares.  Boeing, the best performer in percentage terms among the 30 industrial average stocks, jumped 2 1/2 to 53 7/8, a 4.9% rise.  Kodak gained 1 3/8 to 49, Alcoa rose 1 3/8 to 74, and Woolworth rose 1 1/4 to 60 5/8.  Those rallies allowed the average to withstand selling of two issues that had been among Monday's better performers: International Paper, which dropped 1 5/8 to 55 3/8, and Westinghouse Electric, which fell 2 1/4 to 70.  Elsewhere in the technology sector, Wang Laboratories Class B advanced 1 1/8 to 6 7/8 in American Stock Exchange trading of 2.8 million shares.  Frederick A. Wang, son of founder An Wang, resigned as president and chief operating officer.  Other issues in the group were mixed, in contrast to Monday's broad gain.  NCR advanced 1 1/2 to 63 5/8, Data General fell 1/4 to 17 1/8, Hewlett-Packard dropped 1/2 to 57, Cray Research rose 1/2 to 45 1/4, Unisys slipped 1/4 to 21 3/4, and Motorola lost 1 3/8 to 59 7/8.  Similarly, cyclical stocks fell short of repeating their across-the-board gain.  Dow Chemical climbed 2 to 97 1/2 on 1.7 million shares, W.R. Grace gained 1 to 34 3/4, and Armco rose 3/4 to 12 7/8 on 1.6 million shares; on the other hand, paper producers' stocks were generally weak, and Monsanto went down 1 3/8 to 118 5/8 while Du Pont fell 1/4 to 119 1/4.  USAir Group dropped 1 5/8 to 51 3/8 after taking steps to reduce the risk of takeover by a group headed by investor Michael Steinhardt.  The company sold preferred stock convertible to a 12% stake to Berkshire Hathaway, controlled by investor Warren Buffett, expanded a stock purchase program and said it is considering an employee stock ownership plan.  Takeover fever continued elsewhere in the airline group, however.  Apart from UAL's continued surge, Midway Airlines rose 1 1/2 to 20 1/2; Ampco-Pittsburgh said it has a 6.6% stake in the company and may seek control.  Delta Air Lines advanced 2 1/4 to 76 3/4, and AMR, which owns American Airlines, gained 2 3/8 to 73 7/8.  Selected thrift issues rallied on further speculative buying, tied to provisions in bailout legislation that allow commercial banks to acquire healthy thrifts immediately.  HomeFed surged 4 1/2 to 44, CalFed gained 1 1/2 to 28, GlenFed went up 1 3/8 to 24, Dime Savings Bank of New York rose 1 5/8 to 16 1/4, and Downey Savings & Loan Association added 7/8 to 28 7/8.  Hilton Hotels rose 1 1/8 to 107 7/8 amid rumors that its board plans to meet tomorrow.  Analysts told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report they believe the board will give its investment bankers clearance to pursue a possible sale of the company.  Stocks of other casino operators posted gains as well.  Holiday rose 5/8 to 70, Circus Circus Enterprises advanced 3/4 to 44 1/2, and Caesars World gained 1 3/4 to 39 3/4.  Paramount Communications climbed 2 5/8 to 59 5/8 on rumors that Chris-Craft Industries may use proceeds from the imminent sale of its stake in Warner Communications for a takeover attempt.  Paramount declined to comment.  Some other entertainment stocks also reversed recent slumps; Walt Disney jumped 4 5/8 to 119 3/8, and MCA rose 1 5/8 to 68 7/8.  Wal-Mart Stores fell 1 3/4 to 41 3/8 on two million shares as the retailer's second-quarter earnings report proved disappointing.  Analysts at PaineWebber and Bear Stearns said they may lower their estimates of fiscal-year earnings.  Artra Group added 1 3/8 to 22 7/8.  The company reached an agreement to sell a major part of its Sargent-Welch Scientific operations to a unit of VWR. Terms weren't disclosed.  The American Stock Exchange Index set another record, gaining 1.78 to 380.96.  Volume totaled 16,350,000 shares, compared with 13,120,000 Monday.  There were 296 issues advancing, 301 declining and 268 unchanged.  OMI rose 3/8 to 9 3/4.  The company reported improved second-quarter earnings and said it expects to post pretax gains totaling $17 million in the third and fourth quarters from tanker sales.  The Internal Revenue Service said it will cut the rate it charges on underpayment of taxes to 11% for the fourth quarter from 12% in the current quarter.  The agency also lowered the rate it pays on overdue refunds, to 10% from 11%.  This charge usually applies to refunds that aren't paid within 45 days after a return is filed or the filing deadline, whichever is later.  The IRS adjusts the interest rates quarterly, based on the yield of outstanding short-term Treasury securities.  UAL Corp. Chairman Stephen M. Wolf may be a highly skilled executive, but he also has been riding a lucky streak.  He headed Republic Airlines just when NWA Inc., parent of Northwest Airlines, was looking for a merger partner to expand its domestic routes.  At Mr. Wolf's nudging, NWA acquired Republic with Mr. Wolf profiting handsomely from the transaction in the process.  Next, he presided over a record year at Tiger International Inc., just as UAL was looking for a new chairman.  The Chicago parent of United Airlines wanted him so badly, it paid a $15 million bonus just to get him.  Now, Mr. Wolf finds himself in another situation in which he could score big as UAL faces an unsolicited offer from investor Marvin Davis.  What is usually the beginning of a corporate nightmare for most chief executives well could turn into the chance of a lifetime for Mr. Wolf.  Persons who've worked with the reserved, six-foot-six-inch executive say there is a strong possibility he will end up owning a big part of the company.  His exploits already have brought him considerable personal wealth.  He earned $575,000 last year as UAL chairman, and it's estimated he walked away from Republic and Tiger with $22 million from his stock options.  And the investment community loves him.  "He has intense fundability on Wall Street," one airline analyst says.  In fact, even when Tiger's stock was in the doldrums, institutional investors bought it based on Mr. Wolf's reputation.  They weren't disappointed.  Tiger was trading at about $5 when Mr. Wolf came on board.  The company was sold this year to Federal Express for $21 a share.  Mr. Wolf declined to be interviewed for this article.  Much in his personal makeup suggests that he may propose a management-led buy-out, especially if Mr. Davis's offer triggers an auction, as it well could.  "He is absolutely driven toward success.  Failure is simply not in his vocabulary," says Redmond Tyler, a public relations specialist who worked closely with Mr. Wolf at Republic.  Adds UAL director Ralph Strangis, "He spares no personal effort in what he sets out to do."  He is also financially adroit and opportunistic, others say.  Mr. Wolf would certainly profit from a management-led buy-out.  He owns 250,000 UAL shares in stock options.  If he exercised the options at today's stock price, he would have a profit of about $35 million.  If UAL sells for $250 a share, as many analysts predict it could, he would earn about $42 million.  Friends cite other reasons why he would want to stay at United's helm.  They say he likes Chicago and has put down roots there.  Last year, Mr. Wolf married for the first time, at age 47.  His wife is a former American Airlines executive who quit her post to move here.  He also has become active in the community.  The Chicago Tribune praised him recently for visiting schools in poorer city neighborhoods where he preaches the gospel of hard work and study.  Whether UAL's board would support a leveraged buy-out is another matter.  But such an effort could win the support of UAL's largest shareholder, financier Saul Steinberg, who formerly owned Tiger and is a friend of Mr. Wolf's.  Mr. Steinberg declined to comment.  Mr. Strangis, a Minneapolis attorney who also served on Republic's board, says a management-led buy-out is "one of the alternatives" available, but won't say if it's something the board would favor.  Still, Mr. Wolf's support on the board is considerable, he says.  "He's shown his greatest skill in the day-to-day operation of the company," he says of Mr. Wolf, who took over in December 1987.  After seven years of meager earnings, UAL has been highly profitable under Mr. Wolf, earning a record $376.5 million last year.  He spent his first year putting a new management team in place, filling many top positions with loyal associates from his previous jobs.  He also concentrated on refinancing the debt UAL had taken on to fund a special shareholder dividend in 1987.  Bolder initiatives have marked his second year.  United recently ordered $19 billion in new aircraft, launched service to Mexico and set plans to fly to Europe for the first time starting in the spring.  No detail of running the company has proved too trivial.  Mr. Wolf got personally involved in changes the company made to its frequent-flier program last year, even overseeing the contents of letters informing passengers, travel agents and others of the changes.  This hands-on management approach often stretches his workday from 6 a.m. to 11 p.m., though colleagues say he sometimes takes a break to run a treadmill and lift weights or meet with groups of school children in his office, springing personally for their lunch and souvenir United Airlines T-shirts.  Mr. Wolf's detractors claim United's recent successes are due less to his skill than to groundwork laid by his predecessor, former chairman and UAL director Frank A. Olson, and the general upward earnings trend in the airline industry.  "A monkey could have run United Airlines this year and gotten the same results," says Frederick C. Dubinsky, chairman of United's pilots union.  Indeed, under Mr. Wolf, United has continued to lose market share to archrival American Airlines, now the nation's largest airline.  Mr. Wolf spent 15 years at American in marketing and other posts.  Mr. Wolf's challenge isn't just on the financial side.  After 10 years without a fatal crash, United suffered two lethal accidents within the past six months.  Though the causes of the accidents haven't been determined, they have focused attention on United's maintenance procedures.  In the weeks to come, Mr. Wolf will have to show federal safety officials that United's recent problems aren't due to any serious, systemwide lapse in safety practices.  Associates say the accidents took a personal toll on Mr. Wolf.  He flew to Sioux City, Iowa, the site of last month's accident, to meet with survivors; more than 111 people were killed, including some United employees.  But in the executive suite, United's labor unrest remains his most pressing problem.  The flight attendants have refused to accept his demand for work rule concessions and recently voted to approve a strike if an agreement isn't reached soon.  The pilots union also has threatened to strike or launch its own takeover bid.  To underscore their dismay with current contract negotiations, the pilots have been taxiing their aircraft more slowly than normal and have refused to fly the company's new Boeing 747-400 aircraft.  Union leaders say the financial rewards the company was willing to give Mr. Wolf only serve to make his demands for a two-tier wage scale for pilots and work rule concessions from flight attendants even less palatable.  But close associates caution about underestimating Mr. Wolf's powers of persuasion.  "He has an uncanny ability to motivate people," says a former United executive.  Some people familiar with his views say he may try to win labor peace by offering employees an ownership stake if he decides to try a leveraged buy-out.  "There's a real concern on his part that the well-being of United's employees are addressed in this process," one associate says.  The diaper that made disposable a household word is about to be changed.  Procter & Gamble Co., keenly aware that Pampers has lost a startling chunk of market share, isn't talking.  But people close to the consumer-products company say a new, improved Pampers -- along with an expensive ad campaign -- will come before year end.  "They say they have to do something," says Bonita Austin, analyst with Wertheim Schroder & Co. "Pampers isn't No. 1 anymore," adds Hugh Zurkuhlen of Salomon Brothers, "and that disappoints them."  Pampers is now the underdog, and making a comeback will be tough.  Its share of the market has eroded to about 26% -- down from 59% in 1980 and down from 75% in the mid-1970s.  Huggies, meanwhile, the rival brand made by Kimberly-Clark Corp., has grabbed 31% of the market, up from a mere 9% in 1980.  Some analysts claim that P&G, after making early improvements in super-absorbency, essentially ignored Pampers.  Kimberly-Clark, meanwhile, hasn't stopped tinkering with Huggies in recent years.  Both products are about the same price, but Huggies has been aggressive in making changes such as softer elastic and in advertising those improvements.  "Procter fell asleep too long with Pampers," Mr. Zurkuhlen says.  Yet another reason for Pampers' decline is a sibling rivalry with Luvs, also made by P&G.  Luvs' share has grown to 24% from 11% in 1980, largely at the expense of Pampers.  Luvs Deluxe, diapers with strategic lining designed in a boys' version and a girls' version, has been particularly successful.  But in bringing out Luvs, the company wanted to create a premium segment; it hadn't intended to rob Pampers of sales.  And even with Pampers and Luvs together, P&G's diaper market share isn't what it used to be.  On top of everything, the diaper market is relatively flat, with sales steady at about $3.5 billion a year.  The new Pampers is likely to include one or more improvements.  It may be thinner or have better-sticking tape fasteners.  Or it may include "cuffs" that block leakage around the leg openings.  Cincinnati-based P&G already sells cuffed diapers in Japan, but Huggies has beat them to the U.S. Earlier this year, Dallas-based Kimberly added a strip of cuff-like material inside the leg openings of its Huggies Supertrims.  The material acts as a dam to stop leakage.  The diaper, available in a few Western states, is expected to be launched soon nationwide.  The new Pampers is bound to trigger a diaper battle.  "We'll probably get another marketing war," with both P&G and Kimberly-Clark advertising heavily and offering lots of coupons, says Jack Salzman, analyst with Goldman, Sachs & Co. Prices could also come down.  Kimberly-Clark won't comment, but marketing specialists say Huggies isn't going to yield ground easily.  "Huggies has got a lot of momentum going already," and that will only increase with the new cuffed product, predicts Lynne Hyman, analyst with First Boston Corp.  Meanwhile, both Pampers and Huggies face the challenge of coming up with biodegradable diapers to answer growing environmental concerns.  RMed International Inc. of Sedona, Ariz., claims its diaper is more than 90% biodegradable, compared with 60% for most disposable diapers.  P&G disputes RMed International's claims of a superior product.  Still, it may soon begin test marketing in Europe a diaper that has corn starch, an ingredient found to speed disintegration of plastic.  President Bush is close to deciding who will become the new chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, and administration officials say White House aide Richard Breeden is the clear front-runner.  But administration aides also caution that Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady hasn't signed off on the selection of Mr. Breeden.  Mr. Brady, a close confidant of the president, still could attempt to persuade Mr. Bush to pick economist Paul MacAvoy, the candidate preferred by some Treasury officials.  The search for an SEC chairman to succeed departing David Ruder has dragged on for months.  But several officials said there is a good chance Mr. Bush will make his choice either by the end of this week or early next, before he leaves for a vacation in Maine.  Mr. Breeden is an assistant to President Bush and was the White House point man in pushing through Congress the recently completed savings-and-loan rescue package.  He was deputy counsel in Mr. Bush's vice presidential office, and was staff director of the task group on financial regulation that Mr. Bush led as vice president.  One administration official involved in the selection process said Mr. Breeden is "way out in front" of any other candidate.  The aide also said Mr. Breeden is the choice preferred by White House Chief of Staff John Sununu.  Mr. Breeden is an attorney with experience in finance and securities.  Before taking his current White House post, he was a partner in the law firm of Baker & Botts and was head of its finance department in Washington.  Sun Microsystems Inc. has gained a powerful European ally in its bid for dominance in a new generation of microprocessors, the "brains" of today's computers, cars and consumer products.  Sun will license a division of N.V. Philips of the Netherlands to design and sell chips based on Sun's Sparc chip, said Sun, which is based in Mountain View, Calif.  The chip employs reduced-instruction-set-computing or RISC, a technology that makes for fast, powerful microprocessors.  In Philips, Sun has won a European ally that it hopes will provide an edge over competitors.  Motorola Inc., MIPS Computer Systems Inc. and Hewlett-Packard Co. are jockeying to woo computer makers to their own RISC chips.  The chips are rapidly gaining popularity among computer makers, and the one that gets the most converts could become a de facto standard in tomorrow's computer industry.  Philips, with $28 billion in 1988 revenue, is among the world's biggest electronics companies and has far-flung operations around the world.  "Philips is a formidable operation in Europe," said Millard Phelps, an analyst with Hambrecht & Quist.  "That's good for the band-wagon effect that's taking place" around Sun's Sparc chip.  "It puts a ton of momentum behind Sparc," said Sun President Scott McNealy.  Sun has been working for years to find a European producer of its chip, he said.  "It really fills out our geographic vendor" network, he said.  Sun now has six suppliers of its chips in the U.S., Japan and Europe.  The Philips deal also gives Sparc a foot in the door of a new market-consumer electronics.  Until now, most of the Sparc chips have been designed into workstations -- powerful desktop computers -- and other information-processing equipment.  Philips will build Sun's Sparc architecture into so-called embedded controllers, the chips that control "intelligent" machines such as televisions, telephones and automobile-engine controls.  Philips also will build the processors into chips tailored for use in military and telecommunications products, and will build Sparc chips for use in general purpose computers.  What is more, Philips gives Sun the European supply of chips its plant in Scotland will need in 1992, when the European-content requirements become effective.  Manufacturers will be required to buy many of their electronic components from companies that produce them on European soil.  RISC-chip companies have been racing to set up international networks.  Hewlett-Packard has agreed to work with Japan's Hitachi Ltd. and Samsung Electronics Co., Korea's biggest electronics conglomerate, in developing a set of RISC chips and workstations that use them.  MIPS has licensed Japan's NEC Corp. to make the U.S. company's chips.  Other licensees of Sun's chips include Texas Instruments Inc., Fujitsu Ltd. Cypress Semiconductor Corp., LSI Logic Corp. and Bipolar Integrated Technology.  Philips said it chose the Sun chip because of cost, the wide range of software available for it and because it was adaptable for many different applications.  But Sun's competitors say Philips may have had little choice.  MIPS licensed Siemens of West Germany to make its RISC chips early this year and Motorola has agreed to allow France's Thomson-CSF to make a military version of its 88000 series of RISC chips.  MIPS declined to give a license to Philips, which approached MIPS several months ago, said Bob Miller, chairman and chief executive officer of MIPS.  Motorola and MIPS officials said Sun has created lots of chip-making capacity but still has too few users of its chip architecture to constitute an industry standard.  "We continue to be the market-share leader," said MIPS's Mr. Miller.  "Sun keeps making grand announcements and we keep getting companies that ship our product."  Philips' decision to make the Sparc chip isn't surprising, said Jeff Nutt, technical marketing manager for Motorola's RISC chip, because Sun's charges so little for licensing rights.  "Sun will sell the right to manufacture to anyone who walks in the door," he said.  "It's so cheap you get one just to have one and go on with what you really plan."  Responded Mr. McNealy, "That sounds like sour grapes to me."  Curtice-Burns Foods Inc. expects to report that net income in the fourth quarter ended June 30 declined 20% to $3.9 million, or 69 cents a share, from the year-earlier $4.9 million, or 88 cents a share.  Year-earlier net included operating profit of $3.3 million, or 61 cents a share, and a one-time net gain of $1.5 million.  David J. McDonald, president and chief executive officer, said sales surged 38% to about $223 million from $162 million.  For the year, he estimated that net increased 3.5% to about $14.9 million, or $2.67 a share, from the year-earlier $14.4 million, or $2.60 a share.  Fiscal 1988's net included operating profit of $12.9 million, or $2.33 a share, the one-time gain of $1.5 million from the sale of franchises held by its National Brands Beverage division and a charge of eight cents a share from the consolidation of two divisions.  Sales for the year just ended climbed about 16% to $807 million from $695 million, Mr. McDonald said.  The food company processes and markets several dozen regional brands as well as private-label products.  Star performers in fiscal 1989 were the frozen and canned vegetable divisions and oat divisions, Mr. McDonald said.  "Everything did well but snack foods, which are driven by potato chips, which were hurt because of the short supply of potatoes," he said.  Looking ahead, Mr. McDonald said he expects a "good increase" in earnings and sales for fiscal 1990, "provided we have a normal agricultural year."  The company had to make late plantings of many crops this spring because of heavy rains, "and now we're sitting on tenterhooks waiting to see when the first freeze comes.  If it's late, we're in good shape."  Earnings growth trailed sales increases, Mr. McDonald said, because "we're in a transitional period, absorbing five acquisitions" made in the past two years.  Further acquisitions "are probable" this year, Mr. McDonald said.  The company will stick to its strategy of seeking companies that fit existing businesses.  Capital spending will total about $34 million in the current fiscal year as the company continues to upgrade plants.  In fiscal 1989, capital outlays totaled $51 million, with $11 million going to sharply expand production of oat bran at its Cedar Rapids, Iowa, plant, and another sizable amount to launch a line of microwave chili and other entrees in single-serving packs.  The average interest rates at Citicorp's weekly auction of commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, rebounded from levels recorded last week.  The average rates have dropped in five of the past seven auctions.  At the bank holding company's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day paper, the average moved to 8.347%, up from 8.064% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $495.6 million were submitted and all the accepted bids were at 8.347%.  Also, the average rate rose to 8.058% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 7.80% at last week's sale.  For that maturity, bids totaling $495 million were submitted.  Accepted bids were at 8.058%.  Citicorp will auction another $50 million of each maturity next Tuesday.  Junk bondholders are putting tycoons on notice: Asset stripping is taboo.  Some great American fortunes have been made in recent years by financiers who buy companies the cheap way.  They acquire companies and pay the takeover bill by selling the target's assets.  But for "junk" holders of a company with big debts and little equity, assets are the only things that protect the value of their bonds.  As New York radio tycoon Robert Sillerman has learned, bondholders are starting to rebel when assets are shuffled out of a company they invested in.  Mr. Sillerman, 41 years old, controls a closely held communications empire valued at around $1 billion.  He built it by running and trading radio stations, initially together with disk jockey "Cousin" Bruce Morrow.  Mr. Sillerman now plans to sell stations to a top radio group, Westinghouse's Group W Radio, for an estimated $375 million, including cash, Group W Radio stock and a board seat.  But because of the way Mr. Sillerman earlier stripped assets from a company he bought, Metropolitan Broadcasting, to buy out its owner Morgan Stanley, the financier has just been hit with two separate bondholder lawsuits.  Some plaintiffs allege Mr. Sillerman "fraudulently" stripped assets from Metropolitan, hurting their junk bonds.  They are also suing Morgan Stanley over its role in the deal.  Lawsuits are "a risk one runs when one does these transactions," Mr. Sillerman says.  He insists all his deals are "on firm legal ground" and vows, "We will fight {bondholders} no matter what."  Morgan Stanley won't comment.  Last week, after trying since March to negotiate a sale of their bonds to Mr. Sillerman, two Metropolitan creditors in New York, Steinhardt Partners and Huff Asset Management, took to the courts; they want to undo the Metropolitan deal or be made whole.  Together, they hold about 30% of Metropolitan's junk bonds.  The company's bonds, with a face value of $218 million, are said to represent the biggest radio junk issue in history.  A second lawsuit was filed by some high-yield investment trusts.  Mr. Sillerman bought Metropolitan last December from Morgan Stanley.  The investment bank wanted to unload a $20 million equity investment in Metropolitan, which went private in a 1986 leveraged buy-out.  Metropolitan owns popular radio stations such as WNEW-FM in New York City and KTWV-FM in Los Angeles, but apparently wasn't doing as well as expected.  Because Metropolitan is debt-heavy, Morgan Stanley didn't think Mr. Sillerman could get a loan to buy it, says a person close to Morgan Stanley.  But Mr. Sillerman "made Metropolitan pay for itself," says Charles Davidson of Steinhardt Partners.  Mr. Davidson has led several junk-holder revolts, sometimes successfully.  Mr. Sillerman's tab for Metropolitan was $300 million, including debt assumed and an estimated $40 million cash payment for Morgan Stanley's equity stake.  To pay Morgan Stanley, Mr. Sillerman got a temporary bank loan, which he instantly repaid by selling one of Metropolitan's four ratio stations.  He retains control of that station, because he sold it to an entity he controls, Command Communications.  And Mr. Sillerman's merchant bank, Sillerman Magee, got a $1.6 million fee.  In effect, Mr. Sillerman paid himself a fee and took control of Metropolitan without risking a dime, just by shuffling assets.  Pensions & Investment Age, a trade publication, declared this to be one of 1988's smartest deals.  What about bond-holders? asks Steinhardt's Mr. Davidson.  "We lose a station, and $40 million leaves the company."  If Metropolitan sells assets, the proceeds must go to the company, according to its bond covenants, he adds.  The Steinhardt suit alleges Morgan Stanley, among others, "conspired" with Mr. Sillerman to defraud junk-holders.  Morgan Stanley originally underwrote Metropolitan bonds and should have protected holders, the plaintiffs say.  Robert Miller, a lawyer for Steinhardt, says that in his talks with Morgan Stanley, its representatives never disputed that assets were wrongfully taken from Metropolitan.  Morgan Stanley owned Metropolitan junk, too, but its estimated $20 million gain from selling its Metropolitan stake to Mr. Sillerman probably exceeded any losses on its bonds.  Metropolitan's 13 1/4% junk is now quoted at about 87 cents on the dollar, down from the low 90s in 1988, traders say.  Metropolitan's zero-coupon bonds are in the 50s, down from the 60s.  If Mr. Sillerman doesn't settle with junk-holders and they win their suits, he might have to put $40 million into Metropolitan or into bond-holders' hands, compensating for the radio station he transferred to Command.  Bond-holders also could block or delay the Group W Radio deal.  The sale of Metropolitan and other properties would be one of the biggest radio transactions ever, making Group W Radio perhaps the nation's biggest radio group.  And the deal would give Mr. Sillerman a stake in Group W Radio and a seat on the board of the Westinghouse unit.  But Richard Harris, chairman of Group W Radio, says, "I don't think anyone would want a board member with a lawsuit on his hands.  If the lawsuit has not been settled, the deal can't go forward, so he {Mr.  Sillerman} can't go on our board."  Group W Radio has agreed to give the Sillerman group $135 million so he can buy all of Metropolitan's junk from holders.  The sum represents 80 cents on the dollar for holders; the bonds' accumulated value now is at about $170 million.  If Metropolitan holders want more than $135 million, Group W Radio's Mr. Harris says the money must come from Mr. Sillerman's pocket.  Bond-holders would like an extra $35 million.  They figure Mr. Sillerman will profit handsomely from the Group W Radio deal, perhaps making a $70 million profit just from reselling Metropolitan.  "I'm amazed we couldn't come to an agreement," says Steinhardt's Mr. Davidson.  "He's got so much at risk."  Howard Tytel, the Sillerman group's general counsel, says junk-holders could have challenged the Metropolitan deal last August, when approval was sought from federal communications regulators.  Public comment was invited at the time, but junk-holders didn't start negotiating with the Sillerman group until March, when the Group W Radio deal was in the works, he says.  Mr. Tytel apparently thinks junk-holders are staging a holdup.  Trouble is, junk-buyers weren't watching the regulatory proceedings.  Until Metropolitan filed a disclosure in March with the Securities and Exchange Commission, they were in the dark.  E. Robert Wallach, former confidant and personal legal adviser of ex-Attorney General Edwin Meese, was convicted of racketeering and conspiring to defraud the U.S. for his role in the Wedtech Corp. scandal.  Mr. Wallach's co-defendants, W. Franklyn Chinn and R. Kent London, were found guilty of racketeering, fraud and conspiracy.  The three men were charged with receiving illegal payments from Wedtech in return for trying to influence Mr. Meese and other federal officials on behalf of Wedtech, a defunct defense contractor.  The verdicts mark the latest chapter of the Wedtech political corruption case, which earlier resulted in convictions of a former U.S. representative from New York, a former Bronx, N.Y., borough president and Wedtech executives.  Attorneys for Mr. Wallach, Mr. Chinn and Mr. London said they would appeal the convictions.  Sentencing was set for Oct. 16.  Mr. Wallach began serving as an adviser to Wedtech in 1981.  Mr. Chinn, formerly a financial adviser to Mr. Meese, and Mr. London became financial consultants to Wedtech in 1985.  In addition to prison sentences, the three face stiff forfeiture penalties because they were convicted under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Law.  Under that act, they can be required to turn over all money they earned through the racketeering enterprise, which the government alleges amounted to $1.9 million.  The jury found Mr. Wallach guilty of receiving illegal payments totaling about $425,000 from Wedtech in return for using his influence in the Reagan administration to get contracts for the company.  Mr. Meese, a longtime friend of Mr. Wallach, testified in the trial that Mr. Wallach had never sought preferential treatment for Wedtech.  Mr. Wallach testified that his role at Wedtech wasn't to help the South Bronx, N.Y., company get government contracts.  Rather, Mr. Wallach said, the small, minority-owned company needed his advice and connections to get financial backing and legal assistance.  In his testimony, Mr. Wallach said Wedtech wanted his help because "I could speak to the white world."  He told the jury that Wedtech's South Bronx image made the company appear vulnerable and unsophisticated.  But Mario Moreno, former Wedtech Corp. vice chairman, testified that the money was paid in return for Mr. Wallach's promise that he would help the company later as an appointed official of the Justice Department.  Although Mr. Wallach and Mr. Meese discussed the possibility of Mr. Wallach's joining the Justice Department, he was never offered the post.  Mr. Moreno, who earlier this year was sentenced to 18 months in jail for his role in a bribery and kickback scheme involving Wedtech, said the payments were treated as consulting fees but that Mr. Wallach never provided the specified services.  The government charged Mr. Wallach, Mr. Chinn and Mr. London with conspiring to defraud the U.S. because government contracts were allegedly used to pay for those services that weren't provided.  The jury cleared Mr. Chinn and Mr. London of conspiring to defraud the government, but convicted them of RICO conspiracy charges.  Mr. Chinn was found guilty of defrauding the company by charging $23,763.77 of personal expenses to company credit cards.  In addition, Mr. Chinn and Mr. London were convicted of securities fraud and mail fraud.  Although Mr. Wallach was convicted of one RICO count, he wasn't found guilty of the RICO conspiracy count.  Mr. Wallach faces a maximum sentence of 45 years in prison.  Mr. Chinn and Mr. London, who were both found guilty of two RICO counts, face as much as 40 years in prison each on the charges.  They face additional sentences on the lesser charges.  After the proceedings ended, Mr. Wallach, his voice cracking, said, "I am guilty of nothing, except being in the wrong place at the wrong time with the wrong people."  He called the racketeering charges against him "a contortion of the law.  The {RICO} law never was intended for cases of this kind."  United Telecommunications Inc. said it adopted a new shareholder-rights plan because the exercise price of its previous plan was too low.  The company also called for redemption of preferred-stock purchase rights under the old plan.  A company official said the market price for the company's stock recently had been approaching too close to the $80 exercise price of the earlier plan.  That plan was launched in 1986 when the company's shares were trading at around $29 a share.  Under the new plan, the rights will be exercisable at $235.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, United Telecommunications closed at $80.625, up $2.625.  James Dodd, the company's general counsel, said its investment bankers advised the company to set the exercise price at a level three times its stock price.  In the event of a takeover bid that would trigger the rights, Mr. Dodd said, a too-low exercise price could put a drag on the company's market price.  United Telecommunications said the redemption price for preferred-stock purchase rights will be five cents per right, payable Sept. 29 to stockholders of record Sept. 8.  Under the new plan, stockholders of record Sept. 8 will be granted similar preferred-stock purchase rights, on the basis of one right for each common share held.  Each right will entitle stockholders to buy either 1/100th of a newly issued share of preferred stock, with an exercise price of $235, or, in certain instances, common stock.  The rights will be exercisable if a party acquires beneficial ownership of 20% or more of the company's outstanding common stock.  The rights will also be exercisable if a party starts a tender or exchange offer that would give it a stake of 20% or more of the company's common stock.  WANG LAB PRESIDENT Frederick Wang has resigned, apparently forced out by his father, chairman and founder An Wang.  The board will seek an outsider to fill the son's posts, signaling a major change at the family-run computer maker.  Financially troubled Wang hopes to show clients and creditors that it is serious about a turnaround.  ---  Marvin Davis's UAL bid is said to be $240 a share, or $5.4 billion.  The Los Angeles investor also indicated he would consider raising the offer after reviewing confidential information about United Air's parent.  UAL stock surged $8.50 yesterday, to $219.25.  UAL bonds are being shunned by several institutional investors because of concern that their holding would be hurt by a takeover of the company.  ---  Ex-Treasury Secretary William Simon said he may try to buy B.A.T's Farmers Group insurance unit if Sir James Goldsmith succeeds in acquiring the British conglomerate.  ---  Cie.  Financiere de Suez launched a $2.48 billion bid for control of Cie.  Industrielle, whose primary asset is a big stake in French insurer Victoire.  Industrielle plans to fight the bid, which is the biggest ever in France.  ---  More Eastern Air pilots are abandoning the five-month-old strike and returning to work.  But union leaders and most rank-and-file appear determined to continue the walkout.  ---  Dart Drug Stores filed for Chapter 11 protection.  The discount retailer is saddled by heavy debt and costs of a major store-renovation program.  ---  Stock prices edged higher, pushing the Dow Jones industrials up 4.18 points, to 2699.17, another post-crash high.  Bonds and the dollar weakened as investors awaited clearer signs of where the economy is headed.  ---  A 6.6% stake in Midway Air was bought by Ampco-Pittsburgh for $10.3 million.  But it wasn't immediately clear if the industrial concern plans a takeover of the regional airline.  ---  American Express lost its third major executive in the past six months, raising some concern among analysts about a management drain.  ---  United Technologies took its loss-ridden Norden Systems division off the market after an unsuccessful effort to sell the radar maker.  ---  Sun Microsystems announced an alliance with N.V. Philips of the Netherlands.  The pact is part of Sun's bid to dominate the market in the new generation of microprocessors.  ---  Consumer debt grew at a 5.9% annual rate in June despite a drop in car loans.  Still, the rise was moderate, reflecting the slowing economy.  ---  Canada's government said it is "absolutely committed" to implementing a value-added consumption tax despite widespread oppositon.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 200,340,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2699.17, up 4.18; transportation 1355.80, up 11.74; utilities 221.64, up 0.12.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3322.41, off 0.68.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.62, up 0.17; spot index 127.97, up 0.03.  Dollar: 138.75 yen, off 1.30; 1.8925 marks, off 0.0237.  Enron Corp. said it may offer to sell through a limited partnership 65% to 80% of its interests in certain liquid-fuel businesses.  Enron, an energy concern and operator of the nation's largest pipeline network, said the public or private offering is contingent on a continuing assessment of market prices and conditions.  Proceeds from the offering could exceed $200 million and would be used for debt reduction and general corporate purposes, Enron said.  The partnership would own Enron's natural-gas liquids pipeline and certain of its gas-processing facilities.  The partnership would assume the debt owed by the Enron liquid-fuels subsidiaries to the parent company, which would be repaid with proceeds of new borrowings.  Enron also said it is continuing to evaluate an initial public offering of a portion of its Enron Oil & Gas Co. unit, the nation's third-largest independent energy company.  Last year, Enron pulled the unit from the market because of unsatisfactory bids, reflecting industry unease with energy prices.  The unit was valued at roughly $2 billion by investment bankers and analysts.  If final decisions are made on either or both offerings, the transactions could be completed this fall, Enron said.  Separately, William A. Anders and A. Bronson Thayer were elected to Enron's board, bringing the board's total to 17.  Mr. Anders is a senior executive vice president of operations and a director at Textron Inc., a Providence, R.I., aerospace-technology concern.  He was a member of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration's Apollo Program and served as the first chairman of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.  Mr. Thayer is chairman and chief executive officer of First Florida Banks Inc., a Tampa, Fla., bank holding company.  Electronic Arts' long-awaited initial public offering seems about to get off the ground, as the producer of several popular computer games filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission for 1,940,000 shares, at an anticipated price of $8 to $10 a share.  The stock will be traded over-the-counter.  Electronic Arts, based here, has been one of the few computer-game companies to come up with a steady stream of profit-makers.  According to the filing, the company earned $4.2 million for the year ended March 31, on revenue of $63.5 million.  For the quarter ended June 30, Electronic Arts reported net income of $825,000, on revenue of $13.7 million.  Trip Hawkins, Electronic Arts' high-profile chief executive officer, is seeking a fairly high price for the shares.  Based on the results for the year ended March 31, a price of $8 to $10 a share would be 18 to 22 times earnings.  In contrast, another maker of popular computer games, Sierra On-Line, of Coarsegold, Calif., trades at a multiple of about 12.  Mr. Hawkins declined comment on the offering, citing SEC regulations.  Edmond Heinbockel, Sierra On-Line's chief financial officer, said he thinks the Electronic Arts offering is correctly valued, and that his company and other game producers are undervalued.  "We hope they go out at that, because it would bode well for us," he said.  Henry Kravis and Theodore Forstmann are the Hertz and Avis of the leveraged buy-out business -- frequently bidding against each other in billion-dollar takeover contests.  But now Mr. Forstmann has upset his fellow merger makers by taking his fight with Mr. Kravis to Washington.  To hear some of Wall Street's big-time deal makers tell it, Mr. Forstmann, after losing many a bidding war, is trying to use Congress to clip his rival's wings by changing the tax laws.  The essential facts are clear.  At a breakfast meeting with members of the House Ways and Means Committee and in an article in the Washington Post, Mr. Forstmann urged Congress to eliminate the corporate tax deduction for bonds that don't pay interest in cash.  The committee adopted a similar proposal, which now stands a good chance of becoming law, that would eliminate such deductions on non-cash interest paid on high-yield junk bonds.  Mr. Forstmann was virtually alone among major LBO players in advocating the tax-law change, which could slow LBO activity.  Mr. Kravis, partner in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., the nation's biggest buy-out firm, arranged a separate breakfast meeting with the panel to argue against any such change.  Mr. Kravis's firm has been a big user of securities that pay non-cash or deferred interest, and such securities have helped him to outbid other LBO players, including Mr. Forstmann, to win multibillion-dollar companies.  Such securities provided about 23% of Mr. Kravis's financing for the biggest LBO ever, the $30 billion acquisition of RJR Nabisco Inc.  Mr. Forstmann's firm, Forstmann Little & Co., doesn't use such securities in putting together his bids; he's even termed them "the fake 'wampum' of 1980s finance."  The rivalry between Mr. Kravis and Mr. Forstmann, the No. 1 and No. 2 players in the LBO game, is so intense that Mr. Kravis refused, by two accounts, to attend the same committee breakfast meeting as Mr. Forstmann, who was eager to debate Mr. Kravis on the subject.  People who know him say Mr. Forstmann resents and envies Mr. Kravis.  While Mr. Kravis has done a series of ever bigger deals culminating in the record RJR buy-out, Mr. Forstmann -- whose $2.7 billion LBO fund ranks second in size to KKR's -- has sat out much of the action on the belief that prices have reached unreasonably high levels.  Since January 1987, Mr. Forstmann has announced two buy-outs, totaling $1.2 billion.  Mr. Kravis's score for the same period is 14 deals with a total value of $37.35 billion, according to Securities Data Corp.  In the Washington Post article, Mr. Forstmann complained that leveraged buy-out firms using non-cash bonds and preferred stock "have been able to justify virtually any price for any company."  Thomas Quinn, a lawyer at the Washington firm of O'Connor & Hannan who helped guide Mr. Forstmann's lobbying efforts, acknowledges that his client's actions risk alienating his fellow deal makers.  "No one wants to make enemies among their fraternal group."  Mr. Forstmann and Mr. Kravis both declined to comment.  The proposed tax-law change is likely to do far more than heat up the rivalry between the two men.  It could also slow the pace of LBO activity and thereby help put a damper on stock prices.  Most recent LBOs have featured some form of securities with non-cash payments; these now comprise about $30 billion of the $195 billion junk bond market, according to a First Boston Corp. estimate.  The Ways and Means Committee proposal would eliminate tax deductions for interest on two kinds of bonds: zero-coupon bonds that don't pay any interest until maturity and are sold at a deep discount to their face value, and "payment-in-kind," or PIK, bonds that make interest payments in the form of more bonds, rather than in cash.  The provision would only apply to bonds that have a term of more than five years and pay yields of at least five percentage points more than U.S. Treasury securities of comparable maturity.  Investment bankers believe the proposal's main effect would be to reduce the prices that bidders pay to take companies private.  "To the extent that a company is being sold and the potential bidders are largely financial buyers, removing the deductability of interest on zeros has one relatively simple impact -- it just changes the pricing," says James Maher, head of investment banking at First Boston Corp.  "It's not an enormous difference.  It's perhaps 5%, or maybe more, but not 20%," Mr. Maher says.  The proposal has already depressed the stock of one company, American Medical International Inc., whose proposed $3.35 billion buy-out could be affected by the tax proposal.  American Medical announced its buy-out just before the Ways and Means tax proposal was unveiled, but hasn't yet completed the transaction; it's not clear whether the new law would apply to the American Medical deal.  Nonetheless, American Medical shares have fallen more than $1 each from their level right after the deal was announced, closing yesterday at $24.875 each, up 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  To be sure, some LBO specialists view the latest tax proposal as a big victory, considering the intensity of the congressional hostility towards buy-outs that was spurred by the RJR Nabisco deal.  A leading advocate of curbing buy-outs is Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.), a member of the Ways and Means Committee and a current ally of Mr. Forstmann.  "I am convinced that junk bonds are the engines that drive hostile takeovers," Rep. Dorgan says.  "And part of what has fueled it is the inbred subsidy of interest deductions," he says.  Rep. Dorgan says that Mr. Forstmann played a key role in focusing the committee's attention on the use of payment-in-kind and zero-coupon securities and the effect that eliminating the interest deduction for such securities could have in slowing down buy-outs.  "I think Ted feels very strongly and got a lot of people interested in one thing," Rep. Dorgan says.  However, Mr. Forstmann hasn't always advocated government action to curb supposed excesses in the buy-out business.  Last October, during the battle for RJR Nabisco, Mr. Forstmann wrote an article for the editorial page of The Wall Street Journal that attacked highly leveraged, junk-bond-funded deals, but said that "legislation is not the answer because it will create more problems than it cures.  Markets and their particpants must correct their own inefficiencies."  But six months later, in the Washington Post, Mr. Forstmann wrote an article advocating a specific legislative solution.  "There is one change that will appeal to all but the users of the most egregious varieties of these securities: Require that unless interest is paid in cash, it cannot be deducted for taxes.  Such a change would have a direct impact on many of the excesses that have evolved but would leave traditional debt and equity alone."  Though Mr. Forstmann's advice clearly struck a responsive chord among members of the Ways and Means panel, its members added a twist of their own.  They proposed outlawing the interest deduction only for payment-in-kind or zero-coupon bonds that have high yields.  Companies with investment-grade credit ratings that can issue debt at lower interest rates would still be allowed to deduct PIK or zero-coupon interest payments.  That targeting of junk bonds upsets companies that have thrived on junk financing.  "They're giving up on the careful legal and business definitions of when an instrument is debt and when it is equity and moving toward more simplistic and arbitrary definitions," says David Alyward, executive director of Alliance for Capital Access, a Washington lobbying group funded by companies that issue junk bonds.  Pat Murphy, publisher of the Phoenix Gazette and the Arizona Republic, resigned yesterday after three years in that position.  Frank E. Russell, president of Central Newspapers Inc., of Indianapolis, said in a statement that the company is looking for a successor.  Mr. Murphy, age 60, said he was leaving the newspapers after 17 years there because he had accomplished his goals and needed a change.  He became publisher in 1986 following the resignation of Darrow "Duke" Tully, who stepped down after it was disclosed that he had fabricated a military career.  Before taking the publisher's job, Mr. Murphy served as a columnist and editor at the Republic.  Previously, he served as editor and publisher of the Coral Gable Times in Florida.  Central Newspapers is owned by the Pulliam family, of which Vice President Dan Quayle is a member.  The company also owns the Arizona Business Gazette and four Indiana newspapers, including the Indianapolis Star.  Occidental Petroleum Corp. said its Occidental Chemical Corp. unit definitively agreed with the Soviet government to build and operate two polyvinyl chloride plants in the Ukraine in a transaction valued at about $200 million.  Occidental, which last year announced an agreement in principle for the venuture at an existing plant in Kalush, said the first phase of construction would be a PVC resin facility to be started in 1990.  When completed in 1993, it would produce 40,000 metric tons annually of resins, which are used in consumer products such as vinyl flooring, upholstery and molded items.  The second facility would produce 50,000 metric tons a year of PVC film, used in food packaging, wall coverings and for reservoir linings.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  Occidental, which is involved in a number of Soviet ventures, said 75% of the PVC capacity would be sold in the U.S.S.R. and other Eastern nations, with the remainder to be marketed by Occidental in Western and other international markets.  It said its Occidental Chemical unit, a large U.S. PVC producer, will provide technology for the Soviet venture.  The Justice Department accused a former Denver accountant of the Department of Housing and Urban Development of illegally diverting $1 million from a federal program designed to help poor families obtain housing.  In a civil suit seeking to recover the money, the department said the former HUD employee, Douglas Turner, diverted the federal funds to the bank account of a Denver company he set up called Green View Developers Inc. Mr. Turner couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Turner used the diverted HUD money to purchase real estate in Littleton, Colo., to pay a contractor to build a house on the property and to buy a car, the Justice Department said.  A Justice Department spokesman wouldn't say whether the agency is considering filing criminal charges in the case.  Wal-Mart Stores Inc. said net income rose 22% to $219 million, or 39 cents a share, in the second quarter ended July 31, an increase that was on the low end of analysts' expectations.  Wal-Mart had year-earlier net of $179.6 million, or 32 cents a share.  Revenue in the fiscal second quarter was $6.05 billion, up 25% from $4.85 billion.  Despite the big increase, the earnings were slightly lower than the 40 cents a share that many analysts had been expecting, and Wal-Mart's stock suffered because of it.  The giant discount retailer's stock dropped $1.75, closing at $41.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  But analysts said the stock drop represented only mild disappointment with Wal-Mart's performance and doesn't signal broader problems.  A company's stock will fall when "quarter by quarter it comes in at the high end of expectations and then it comes in at the low end of expectations," said Jeffrey Edelman, retail analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Mr. Edelman, citing a 25% rise in Wal-Mart's stock price over the past seven months, moved the stock to the company's list of those expected to perform with the market from the list of above-average performers.  Other analysts cut their earnings-per-share estimates for Wal-Mart's fiscal year to $1.85 a share or below from $1.88 to $1.90 a share.  Wal-Mart earned $1.48 a share in fiscal 1989, ended Jan. 31.  Stacy Ruchlamer, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., said she cut her fiscal-year estimate to $1.83 from $1.88 a share because of the fiscal second-quarter results.  But, she said, Wal-Mart "is still one of our top picks."  In the six months, Wal-Mart net was $417.3 million, or 74 cents a share, up 25% from $333.2 million, or 59 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue was also up 25%, to $11.42 billion from $9.13 billion.  From the day he entered the family petroleum trading and marketing business in 1980, Doug Lair lived in the shadow of his seemingly omnipotent father.  "He was a class one entrepreneur" and an intimidating figure, says Mr. Lair, 33 years old, of his father, Gale.  One day, as a successor in training, the younger Mr. Lair lost nearly $250,000 in a risky petroleum trade.  He recalls: "I was scared to death to tell him.  I essentially ruined our year."  As he moved up, bickering and disputes over the proper direction of the company grew common.  The father and son even called in a family business consultant to help resolve the problem.  Only this month, did Doug Lair take control of Lair Petroleum Inc. in Billings, Mont., with his father's full blessing.  In countless family businesses across the country, the transfer of power from one generation to the next -- especially from the company founder to a son or daughter -- can rend family ties and cause wrenching problems for the company.  Succession tensions especially flare when a company fares poorly.  Yesterday, Wang Laboratories Inc. said Frederick A. Wang had resigned as president and chief operating officer of the Lowell, Mass., computer maker.  He apparently was forced out by his father, An Wang, the company's founder, chairman and chief executive.  Last week, Wang announced a $424.3 million loss for the fiscal year ended June 30.  An official said the management change was necessary to show that it was "no longer business as usual at Wang Laboratories."  In addition, father and son may have disagreed on some strategic issues.  Though much less visible, succession tensions are more common at small companies.  Indeed, 98% of businesses in the U.S. are family-owned.  Unlike the large-company chief executive who holds the top job for several years and passes it on to a colleague, the small-company owner commonly starts the company, runs it almost single-handedly for much of his adult life and passes it on to his flesh and blood.  But not without a lot of fretting.  To Walter Demers Jr., chief executive of a glass company in Lawrence, Mass., the Wang situation is every family business owners' worst nightmare come true.  "It must be horrible," Mr. Demers says.  Thinking of his own plans to pass the family business on to his son, Mr. Demers says of the Wang turmoil, "It would be a reflection on my judgment that I picked the wrong guy.  And what a kick in the fanny to the son."  And yet, Mr. Demers understands how hard it is for founders to pass the reins of power smoothly to their offspring.  "My dad was 80 and was still coming in every day," says Mr. Demers, who got control of the business six years ago, when he was 54.  "Probably one thing he did and I swore not to do is hang on too long."  Change can be toughest at family companies.  "The entrepreneurial personality is often a large and powerful presence," says Craig Aronoff, professor of management at Kennesaw State College, Marietta, Ga.  "The sucessor is faced with the problem of succeeding the myth.  Everybody has heard the story 47 times -- the blood, the sweat, the tears, the risk-taking.  The folklore that surrounds founders has to be daunting."  Following a founder can be difficult even if the successor plans no great changes.  When William Morton joined his father's New York company, Jack Morton Productions Inc., 25 years ago, he says he "wanted to follow in my father's footsteps."  For years he did just that, booking entertainment for companies and other clients, exactly as his father did.  But as the father, Jack, began ceding control of the company to him, William decided to make several changes, including cutting commissions for salespeople.  The father says he found the changes "a terrible personal shock," especially when the company's four most important salesmen quit over the commission cut.  "It was like four of my children had deserted me," says Jack Morton.  Though the company is faring well and the elder Mr. Morton says he has now accepted the changes, he recalls that at the time it was hard to resist meddling.  Instead, his reaction was to relinquish control of the company entirely.  But ceding control quietly is far from what many founders have in mind when they pass the company on to their children.  The father-son relationship is "the unspoken rivalry" in many family businesses, says John Messervey, director of the National Family Business Council, Northbrook, Ill.  Sometimes, he says, a father leaving the chairman's seat will even go so far as to arrange a situation in which his son or daughter can't possibly win.  Three years ago, the owner of a real-estate company who had made millions turned the business over to his son.  The father had postponed expensive maintenance work until he relinquished control, Mr. Messervey recalls.  Profits plummeted.  "It has a lot to do with control -- 'See, you can't make it without me,'" Mr. Messervey says.  "The father needs to feel needed."  Though most successions involve fathers and sons, mothers and daughters aren't exempt from strife.  After helping their mother run Ohio Outdoor Advertising Corp., Fremont, Ohio, for several years, Nancy Freeman and Claire Johansen were shocked when the mother asked them to bid for the company, along with a host of others.  "At the time, it was horrible," Ms. Johansen says.  "We had spent so much time putting the business together, and now she wanted us to buy it."  The sisters raised funding from a New York-based venture firm and now run the company themselves.  Problems can also develop when a company does poorly under the successor generation.  The founder frequently rushes back to rescue it.  "It's not just dollars and cents.  The company is a creation of the man," says Rod Correll, executive director of the Family Firm Institute, Johnstown, N.Y.  "To see the company slide -- that's the thing that will cause the father to come back and make a drastic move," Mr. Correll adds.  Having an owner who is also a founder markedly enhances the potential for conflict, says Francois de Visscher, managing director in charge of the family-business group at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  "The founder is afraid to relinquish control.  He figures, 'It is my baby.  I built it.  It is mine.  I want to make sure it goes on,'" Mr. de Visscher says.  "On the other hand, the son wants to establish his own independence.  He says, 'I will run the company my way, and it will be different from the way my father ran it.'"  Yet, for all the potential conflict, families can take steps to reduce tensions, specialists say.  Many recommend that the son -- the successor -- establish himself as the champion of one big, thorny problem, in order to establish his own credibility and reputation.  These days, computerizing the business is a popular first task.  Mr. Demers is trying to prepare his son, Walter III, to take over the company in three to five years.  And because Lawrence Plate & Window Glass Co. is a unionized shop in a heavily nonunion industry,, the younger Mr. Demers is getting heavy experience in collective bargaining.  Mr. Demers remembers being haunted by the expression "shirtsleeves to shirtsleeves in four generations" and feels the burden of passing on the business.  "I'm the custodian.  I have to enhance it," he says, "and pass it on to a son."  ---  @ Percentages of family-owned businesses that:  @ Remain in family hands one generation 70%  @ Survive to 2nd generation 30%  @ Survive to 3rd generation 13%  @ Source: "Keeping the Family Business Healthy" by John Ward, published by Jossey-Bass Inc., 1987.  Premier Turgut Ozal announced steps liberalizing the country's rules on currency transfers and foreign exchange.  The measures permit Turkish citizens to borrow abroad without government permission.  In addition, Turks will be permitted to buy foreign securities and foreigners will be allowed to buy shares on the Istanbul exchange.  Purchases of foreign currency up to $3,000 will be permitted.  In the past, currency purchases from banks were limited to specific uses such as travel abroad and import payments.  Mr. Ozal said the measures would help Turkey prepare for possible membership in the European Community.  Turkey's membership application, submitted two years ago, is under review in Brussels.  Atmel Corp., a closely held semiconductor maker, said it filed a lawsuit charging that Intel Corp. has violated antitrust laws.  The suit, filed in U.S. district court here, charges that Intel attempted to "monopolize U.S. commerce" for memory chips called Eproms, Atmel said.  The suit is in response to a request that Intel filed in July with the International Trade Commission asking the commission to investigate Intel's suspicions that Atmel was violating an earlier commission ruling.  The spat harks back to a suit filed by Intel in the San Jose court and a complaint filed with the commission, both in 1987.  Intel charged that certain Atmel chips violated seven Intel patents.  In March, Atmel said, the commission found Atmel in violation of two of the patents and ordered Atmel to stop importing the chips, which are made in Japan.  Santa Clara, Calif.-based Intel, believing that Atmel continued to sell the chips in the U.S., asked the commission in July to launch a formal investigation, and the commission agreed to do so last week, an Intel spokeswoman said yesterday.  Atmel said it stopped importing the chips in March.  Atmel redesigned the offending chips so they don't infringe on Intel's patents, an Atmel spokesman said, although the chips aren't on the market yet.  "We complied with the rulings and tried to get back to business" in March, said Jeff Katz, vice president, marketing, at Atmel.  But now that Intel has opened the issue again, "We could only conclude that they are trying to stop us from competing."  Atmel's suit alleges that, in continuing to press charges against Atmel, Intel "acted willfully and with wrongful intention to injure Atmel and from an improper or evil motive amounting to malice."  Atmel is seeking over $100 million in punitive damages and triple any actual damages awarded.  Atmel's president and founder, George Prelegos, once worked at Intel, where he helped develop that company's Eproms, an Atmel spokesman said.  Atmel had $60 million in sales last year and recently purchased a semiconductor factory in Colorado Springs, Colo., from Honeywell Inc., he said.  Two former employees of Tokyo-based real-estate giant Shuwa Corp.'s U.S. unit have alleged that top company officials beat them frequently at the office.  Accountant Hajime Tanioka filed a lawsuit in a state court here alleging assault and battery "on numerous occasions" and naming Shuwa Investment Corp. President Takaji Kobayashi and Executive Vice President Takeshi Shiratori.  Mr. Kobayashi's father is chief of the parent company.  In the complaint, Mr. Tanioka alleges that Mr. Kobayashi kicked him, struck him with fists, and at various times hit him with a telephone, a calculator and a book.  Mr. Tanioka, who says he was compelled to resign this year, also says he was repeatedly abused verbally, being called "idiot" and "fool."  He accused Mr. Shiratori of striking him with a ruler and with rolled-up newspapers and magazines.  Some beatings resulted from Mr. Tanioka's unwillingness to work long hours because of an unrelated auto accident, according to Mr. Tanioka's attorney, J. Patrick Maginnis.  The other, separate lawsuit was filed in state court here last November by Dawn Marie Stover, former secretary to Shuwa Investments Vice President Kiichiro Kobayashi, a cousin of Takaji Kobayashi.  Ms. Stover's complaint alleged that Kiichiro Kobayashi committed battery, harassment and sexual assault.  Along with a series of sexual-abuse charges, her complaint alleges that her boss often hit, slapped, pinched and struck her with a ruler.  Kiichiro Kobayashi denied the charges in court papers, and cross-complained, alleging that Ms. Stover beat him and called him names.  His attorney declined to elaborate.  Takaji Kobayashi and Mr. Shiratori didn't return calls.  Craig B. Jorgensen, an attorney for the company, said that he hadn't seen the Tanioka suit but that "it sounds like a disgruntled employee filing a copycat lawsuit."  He declined to comment on the Stover suit.  A response to Mr. Tanioka's allegations hasn't been filed in court.  Ms. Stover's attorney, James D. Vogt, says that although he believes the relationship between his client and her boss was "extreme," he believes that other employees were physically and verbally abused.  "The Japanese employees are very reluctant to testify," he says.  Mr. Maginnis said Mr. Tanioka didn't file a criminal complaint because "that's not the Japanese way of doing things."  Ms. Stover filed a criminal complaint last September before resigning, but later was persuaded by Mr. Shiratori to drop the charges and return to work, according to Mr. Vogt.  She resigned again the next month.  Closely held Shuwa, which means "excellent harmony" in Japanese, burst upon the U.S. real-estate scene in the mid-1980s, and quickly began accumulating downtown office buildings across the country for staggering sums.  By late 1987, it had spent $2 billion, including its 1986 purchase of the Arco Towers in Los Angeles for $620 million -- thought at the time to be the largest all-cash real-estate transaction in U.S. history.  Among other properties, Shuwa bought the former ABC headquarters in New York and the U.S. News & World Report building in Washington, D.C.  Shuwa is known for acting decisively in business.  When the company was closing the Arco deal, employees worked long hours to translate and review leasing documents.  Two were hospitalized for exhaustion, but discrepancies found in the documents enabled Shuwa to lower its offering price.  Mr. Tanioka moved to Los Angeles from Japan in 1987 to work for Shuwa, where he was paid about $45,000 a year, according to Mr. Maginnis.  Experts say corporal punishment and verbal abuse is rarely used by Japanese companies.  Although punishment isn't unheard of in Japanese schools, "in a corporation, the idea of any sort of physical punishment is very, very surprising," said Bruce McKern, visiting professor of International Business at Stanford University.  And Richard Drobnick, director of the International Business Education and Research program at the University of Southern California, called beating and yelling at employees uncommon in Japan, despite rigid hierarchy in the workplace.  The Federal Aviation Administration said its survey of older Boeing Co. 727-100s turned up cracks in the fuselages of four planes.  Three were on United Airlines jets and the other was on an American Airlines plane.  In all, the FAA received reports on 31 domestic aircraft.  The FAA's aircraft certification office ordered inspections of a specific section of the 727 jets delivered before May 1964 after a 20-inch crack was found on a United plane in June.  The crack occurred in a lower part of the fuselage, but not along a rivet line.  That attracted the attention of safety experts because most cracks on aging jets have been discovered either toward the top of the fuselage or along a rivet line.  An FAA spokesman said the agency is considering ordering the inspection of newer 727s as an additional precaution.  A former aide to PTL Club founder Jim Bakker pleaded guilty to fraud and conspiracy in a federal investigation of the TV ministry.  Richard Dortch pleaded guilty to one count of mail fraud, one of wire fraud by telephone, one of wire fraud by television and one of conspiracy.  Mr. Dortch had been scheduled to appear in U.S. District Court here later this month to face fraud and conspiracy charges.  Neither Mr. Dortch nor his attorneys could be reached for comment.  In July, a federal jury in Charlotte convicted James and David Taggart, also former aides to Mr. Bakker, for tax evasion.  The brothers were the first to be convicted in the investigation of the PTL Club.  Mr. Bakker is scheduled in court later this month.  THE U.S. REJECTED a bid to link hostage talks to frozen Iranian assets.  The White House, trying to dispel any notion that it might allow Iran's assets in the U.S. to be included in bargaining over hostages in Lebanon, rejected an overture from Tehran that it would be willing to help free the captives if Washington released billions of dollars in frozen funds.  Administration aides suggested that the assets might be discussed after an improvement in U.S.-Iranian ties.  In Tel Aviv, Israel rebuffed an appeal by a U.N. envoy to free an abducted Moslem cleric.  The wife of Higgins said it was almost certain that her husband was dead, and she offered support to Bush as he "tries to save the living."  ---  Nicaragua's Ortega called on the U.S. to respect a plan to disband the Contras by Dec. 8.  The accord, signed Monday by five Central American leaders, set a 30-day deadline to establish an observer force and another 90 days for the rebels to demobilize.  Washington expressed reservations about the pact.  ---  Canada's Supreme Court struck down an injunction obtained by a Quebec man to prevent his former girlfriend from having an abortion.  The Ottawa court's decision came after it was learned that the 21-year-old woman went ahead with the procedure.  Canada has been without an abortion law since a January 1988 decision by the high court.  ---  A federal jury convicted Meese's associate E. Robert Wallach of racketeering and fraud charges in the Wedtech scandal.  Two co-defendants were found guilty of racketeering, fraud and conspiracy.  The ex-attorney general had testified for Wallach at the trial in New York.  ---  The space shuttle Columbia blasted into orbit from Cape Canaveral, Fla., with five astronauts aboard for a five-day mission for the Air Force.  NASA sources said the crew of the overhauled spacecraft, the space agency's oldest shuttle, is to launch a 10-ton reconnaissance satellite on a path over the Soviet Union, China and the Mideast.  ---  Wright is being investigated by a federal grand jury in Washington about whether he illegally asked groups to buy quantities of a book he wrote instead of paying speaking fees.  It is illegal for officials to exchange favors for gifts.  The Texas Democrat, accused of violating House rules, resigned as speaker May 31.  ---  Rescue crews in Ethiopia searched remote areas in the southwestern part of the country for a missing plane carrying Democratic Rep. Leland of Texas and 13 others.  The plane failed to arrive Monday at a refugee camp near the border with Sudan.  It took off from Addis Ababa.  Leland was examining famine-relief efforts in Africa.  ---  U.S. soldiers detained 29 Panamanians who entered a restricted area near the Panama Canal, the Southern Command said.  Their weapons were confiscated.  Among those held briefly were 10 military officers, including a brother-in-law of Noriega.  ---  Kaifu was designated as Japan's third prime minister this year.  He is to assume office today.  As the newly elected president of the ruling Liberal Democrats, Kaifu, whose predecessors resigned over sex and financial scandals, must prepare for parliamentary elections that could come as early as October.  ---  Lawmakers in Soviet Estonia approved a law tightening residency requirements for voting and running for office.  The move was aimed at stemming the influence of the republic's Russian minority, which is about a third of the region's 1.6 million people.  Some Russian workers briefly went on strike last month to protest the legislation.  ---  Bush pledged to work with civil-rights advocates to halt the decline of the nation's inner cities and to remove barriers for minorities.  In a speech to the National Urban League, the president didn't unveil any initiatives or address several complaints from rights groups, such as a recent Supreme Court ruling limiting affirmative action.  ---  New Zealand's Palmer was installed as prime minister and said Wellington's policies would remain the same, including barring U.S. warships from New Zealand ports because they might carry nuclear arms.  Palmer succeeds Lange, who became involved in disputes with the U.S. and France over the issue.  He resigned Sunday.  ---  Two political parties in Poland agreed to consider a proposal by Walesa to form a coalition government with the Solidarity-led opposition that would exclude the Communist Party.  But Warsaw's Communist leaders said a coalition of Solidarity and the Communist-allied Peasant and Democratic parties could destabilize the country.  ---  A Jordanian soldier crossed the border into Israel, wounded an American woman and held an off-duty soldier hostage for nearly four hours before being killed by an Israeli sharpshooter.  The incident occurred at a collective farm less than a mile from the Jordan-Israel border.  Jordan said its soldier had abandoned an observation post.  ---  An earthquake struck the San Francisco Bay area, causing a man to fall to his death from a fifth-floor apartment window.  The temblor, measuring 5.2 on the Richter scale, caused minor damage, but was felt in San Luis Obispo, 230 miles to the south.  It was followed by at least two aftershocks.  ---  Died: H. Thomas Hallowell Jr., 81, former chairman of SPS Technologies Inc., Monday, in Abington, Pa., of cancer.  Ultimate Corp. said it expects per-share earnings in the fiscal second quarter ending Oct. 31 to be between 15 cents and 20 cents a share, compared with a loss a year ago.  With 9.7 million shares outstanding, the forecast indicates net income of $1.5 million to $2 million.  In the year-ago quarter, Ultimate, based in East Hanover, N.J., had a loss of $21.2 million, mostly reflecting increased selling and other expenses, and a restructuring charge of about $22 million, later revised down by $2 million.  The company said second-quarter revenue would be between $50 million and $55 million.  In the year-ago second quarter, revenue was $46.7 million.  Ultimate integrates its computer operating system into hardware from computer vendors such as International Business Machines Corp. and Tandem Computers Inc.  The forecasts were made at the company's annual meeting here by Michael J. O'Donnell, Ultimate's president and acting chairman.  After the meeting, directors named Mr. O'Donnell chairman.  He will keep the post of president.  For the fiscal first quarter ended July 31, Ultimate posted net of $1 million, or 10 cents a share.  A year earlier, it had a loss of $983,000 before a $2 million gain from an accounting change, resulting in net income of $1 million or 10 cents a share.  Revenue rose to $49 million from $46.2 million.  Mr. O'Donnell, who has led the company's restructuring over the past few months, said its "turnaround is really taking effect," but that this is "a year of transition."  He said the company expects to become more market and service driven.  Ultimate paid down all its short-term debt, and hopes to expand its business through acquisitions.  During the meeting, an official of Westport Asset Management Inc., an investment adviser that holds a 5.7% stake in Ultimate, suggested that Ultimate hire an investment banker to explore a possible sale of the company.  Mr. O'Donnell said he would take the suggestion under advisement, and refer it to the board.  President Bush announced his intention to nominate Harold Steele to be chairman of the Farm Credit Administration Board.  Mr. Steele, 67 years old, will fill the remainder of a term expiring in 1992.  His confirmation by the Senate would restore a quorum to the three-member board, which oversees government lending to farmers.  Mr. Steele, a farmer in Princeton, Ill., attended the University of Illinois's College of Agriculture from 1940 to 1943.  He was chairman of the now-defunct National Commission on Agricultural Finance and president of the Illinois Farm Bureau from 1970 to 1983.  He is a member of the board of Midwest Financial Group Inc., and of Agrarian Management Corp.  He was chairman of a group of farmers supporting the re-election of Illinois Gov. James Thompson, a Republican, in 1986.  The U.S. International Trade Commission ruled that imports of 12-volt motorcycle batteries from Taiwan aren't injuring a domestic industry, so penalty duties won't be imposed on them even though the Commerce Department said they are being sold at unfairly low prices.  Under U.S. trade laws, penalty duties can't be imposed unless the Commerce Department finds violations of the Anti-Dumping Act and the ITC finds that a domestic industry is being harmed.  Dumping involves selling an item in the U.S. for less than its home-market price or its production cost.  Since 1982, the ITC has considered ordering anti-dumping duties on the imports from Taiwan at least three times.  But the government trade panel concluded in each instance that the imports weren't injuring a domestic industry.  The imports totaled about $10.8 million in 1988.  An ITC official said the sole U.S. producer of such motorcycle batteries is Yuasa-Exide Battery Corp., Reading, Pa., which is partly owned by a Japanese battery manufacturer.  Controversy seems to stick to Exxon Corp. like oil on an Alaskan beach.  After winning reluctant approval from Alaska to use an untried dispersant to clean up Prince William Sound beaches, the oil giant Monday found insurrection in its own camp.  Some shore crews -- apparently concerned over safety and environmental issues -- refused to spray the controversial chemical on a stretch of Smith Island in what was to be the first large-scale test application of the agent, known as Corexit 9580.  By the time the company scrounged up workers willing to undertake the spraying, optimum tide cycles for the test had passed and it had to be scrapped, said Steve Provant, the state of Alaska's on-scene spill coordinator.  An Exxon spokesman confirmed the incident and said it involved "a few employees" who expressed "legitimate concern over the introduction of a new chemical to the workplace."  Mr. Provant said some of that concern may have stemmed from labels on barrels of the chemical stating that it is "toxic to fish."  Exxon has claimed that preliminary tests show the chemical -- if used on beaches in relatively small concentrations -- won't harm marine life.  Corexit 9580 is essentially kerosene stripped of its most toxic compounds and mixed with a detergent to help loosen oil from rocks.  Exxon came up with the formula in recent weeks as part of a desperate search for a speedier method of removing tarlike oil from hundreds of miles of Prince William Sound beaches that have defied conventional water cleanup.  Under intense pressure from Exxon and the Coast Guard, Alaska on Monday approved a large-scale test application of the chemical but is withholding a permit for its general use until test results are in.  Fishery and environmental groups have unsuccessfully fought to stop use of the dispersant until further laboratory testing, pointing to scientific studies that advise against using the chemicals in shallow, near-shore environments.  "This is the worst possible time to be experimenting with this kind of thing," said Riki Ott, a scientist with Cordova District United Fishermen, a Prince William Sound commercial-fishing alliance.  Ms. Ott said that should the chemical turn out to have toxic side effects, the results could prove devastating to large runs of salmon currently spawning in the sound, as well as to huge numbers of salmon fry that are foraging along the sound's near-shore before swimming out to sea.  Lockheed Corp.'s Aeronautical Systems Co. unit offered to pay $52 million to help clean up water supply wells here -- about half of what it's expected to take to fund the entire cleanup project.  A spokesman said Lockheed is one of 31 companies and land owners deemed potentially responsible for chemical pollution of the wells.  The Environmental Protection Agency is reviewing the company's offer, as well as others.  Lockheed, as part of its proposal, didn't admit it was responsible for the pollution.  A group of 114 retired white-collar employees of General Motors Corp. filed suit in federal court demanding that the auto maker restore health benefits that were reduced or eliminated in 1988.  The 67-page lawsuit, filed on behalf of 84,000 retired white-collar employees, is the latest backlash against GM's attempts to cut costs at the expense of its salaried work force.  Earlier this year, a group of current employees filed a class-action lawsuit charging that the auto maker used a merit-pay system to discriminate against older workers.  The merit-pay system, which had the effect of denying raises to at least 10% of salaried workers, has since been discontinued.  The most recent suit charges that GM breached contractual obligations to provide lifetime health benefits.  In a prepared statement, plaintiff Robert Sprague said the suit had been filed "to force GM to honor its solemn contract and moral obligation to its salaried retirees."  A GM spokeswoman declined to respond directly to the retirees' suit.  But she said the benefits GM provides salaried retirees are among the best of any major U.S. corporation.  In March 1988, GM eliminated a special policy that provided vision care and hearing aids for retirees and grouped those benefits under its basic health plan.  Four months later, GM imposed co-payments and deductibles for the first time on that traditional insurance plan to encourage employees to switch to a managed-cost program such as a health maintenance organization.  Small groups of retirees have protested the cost-cutting moves at the last two GM annual meetings.  In March 1989, GM restored its former vision care and hearing aid benefits.  The retired employees are represented by the Washington office of the Chicago law firm Bell, Boyd & Lloyd.  First City Bancorp. of Texas said its board instituted a quarterly dividend of 37 cents a share on its common stock.  The dividend is First City's first regular dividend since the bank-holding company was purchased and recapitalized in a $1.5 billion federally assisted bailout in April 1988.  Common shareholders received a $1-a-share special dividend June 26.  The common dividend is payable Sept. 29 to stock of record Sept. 15.  The banking concern also declared a regular $1.375-a-share dividend on its $5.50 cumulative convertible preferred stock, payable Sept. 30 to shareholders of record Sept. 15.  The Immigration and Naturalization Service named Benjamin G. Davidian western regional commissioner, responsible for overseeing the agency's biggest and most active region.  He succeeds Harold Ezell, who resigned last month after a controversial six-year tenure.  Mr. Davidian, 38 years old, is currently chairman of the California Agricultural Labor Relations Board.  Before being appointed to that post in 1987 by Gov. George Deukmejian, Mr. Davidian practiced law in Sacramento, Calif. and San Francisco.  A native of Fresno, Calif., Mr. Davidian is a graduate of the University of Utah and the University of California's Hastings College of Law in Berkeley, Calif.  In the INS post, Mr. Davidian will oversee agency operations in Guam, California, Arizona, Hawaii and Nevada, as well as a major document-processing facility in Laguna Niguel, Calif.  Immigrants' rights activists and others said Mr. Davidian steps into a difficult position, considering the practical and political complexities of the revised federal immigration laws.  Mr. Ezell, while defended by some INS insiders as an able manager, drew sharp criticism from social activists and even senior Justice Department officials for inflammatory statements during his INS career.  Income Opportunity Realty Trust said it settled a four-month dispute with two Detroit pension funds by agreeing to swap Income Opportunity assets for the pension funds' 22% stake in the real-estate investment trust.  The funds, the Policemen and Firemen Retirement System and the General Retirement System of Detroit, in April launched a tender offer for the shares of Income Opportunity Trust they didn't already own.  The offer is believed to be the first hostile tender offer made by pension funds.  The funds said they were concerned about how the trust management would manage their investment.  However, the offer was blocked by a San Francisco judge, who said the funds may have violated securities laws by failing to make certain disclosures.  The funds then began a proxy fight to remove Income Opportunity's board at an annual meeting scheduled for yesterday.  Under settlement terms, the funds didn't challenge Income Opportunity's nominees for trustees, agreed to withdraw their offer and drop all litigation.  The pension funds will receive two properties in Cincinnati and a mortgage loan owned by the trust in exchange for their shares and warrants to buy stock.  The trust and the pension funds said that after an adjustment, the assets had a book value at Dec. 31 "substantially equal" to the book value of the pension funds' stock on Dec. 31.  King World Productions Inc. formed a new division, King World Home Video, and named as its president Richard Klinger.  Mr. Klinger, 52 years old, was formerly an independent producer of videotapes at Taft Entertainment Co.  King World, a major distributor of first-run syndicated television programs including "Wheel of Fortune" and "Inside Edition," which it also produces, said the new division is part of a plan to expand its programming base.  In a telephone interview, Mr. Klinger said the type of videotapes he plans to produce and acquire for King World will be mostly "non-theatrical, special-interest product, such as motivational, self-help or children's tapes.  We might also do sports or historical tapes.  We aren't in the movie business and we aren't going to be."  Some projects might use personalities from King World's syndicated television shows, including "The Oprah Winfrey Show," said Mr. Klinger.  He said he doesn't have a specific goal in mind for the number of tapes to be released, but said he will be selling mostly outside of video stores.  For example, Mr. Klinger produced a series of children's tapes of Bible stories for Taft, which he marketed largely through religious bookstores, an unusual outlet for videotapes.  Mr. Klinger, who has served as attorney general for the state of Montana and taught journalism at California State University, also has worked as business affairs director for Paramount Television Productions and head of RCA Video's west coast office.  Reliance Capital Group Limited Partnership said it agreed in principle to sell its Days Inns Corp. unit to Tollman-Hundley Hotels for about $190 million plus assumption of $575 million of debt.  Tollman-Hundley, also based here, is Days Inns' largest single franchisee, with 48 of Days Inns' in about 900 locations.  Tollman owns a total of 129 hotels and has six under construction, said partner Monty D. Hundley.  "We're very pleased with the current management of the company," Mr. Hundley said, "but we know the Reliance people are investors and that sooner or later the company would be sold to somebody.  We would rather that somebody be us."  He said he expects closing to take place in 45 days.  Reliance bought Days Inns for $265 million, including $30 million of equity investment, plus assumption of about $300 million of debt in 1984, when the chain had 200 locations, said Henry R. Silverman, chairman and chief executive officer of Days Inns and president and chief of Reliance Capital.  Reliance Capital is an investment partnership managed by Reliance Group Holdings Inc., an insurance holding company.  VALLEY CAPITAL Corp., Las Vegas, said its board of directors declared a 4-for-3 stock split in the form of a stock dividend.  The dividend, consisting of one share of the bank-holding company's common stock, with a par value of $1, is payable Aug. 29 to stock of record Aug. 21.  Valley Capital said the stock split will increase the number of its shares outstanding by about 2,652,026 shares, bringing the new total to about 10,608,901 shares.  The company said it plans to continue its current quarterly dividend of 20 cents a share.  FIRST MARYLAND BANCORP, Baltimore, said it will redeem all its $50 million face amount of 13.75% notes due Oct. 1, 1992.  The bank holding company said the notes will be redeemed Oct. 1 at par plus accrued interest.  The ICN Biomedicals Inc. unit of ICN Pharmaceuticals Inc. said it settled charges by the Orange County district attorney's office stemming from alleged late reporting of an accidental release of radioactive hydrogen from an ICN Biomedicals facility in Irvine, Calif.  A spokesman for the unit of the pharmaceuticals and research concern said it will pay $25,000 and donate an additional $20,000 of environmental monitoring equipment to the county fire and health departments as part of the settlement.  ICN Biomedicals, of Costa Mesa, Calif., said the settlement didn't involve any admission of wrongdoing.  The release into the atmosphere of tritium gas occurred after an accident last Feb. 25.  The California Department of Health Services had alleged that the company failed to report the accident until 12 days later, after it had been cited by a state inspector, rather than giving the 24-hour notice required by state regulations.  Despite the Central American presidents' agreement to disband the Nicaraguan Contras, Bush administration officials doubt that anyone actually will be able to disarm the estimated 10,000 Contra fighters soon and force them to dismantle their camps in Honduras.  But the regional accord assures a renewal of bitter bipartisan fighting in Congress.  The Dec. 8 deadline for dissolving the Contras, agreed to in Honduras Monday by the Central American presidents, falls about a week after Congress is scheduled to review the "nonlethal" aid it approved last spring.  Conservatives want the aid to continue to help ensure that Nicaragua's leftist Sandinistas live up to their agreement to hold free elections, scheduled for Feb. 25.  But many Democratic lawmakers will move to eliminate the assistance, arguing that continuing it goes against the wishes of the region's leaders.  Sen. Christopher Dodd, chairman of the Senate Foreign Affairs subcommittee on Western Hemisphere and Peace Corps affairs, is already making that argument.  "It is our role, as friends of democracy and as neighbors with a profound interest in stability in the region, to support this process," says the Connecticut Democrat.  Elliott Abrams, who picked his share of fights with Congress when he was assistant secretary of state for inter-American affairs in the Reagan administration, counters, "Thus far, this administration has been unwilling to fight with Congress over Central America.  Now, they're going to have to decide in November whether to take on a fight."  Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega said the Central American presidents' agreement was a "death sentence" for the Contras.  Some Bush administration officials privately concede that the rebels' would be finished if Congress cuts off their funds and Central American presidents deny them a sanctuary.  But the White House stresses that the Central American presidents' agreement and several other similar accords reached during the past two years include language suggesting the Contras can only be demobilized "voluntarily."  The administration says it believes Managua's pledge to hold free and fair elections next year is a ploy designed to buy time and persuade the Central American leaders to rebuff the U.S. and call off the Contras.  Only days before the Honduras meeting, for instance, Nicaragua agreed to meet with its political opponents, conferring on them for the first time a degree of legitimacy.  In return, the domestic political opposition, which unites 14 parties in one umbrella group, agreed to support the plan to demobilize the Contras.  The administration argues that the Contras must be kept intact to prod the Sandinistas to make democratic concessions.  Otherwise, it argues, the Sandinistas won't have any incentive to follow through on their promises to the opposition.  Officials also contend that if the Sandinistas actually hold a fair and free election they might lose it.  The Sandinistas' popularity has declined as they continue to preside over an economic disaster at home.  During a visit to Mexico Monday, Secretary of State James Baker didn't comment on the Central American agreement.  He said instead that "we're very pleased with the steps that the government of Nicaragua has taken to establish a dialogue with the opposition and to move toward procedures that might permit a free and fair election."  Indeed, though the struggle over disarming the Contras is bound to get most of the attention in the coming months, the Sandinistas have committed themselves to several important steps to back up their promises of open democracy.  For instance, they pledged that the winner of the election could take office about two months after the vote, according to Allen Weinstein, president of a bipartisan U.S. group called the Center for Democracy, which was invited by the Sandinistas to monitor Nicaragua's election.  Under Nicaragua's constitution, Mr. Weinstein says, the transition of power is supposed to take place after about 10 months, so the Sandinistas would have to recommend to the National Assembly, which they control, a constitutional amendment to make the change.  Mr. Weinstein says the Sandinistas will have to make dozens of other changes to show they are sincere about keeping their promises.  "If they don't do these things soon, it will sour the climate," he says.  And if the Sandinistas drag their heels, they will give the Bush administration ammunition to use in its coming debate with Congress over cutting off aid to the Contras.  Meanwhile, Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega continues to temper his positive actions with ambiguous statements that arouse suspicion among U.S. officials.  Mr. Ortega, who is running for re-election, was asked during a recent interview on Mexican television if he would turn over power if he lost the election.  He answered, "Well, power lies with the people, so power cannot be relinquished.  The people hold power."  Household Bank, a unit of Household International Inc. said it has acquired Fedstar Savings Bank of Alexandria, Va.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The company said Fedstar, which has assets of $360 million, operates nine branches in Virginia.  Fluor Corp. said its Fluor Daniel unit was awarded a $26 million contract for additional work on a defense-waste disposal plant.  The waste vitrification plant at Hanford, Wash., is operated by the U.S. Department of Energy.  Vitrification includes removing hazardous defense waste stored in tanks and encasing it in glass for underground storage.  Fluor did the original conceptual-design engineering for the plant in 1986.  WestAir Holding Inc. reported that its July traffic rose 47% to 41,790,000 revenue passenger miles from 28,434,000 miles a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor, or the percentage of available seats occupied, rose to 48.3% from 47.1% a year earlier.  For the first seven months of 1989, the airline reported that traffic rose 50% to 267,773,000 revenue passenger miles from 178,330,000 miles a year earlier.  Load factor fell to 45.4% from 47.5%.  JWP Inc., a technical services company, said it acquired Currentech Inc., a Minneapolis-based computer distributor.  Terms weren't disclosed.  JWP said it expects Currentech's sales to climb 30% to $65 million this year.  "This was a business combination that both parties sought," said Dennis R. Johnson, Currentech president.  He said Currentech's customer base will provide JWP a desired "platform" for expansion in the Midwest, and that JWP will enable Currentech to expand its services and financial resources.  Norden Systems Inc. received an $18.3 million Navy contract for radar-related equipment for ships.  GTE Corp. said its GTE Spacenet Corp. unit received a multimillion-dollar contract to design, install and manage a major Ku-Band digital-communications satellite network for the U.S. Army.  GTE wasn't more specific about the amount of the contract.  The data-communications network will connect more than 54 world-wide locations with a central communications complex at Fort Belvoir, Va.  GTE Spacenet is a satellite-based telecommunications unit of GTE, a telecommunications, lighting and precision-materials company.  Phillips Petroleum Co. said its AgriSense joint venture company purchased Biological Control Systems Ltd. of the United Kingdom.  Terms weren't disclosed.  AgriSense is a joint venture formed by Phillips's Provesta Corp. unit and the Dow Corning Enterprise unit of Dow Corning Corp. Phillips is an energy and chemicals concern.  Dow Corning, based in Midland, Mich., makes silicone products.  Ametek Inc. said it completed the acquisition of General Electric Co.'s instrument-products unit in exchange for $110 million and the transfer of an Ametek plastics plant to GE.  Ametek, a Paoli, Pa., industrial manufacturer, said the acquisition would strongly complement its lines of jet-aircraft instruments.  The GE unit, based in Wilmington, Mass., with 1,200 employees and annual sales of more than $100 million, is a leading producer of aircraft sensors, monitors, cockpit instruments and flight reference systems.  Under terms of the deal, Ametek gave GE its 80-employee plastics-compounding plant in Sparta, Tenn.  Switzerland's cost-of-living index in July fell 0.2% from June, and increased 3% from a year earlier, the Federal Statistics Office said.  In June, the index was up 0.2% from May and up 3% from a year earlier.  The index, based on a rate of 100 in December 1982, was 114.9 in July, down from 115.1 in June, but up from 111.5 a year earlier.  The agency also said the cost of domestic goods in July was unchanged from June, but rose on a year-to-year basis by 2.8%, unchanged from June's year-to-year rise.  July import prices, meanwhile, dropped 0.9% from June, but increased 3.4% from a year earlier.  Malaysia's trade surplus narrowed to 3.638 billion ringgit ($1.36 billion) in the first five months of 1989 from 5.03 billion ringgit a year earlier.  The Bernama national news agency, quoting government figures, said imports rose 39% to 22.31 billion ringgit while exports rose 23% to 25.95 billion ringgit.  Increases in the value of imported machinery and transportation equipment, manufactured goods, miscellaneous transactions and commodities and chemicals led to the higher import value, the report said.  Southeast Asia, Japan, the U.S. and the European Community continued to be Malaysia's major trading partners, Bernama said.  Turkey's foreign trade deficit widened to $476 million in May from $362 million a year earlier, the state statistics institute said.  The May deficit was also wider than the $293 million trade gap recorded in April.  The statistics office said, however, that the trade deficit narrowed to $1.2 billion during the first five months of 1989 from $1.4 billion a year ago.  The statistics institute said exports on a value basis fell 29% to $702 million in May from $982 million in April and were down 15% from $825 million a year earlier.  Imports totaled $1.18 billion in May, down 7.8% from $1.28 billion in April.  May imports were down less than 1% from $1.19 billion a year earlier.  Exports for the first five months totaled $4.5 billion, down 2.2% from $4.6 billion a year ago.  Imports fell 5.2% to $5.7 billion in the January-May period from $6 billion a year earlier.  Dover Corp. directors authorized repurchase of as many as six million common shares, or about 10% of the industrial manufacturing company's shares.  The authorization replaces a previous six-million-share approval under which the company, based here, repurchased 4.2 million shares.  In the last five years, Dover has repurchased 8.8 million shares.  Brown-Forman Corp. said it sold its Cella Italian Wines to Consorzio Interprovinciale Vini of Modena, Italy.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The Italian firm, which produces the wine for Brown-Forman, purchased the world-wide trademark for Cella and will appoint a new U.S. importer responsible for sales and marketing of the brand.  Brown-Forman said it sold the brand because it wants to concentrate on the more premium segment of the U.S. wine market.  Retail sales volume in June fell a revised 2.3% from May and was up 2.2% from June 1988, Britain's Central Statistical Office said.  The year-to-year increase was the smallest since March 1984.  In the three months through June, retail sales volume was up 0.6% from the previous three months and up 3% from a year earlier.  The value of June retail sales was up about 7% from a year earlier.  A price index of Australia's export commodities fell 1.1% in Australian dollar terms last week.  State Bank of Victoria, which compiles the weekly index, said it also rose 1% in U.S. dollars and 0.4% in terms of the International Monetary Fund's Special Drawing Rights.  During July the index fell 2.4% in Australian dollars, 2.2% in U.S. dollars and 4.8% in SDRs, mainly because of weaker world aluminum prices.  The index has gained 4% since January in Australian dollars as the local currency has fallen.  But the index has declined 8% in U.S. dollars and 4.6% in SDRs since January.  Registrations of new motor vehicles in Australia rose 5.5% to a seasonally adjusted 49,626 in June from 47,057 in May and climbed 19.2% from 41,629 in June 1988, the Bureau of Statistics said.  The 5.5% rise in June compares with a revised increase of 1.9% in May.  The May rise originally was reported as 1.8%.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said it affirmed Drexel Burnham Lambert Group Inc.'s single A-2 commercial paper rating, and said Drexel "maintains ample secured borrowing capacity to meet ongoing funding requirements."  The ratings agency had launched a review of Drexel's commercial paper rating last December because of the risks involved with Drexel's $3.5 billion bridge loan commitment in the $24.6 billion acquisition of RJR Nabisco Inc. by Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts & Co.  At the time, S&P said the bridge loan, the largest ever planned by a Wall Street brokerage firm to help a client complete a takeover, "would represent a substantial concentration in credit risk . . . relative to Drexel's $1.4 billion equity base."  S&P yesterday said that while the RJR commitment "posed substantial funding risks," Drexel's exposure was "substantially reduced by its successful pre-funding efforts and subsequent placement and distribution of $5 billion in RJR securities" this year.  S&P added that at Drexel, "curtailment of low-margin businesses and disposition of retail operations will help the company improve operating earnings.  However, earnings are expected to remain under pressure as further reserve actions and litigation costs continue, at least for the balance of 1989."  The agency added that with about $2 billion in capital, "Drexel is well positioned to retain its top competitive position in the junk bond market and absorb modest capital withdrawals from departing senior Drexel executives."  The suspension of trading in Lifeline Healthcare Group Ltd. securities has been continued, the National Association of Securities Dealers said.  The NASD action follows a 10-day trading suspension by the Securities and Exchange Commission that expired Friday.  The SEC suspended trading because of questions about recent activity in the health care services concern's securities as well as about disclosures involving the company's business operations, acquisitions and major stockholders.  "Clearly, we've taken a position that the information out in the marketplace is not accurate," said T. Christopher Browne, regional administrator of the SEC's Fort Worth, Texas, office.  He said the SEC had not renewed its own suspension, but he wouldn't comment on the status of the SEC inquiry.  The NASD said it imposed its trading halt over the same issues raised by the SEC.  A spokesman said the suspension will continue until the issues are resolved in discussions with the company.  Meanwhile, Lifeline Healthcare said it plans legal action against the NASD and certain of its member brokers because of what the company says was illegal short selling of its stock and a failure by the NASD to pursue an earlier Lifeline request to investigate such trading.  A NASD spokesman declined to comment on the company's statements.  The NASD is the self-regulating organization that oversees trading on the Nasdaq over-the-counter market.  A short sale amounts to a bet that a stock's price will decline.  A short seller sells borrowed shares in the hope of being able to replace them later with shares bought for a lower price.  Midway Airlines hasn't been approached "formally or informally" by anyone seeking to take over the airline, despite heavy trading in the carrier's stock last week, said Chairman David Hinson.  On Wednesday, Midway stock rose $4 to $18.875, its 12-month high, on the New York Stock Exchange on volume of 900,000.  Midway closed at $19, up 75 cents yesterday.  Mr. Hinson said Midway "has no interest in being acquired."  He said airline stocks "appear to be in vogue" because the number of companies that would make "viable candidates for leveraged buy-outs is diminishing."  He said recent aircraft purchases by many airlines has added to those carriers' asset value.  Midway recently took delivery of three new McDonnell Douglas Corp. MD-87 aircraft.  Midway has 34 of the airplanes on order and options for 37 more for a total value of about $2 billion.  However, unlike many other airlines making new aircraft purchases, Midway intends to sell many of the new airplanes upon delivery, then lease them back for operation.  Mr. Hinson declined to forecast third-quarter results, but said year-end earnings should be in the range of $1 to $1.50 a share.  In 1988, Midway earned $6.5 million, or 60 cents a share, on revenue of $412 million.  Mr. Hinson said higher fuel costs and the cost of starting a hub in Philadelphia will affect profit this year.  Midway expects to complete the $210 million purchase of 15 Eastern Airlines gates in Philadelphia and 16 Eastern DC-9 airplanes in September.  Eastern is a unit of Texas Air Corp. Midway will finance the purchase on credit and through internally generated funds.  Mr. Hinson said opening the Philadelphia hub should initially add about $100 million annually to Midway's revenue, with that amount increasing with time.  Midway expects to operate 70 to 80 flights out of Philadelphia by next spring.  Midway accounts for less than 0.8% of the revenue passenger miles flown domestically.  But Midway's traffic levels were up 14% in July from the year-ago period.  Revenue passenger miles -- the number of paying passengers flown one mile -- rose to 299.5 million from a year ago.  Midway's load factor -- the percentage of available seats filled -- was 57.5% for July, up 0.7 percentage point from a year ago.  For the first seven months, revenue passenger miles rose 12% to 1.99 billion from the year-ago period.  Load factor for the recent seven months was 56.6%, up 0.3 percentage point from last year.  To understand why millions of Iranians continue to support the Islamic revolution, visit the orchard of Mortezar Jazani, who takes his name from this farming hamlet about 180 miles northwest of Tehran.  At this time of year, boughs are heavy with sweet green apples and golden apricots.  "Four years ago," says Mr. Jazani, "we couldn't get our fruit to market in the city, because there wasn't a road."  Neither was there enough water to make the orchards high-yielding.  Now, the 29-year-old farmer points proudly to a ribbon of asphalt that snakes through the surrounding mountains, and an abundance of water bubbling from a new irrigation system.  All of this was built by Jihad Sazandegi, or Construction Crusade, a rural development squad set up four months after the 1979 revolution.  A reporter, selecting the village at random and visiting without government escort, hears little but praise for what the past 10 years have brought.  "The shah's policies were destroying farming in this region," says Mr. Jazani.  Waving an arm toward the encircling mountains, he described how even steep hillsides were once covered in wheat, sown by peasants using cattle-drawn plows.  "Imports of cheap American flour meant we couldn't compete," he says, so many turned to grazing, only to have their flocks turned out of the high pastures by a wealthy landowner.  "It was like the mafia here," he says.  "Gang rule."  Many years ago, Mr. Jazani's grandfather fell afoul of one of the gangs and met a ghastly death, tied to two horses and pulled apart while his seven year-old son was forced to watch.  These days, Revolutionary Guards occupy a concrete barracks just outside the village, but their hand appears to rest lightly on the local people.  As Mr. Jazani hosts a picnic under a shady apple tree, a passing Guard stops to chat.  He says nothing about two women who have shed their headscarfs in the midday heat; in Tehran, such an act would almost certainly earn a rebuke, or worse.  "The guards are villagers, too," Mr. Jazani explains.  "We have nothing to fear from each other." ---  Marziyeh Dabbagh, a 50-year-old former terrorist who now sits in the Iranian parliament, or majlis, is one tough revolutionary.  Mrs. Dabbagh, whose activities included making bombs for use against the shah's officials, smuggling weapons into Iran from Syria, and fighting alongside Lebanon-based Palestinians against Israel, may well have trained some of the Hezbollah operatives now in Lebanon.  During the early days of the Islamic Republic, her guerrilla expertise won her the post of commander of the Revolutionary Guards in western Iran.  The men, she said, easily adjusted to taking orders from a woman because "they didn't know what I knew" about weapons and tactics.  Before the revolution, she spent more than 17 months in prison for her anti-shah activities, during which she was tortured repeatedly.  Her wrists still bear the scars of cigarette burns.  Electric shocks to her genitals resulted in an infection so severe, she says, that "the boss of Savak couldn't come into my cell for the smell."  Failing to wrest any useful information, the secret police tortured her 12-year-old daughter.  "All the time I heard her screaming, I was reciting Koran," she says.  Neither she nor her daughter broke, she says.  She escaped from prison when a visiting relative volunteered to take her place.  Shrouded in the relative's long, black chador, she slipped past her guards unrecognized.  Mrs. Dabbagh tells all this with the air of a raconteur, giving a gravelly belly laugh at the thought of outwitting the authorities.  She went into exile with the Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini.  Contrary to the West's view, she says, the ayatollah was a staunch opponent of what he saw as worldwide oppression of women.  "To show that women could do anything, he always tried to put them in the forefront," she says.  In France, he put her in charge of the security of his house.  Two days before his return to Iran, she injured herself tackling a French reporter who was trying to climb over the wall.  She missed the flight and hasn't quite forgiven the press.  When the ayatollah wanted to send an envoy to the Soviet president, Mikhail Gorbachev, he chose Mrs. Dabbagh.  She gives a deep chuckle when asked how the Soviet leader received the ayatollah's invitation to embrace Islam, and does a remarkabe impersonation of Mr. Gorbachev as his politician's polite smile turns to glazed incomprehension.  Asked if she ever joked like this with the ayatollah, Mrs. Dabbagh shakes her head.  "He was so majestic that no one, other than the family, dared to talk with him about anything but necessities."  ---  Iranian tradition stresses family closeness, but these days, family gatherings can reveal how war and revolution have torn families apart.  The Shabba-Haft, or Seventh Night, is an evening of mourning one week after a death.  Families gather, women in one house, men at a neighbor's, to listen to readings from the Koran and take part in ritual grieving until the mood is lightened by the sharing of an elaborate feast.  The recent Shabba-Haft of a 90-year-old greatgrandmother brought together one uppermiddle-class family that has paid dearly for the past 10 years of turmoil.  A picture of the dead woman's grandson, a "martyr" in the war with Iraq, occupied pride of place in the living room.  Beneath the portrait sat the young man's sister, who spent seven years in jail for shouting "Death to Khomeini."  Her brother, the martyr, had turned her in.  The young woman's aunt, sitting alongside her, hadn't any children to bring to the gathering.  Two died fighting for the regime, another died struggling against it.  A daughter was shot while training in a volunteer women's militia.  At her first rifle practice, she was so startled by the sound of gunfire that she stood up in her trench and was hit in the head by a stray bullet.  One son is still listed as missing in action from the Iraq warfront; another was executed for his support of the People's Mujahedeen opposition group.  Asked if all her sacrifices have been worth it, the woman, a teacher, is uneqivocal: "Our village was the first to tear down the shah's statue," she says.  "We haven't wavered from that path, and we won't in the future, no matter what you Westerners think."  An elderly woman, overhearing, snorts contemptuously.  "This country is ruined," she mutters.  "Tell your readers that."  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills increased 0.4% last week to 1,863,000 tons from 1,856,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 2.0% from the 1,901,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 83.8% of its capability last week, compared with 83.5% the previous week and 89.1% a year ago.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Aug. 5 ........... 1,863,000 83.8%  @ Week to July 29 .......... 1,856,000 83.5%  @ Year to date ............. 60,776,000 88.2%  @ Year earlier to date ..... 59,936,000 89.8%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  THERMO PROCESS SYSTEMS Inc., Waltham, Mass., said it completed the sale in Europe at par of $40 million of 6.5% convertible subordinated debentures due in 1997.  The debentures will be convertible into shares of common stock at a price of $15.50 each.  GENERAL BINDING Corp. declared a 3-for-2 stock split payable Aug. 31 to stock of record Aug. 15, and increased its quarterly dividend by 5%.  The Northbrook, Ill., maker of business machines and supplies said it declared a dividend of seven cents on each post-split share, payable Sept. 25 to stock of record Sept. 12.  The new dividend is equivalent to 10.5 cents, an effective increase from the 10 cents a share the company had been paying.  After the split, the company will have about 16 million shares outstanding.  The state of Alaska has reassigned its top oil spill and tanker terminal inspector, whose aggressive efforts to enforce environmental standards have long angered the oil industry and its powerful political friends.  Dan Lawn, who had been director of the Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation's Valdez office, has filed a grievance through the state employee's union and has told friends that he'll resist the new assignment, which is basically a desk job.  The agency's move also has infuriated many of Mr. Lawn's colleagues, who see it as an ill-timed concession to oil industry pressure and a blow to the state's ability to make the industry obey environmental strictures.  Mr. Lawn has been in Valdez for 12 years and knows more about the operations of the oil storage and tanker terminal there than any regulator.  In essence, the state has ordered him to give up all involvement in monitoring the oil industry's sometimes lax compliance with water and air-pollution limits at the facility.  The state also ordered Mr. Lawn to drop his prominent role in monitoring Exxon Corp.'s efforts to clean up damage from the March 24 mishap involving the Exxon Valdez supertanker, in which 11 million gallons of oil were dumped into Prince William Sound.  Mr. Lawn declined to comment, although he is known to be furious about the move.  His new job would be to review oil spill contingency plans, which already was among his responsibilities.  In his grievance, he asserts that the reassignment is a disciplinary action with no just cause and no due process.  Larry Dietrick, the Department of Environmental Conservation's director of environmental quality and the person who initiated the transfer, last week described the new assignment as an important and challenging "new opportunity" for Mr. Lawn.  But union officials said Mr. Lawn, who has been stripped of his title, would see his pay cut at least $60 a month and would have his health insurance and other benefits slashed.  Mr. Dietrick couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  An agency spokesman said he couldn't comment on why Mr. Lawn was reassigned, but said it wasn't because of political or oil industry pressure.  However, several of Mr. Lawn's colleagues questioned that.  Over the years, the blunt Mr. Lawn has had frequent run-ins with industry officials because of his investigations into the operations of Alyeska Pipeline Service Co., the consortium that runs the pipeline and the terminal.  He was instrumental in probes that uncovered violations of federal water quality laws and state air-pollution standards at the terminal.  And he was critical of Alyeska's oil-spill response capabilities.  Since the spill, Mr. Lawn has been a vocal critic of both past practices of Alyeska and of the slow containment and cleanup effort by Alyeska and Exxon.  Some colleagues believe his post-spill comments may have led to the reassignment, adding that his departure would undermine state efforts to ride herd on the oil companies.  "At a time when we ought to be more vigilant than ever, we're putting one of our best people on the shelf," said one state inspector.  "It stinks."  The Department of Environmental Conservation must reply to Mr. Lawn's grievance by Aug. 16.  For two years, Ford Motor Co.'s quality rankings of its plants world-wide have turned up something unexpected: The Mercury Tracer factory in dusty Hermosillo, Mexico, produced fewer faulty vehicles than any other.  "There is a common perception that a Mexican product isn't quality-competitive," says Nicholas Scheele, president of Ford Mexico.  "We've demonstrated . . . that our quality in Mexico is as good or better than anywhere else in Ford."  But if that is so, say free-market advocates in Mexico's government, why is the auto industry one of the last heavily protected segments of the economy?  In the past four years, Mexico has removed most barriers surrounding its historically closed economy.  But a 1962 ban on auto imports remains intact.  The import ban was imposed to compel auto makers wanting to sell cars in Mexico to locate plants here.  But with six major auto makers currently producing high-quality products in Mexico, some officials say it's time to open the borders.  A liberalization of the auto industry is due to be announced any day, but the move already has set off a debate about the consequences.  The big car makers have reasons for trying to defend their captive Mexican market: The market's size is modest, but its potential is enormous.  Sales are up sharply this year because of the government's anti-inflationary price controls, though they are still well below the peak reached before the Mexican economy crashed in 1982.  Also, auto makers who were compelled to invest hundreds of millions of dollars in Mexico simply to enter the market resent the thought of competition from companies that haven't spent a dime here.  "If you were to open the floodgates tomorrow, really what you're saying to us is: 'Forget about what we said six years ago.  New ground rules now.  Sorry about your investment,' " says Ford's Mr. Scheele.  "Which wouldn't encourage us for future investment."  The government also has much at stake.  The car industry has turned into what many believe is Mexico's second most important business, after oil.  Auto exports have soared to a projected 200,000 this year from 33,635 in 1984.  Annual engine exports have multiplied to 1.5 million.  The auto sector produces about one-third of Mexico's manufactured exports.  Thousands of Mexicans work in the industry.  General Motors Corp., with an estimated 30,000 workers, is Mexico's biggest private-sector employer.  The recent success of auto companies in Mexico is quite a turnaround.  "The reputation of the industry has gone from terrible to respectable in only a decade," says Daniel Alvarado, an investigator for the Mexican Quality Control Institute.  Most attribute the improvement to the combination of government export-promotion decrees and a depressed domestic market, which have spurred plants to produce cars capable of competing on the international market.  But analysts say the government would like to see the industry provide even more jobs and foreign exchange, especially as Mexico's recent accord with foreign bank creditors provides less economic help than the government hoped for.  "The government wants to create a dynamic auto industry that can play in the big leagues," says Marco Pinon, who follows the auto industry for Wharton Economic Forecasting Associates in Philadelphia.  Mr. Pinon says the new regulations might offer the industry a carrot and a stick.  He thinks the industry will win its longstanding demand for an easing of a requirement that Mexican-made cars have 60% domestic content.  The government also may drop its restrictions on how many auto models each company can produce.  But Mr. Pinon thinks the government is likely to balance those concessions with an opening to at least some auto imports.  "I think the government wants to use market forces, rather than regulations, to make the companies achieve economies of scale," says Mr. Pinon.  Government free-traders hope that producers will cease production of some lines that could more effectively be imported, and turn out more of the models they make best.  It's also hoped that an import opening will bring lower prices and greater selection for consumers.  But auto producers say the plan could backfire if Mexico opens up to imports indiscriminately.  There already is an excess of production capacity for the North American market.  Even Ford's high-quality Tracer has flopped due to marketing problems unrelated to its manufacture in Mexico.  Production in the Hermosillo plant slowed because of high inventories, and the plant is being retooled to produce a new car.  With many North American plants running far below capacity, auto officials say it mightn't make economic sense to continue producing in Mexico if the borders were opened.  "Mexico's a mature market for quality, but not for sales volume, which is still relatively small," says Richard Nerod, director-general of General Motors in Mexico.  "The only reason we've been producing vehicles in Mexico is because we've been unable to import them.  It would be a lot easier for us to import vehicles."  Car makers with older facilities might be particularly hard-pressed to withstand an import opening.  In a sprawling factory on the outskirts of Cuernavaca, Nissan Motor Corp. produces the best-selling car in Mexico, the Tsuru.  But this plant, little changed from when it was built on the fringe of this tourist town in the early 1960s, hardly qualifies as an example of vaunted Japanese efficiency.  There are only two robots in the plant; a similar plant in Japan might have 50.  "It wouldn't make much sense continuing this old plant if we could import," says Kiyotaka Kimura, a plant manager, who dodges the sparks from old-fashioned bulky welding torches as he makes an inspection tour.  "There would be lost jobs and lost foreign exchange for Mexico."  If Mexico's borders are opened to autos, producers want companies with production operations in Mexico to be the only ones eligible to import.  And car makers think the value of exports and imports should balance.  So far, government policy-makers haven't sent out many signals about what they will do, which makes auto executives anxious.  "I'm making commitments now for 1992 and 1993 without knowing what the rules are going to be later this year," says General Motors' Mr. Nerod.  Until Aug. 15, visitors to the Museum of Modern Art will be monitored from above as they pass through the revolving entrance doors and scrutinized, from front and back, as they travel the escalators between the first and second floors.  Their images will be transmitted to, and appear on, video screens that are part of an installation designed by two New York architects -- Elizabeth Diller and Ricardo Scofidio -- which can be found in the small gallery just past the ticket counters and immediately to the right.  The installation is part of MOMA's "Projects" series, which was launched in 1971 by Kynaston McShine and Riva Castleman of the curatorial staff in an effort to keep up with the times and, according to the museum's archives, to give space to artists who were working in "non-traditional forms" and creating "ephemeral, situational work."  Shelved in the early 1980s, while the museum underwent its unfortunate renovation, the interdisciplinary series (all six curatorial departments are eligible to participate) was revived in 1986 by Linda Shearer, who had come to MOMA from the lively downtown gallery Artists Space -- and who recently has left to become director of the Williams College Museum of Art.  The current piece is the 17th show since the "Projects" series was revived.  It is the only one to be created by architects.  And it appears to be one of the most, if not the most, consistent with the series' original purposes.  Ms. Diller and Mr. Scofidio, for example, were at liberty to do pretty much what they wanted in the designated "Projects" gallery.  But they saw an opportunity to resist the typical, static architecture-show format: that is, photographs and drawings on the walls and a boutique-like display of artifacts.  Instead, they took on the problem of inserting something essentially architectural into a museum context -- and this museum in particular.  The result is a constellation of wood and metal elements, at once finely worked and raw, that are braced to the building's structure, tear into its walls, leech its electricity (by means of power cables running into light bulb sockets) and extend, aggressively, into the sculpture garden, the first-floor corridor and the lobby.  Within the gallery itself, mysterious and disconcerting relationships have been created among walls, floor and furniture (some of the latter suspended upside down from the ceiling).  And video surveillance (with live images translated into patterns on multiple adjacent monitors) coupled with the reflections that appear in strategically positioned and angled mirrors, have made MOMA, temporarily, a new and very different place.  Ms. Diller, 35, and Mr. Scofidio, 54, who also will be participating in The Walker Art Center's six-part "Architecture Tomorrow" series (and unlike this installation, whatever they build there will be meant to travel), were a logical choice for this sort of enterprise.  Existing, by inclination, at the edge of the profession, they do fairly little conventional architectural work -- although they are designing a house at the moment.  In their 10-year collaboration, they have managed to carve out a joint career by designing stage sets complete with stage directions and some choreography, while building a number of other site-specific gallery pieces.  Recondite, slightly menacing (with sharp or abraded metal edges and vise- or guillotine-like elements) but often oddly beautiful, these pieces -- including the current one -- do address architectural issues of particular interest to them: for example, spatial perception and its cultural context, and the transforming interactions of persons with the built environment.  The MOMA installation, however, is burdened by its play-on-words title ("parasite") and by the weight of apposite quotations from philosophers Michel Serres and Jeremy Bentham.  These have been cut out of or added on to some of the parts of the exhibition and mounted upside down or backward or both.  Only the persistent will be able to read them.  But the really nagging question is why architects as thoughtful and as eloquent as these are throwing all of their energy into small, personal explorations while the large, important questions of architecture go unanswered -- here and everywhere.  The "Projects" series itself has been criticized as a sop to the museum's juniormost staffers, who curate it: as a strategy for appeasing their bias toward new and close-to-the-edge work while mitigating their discomfort with the re-canonizations taking place in the museum's more prominent galleries.  This charge may be true for other disciplines.  Architecture, however, has been vastly underrepresented in the series from the beginning (R.  Buckminster Fuller and one or two lesser-knowns participated in the 1970s).  It also is the most problematic art form to deal with in a museum setting, since anything portable enough to exhibit usually is not the work in question but a representation of it, a photo, a drawing or a model.  The series' format could, nevertheless, be a fruitful showcase for architects.  If handled correctly, it could even jolt younger and more experimental architects into addressing larger concerns.  ART  IBM Gallery of Science and Art, New York: "Discovering the Past: Highlights From the University Museum of Archaeology and Anthropology, University of Pennsylvania" -- More than 150 ethnographic and archaeological artifacts from around the world, dating from ancient times onward.  Among the items on view: a bullheaded lyre decorated with gold and lapus lazuli from ancient Ur (a site in today's Iraq); beaded and feathered baskets made during the 19th century for ceremonial use by the Pomo Indians of Northern California; and a rare 10th-century silver Chinese death mask.  Madison Avenue and 56th Street, through Aug. 26.  Toledo Museum of Art, Ohio: "Wanderlust: Work by Eight Contemporary Photographers From the Hallmark Photographic Collection" -- Twenty-four color and 40 black-and-white prints from the Hallmark Collection, Kansas City, Mo.  The prints are of places such as India, Afghanistan and the Arctic, and were taken by various American photographers, including Linda Connor, Richard Pare and Stuart Klipper. 2445 Monroe St. at Scottwood Avenue.  Aug. 20-Oct. 1.  American Craft Museum, New York: "A Rain of Talent: Umbrella Art" -- More than 30 functional cotton umbrellas handpainted by artists known for their work in a variety of media -- potters, sculptors, ceramists, architects and fiber artists.  The umbrellas are suspended in the main stairwell of the museum.  The show was organized by the Fabric Workshop, Philadelphia, and runs until Sept. 24. 40 West 53rd St.  FESTIVAL  Lincoln Center Out-of-Doors: Manhattan's largest free alfresco arts celebration offers more than 100 events morning, noon and night at three Lincoln Center locations.  Highlights of the festival, which runs through Aug. 27, include the sinuous Elisa Monte Dance Company (tonight, 8:15 p.m.); "Scat Dancing," a look at improvised dancing from jazz tap to Ellington (Aug. 22, 8:15 p.m.); international music ranging from Andean flutes (Aug. 25, 5:15 p.m.) to the Amherst Saxophone Quartet (Aug. 22, 7 p.m.); and the world premiere of David Borden's music-theater piece "Angels: Visions and Apparitions" Aug. 10 and 11 (8:15 p.m.).  There's also a bevy of children's events, among them a Clown Parade (Aug. 12, starting at 59th St. and Columbus Circle), followed by the First Annual All-American Juggle-In (repeated Aug. 13 at 1 p.m.), and the creation of a 40-foot "goddess" made from fruits and flowers (Aug. 13, 1 p.m.).  Damrosch Park Bandshell (enter at 62nd St.), central Fountain Plaza, and North Plaza (in front of Vivian Beaumont Theater). (212) 877-2011.  FILM  "French Currents: Then and Now" celebrates the 30th anniversary of the French New Wave with showings of 45 films from the 1950s and '60s.  The program will also focus on more current work by New Wave pioneer "auteurs" such as Francois Truffaut and Jean-Luc Godard.  Alice Tully Hall, Lincoln Center, 65th and Broadway, New York.  Aug. 11-27. (212) 362-1911.  MUSIC  Ringo Starr and His All-Starr Band: The former Beatle gets back where he belongs, with a little help from his friends.  Among those in the stellar lineup are ex-Eagle Joe Walsh, Band alumni Levon Helm and Rick Danko, and New Orleans piano phenom Dr. John.  Tour dates, scheduled to run through early September, include: Columbia, Md. (Merriweather Post Pavilion), Aug. 8; Philadelphia (Mann Music Center), Aug. 9; Holmdel, N.J. (Garden State Arts Center), Aug. 11; Wantagh, N.Y. (Jones Beach Amphitheater), Aug. 12-13; Boston (Great Woods), Aug. 15; Kingston, N.H. (Kingston Concert Grounds), Aug. 16; Buffalo, N.Y. (Memorial Auditorium), Aug. 18; Charlevoix, Mich. (Castle Farms), Aug. 20; Sacramento, Calif. (Cal Expo Amphitheater), Aug. 29; Las Vegas (Aladdin Theater), Aug. 30; Mountain View, Calif. (Shoreline Amphitheater), Sept. 1; Costa Mesa, Calif. (Pacific Amphitheater), Sept. 2; Los Angeles (Greek Theater), Sept. 4.  Seattle Opera offers a new $1.5 million production of Wagner's "Die Meistersinger von Nurnberg," with 180 performers and 85 musicians.  Helen Donath and Carol Yahr alternate as Eva, Birgitta Svenden is Magdalena, Ben Heppner and Erwin Stephan take turns as Walther von Stolzing, and Roger Roloff and Stephen West play Hans Sachs.  Hermann Michael conducts.  Seattle Opera House.  Aug. 9, 12, 14, 16, 19. (206) 443-4711.  Rockwell Blake, the acclaimed American tenor, sings the lead roles in two rarely heard one-act Mozart operas, "Thamos, King of Egypt" and "Apollo and Hyacinthe."  The performances are part of the Lincoln Center's Mostly Mozart Festival.  Avery Fisher Hall, 65th and Broadway, New York.  Aug. 11 and 12. (212) 874-2424.  Boots Co., a British drug-store chain that Friday raised its hostile offer for retailer Ward White Group PLC, said yesterday it controls 12.55% of Ward White's ordinary shares and 6.26% of its convertible preference shares.  Boots raised its offer for Ward White to 445 pence ($7.13) a share Friday from 400 pence, thus raising the value of its bid to about #900 million ($1.44 billion).  In response to its original offer, Boots said that as of Friday it had received acceptances representing just 0.06% of Ward White's ordinary shares and 0.32% of convertible preference shares.  In addition, the company said it had purchased shares representing 1.84% of Ward White's ordinary equity and 2.87% of its convertible shares.  In rejecting the bid, Ward White, which sells auto parts, bicycles and do-it-yourself home products, has hinted that a higher, rival offer may be forthcoming.  Hanson PLC said it won control of Consolidated Gold Fields PLC and that its #3.5 billion ($5.61 billion) takeover bid is now unconditional.  Hanson, a British industrial conglomerate, said it has received acceptances for shares representing 57.3% of Consolidated's issued share capital.  The offer will remain open until further notice.  Among the Consolidated shares that Hanson now controls are the 29.4% stake it acquired from South Africa-controlled Minorco S.A. Minorco had bid for Consolidated but lost out when its offer became entangled in legal technicalities in the U.S. Hanson's bid for Consolidated, the biggest gold-mining concern outside South Africa, received the backing of Consolidated's board.  Generations of bad teachers in this country have turned writing and reading into painful mysteries, even for their brightest students.  The reasons for this intellectual and social catastrophe are many.  They include the usual suspects, television and other electronic and chemical squatters in the youthful brain.  But the roots of the problem are older and deeper than that.  We have always had too many professors who neither loved literature nor knew how to write.  In an earlier generation, modernist pedagogues treated literary texts like puzzles, and the act of writing was like a romantic plunge into the dark woods of the unconscious, not a craft to be practiced and perfected in a rational manner.  These days, a new breed of incompetent mystagogues is wearing new robes; call them French frocks.  These assassins of literature teach the art of deconstruction, which is a modish and jargon-filled theory that aims to undermine the traditional humanist's "naive" love of reading and veneration of the classics.  The deconstructionists hope to show that the "canon" of books once blithely assumed to represent the best writing handed down from the past was in fact a sinister tissue of propaganda meant to inculcate the supremacy of the white patriarchal capitalist hegemony of Christian Europe and America.  The best refutation of this dangerous and powerfully placed doctrine is to demonstrate the power and beauty of literature as such.  And this is what Robert Alter does with such affecting brilliance in "The Pleasures of Reading in an Ideological Age" (Simon & Schuster, 250 pages, $18.95).  In another age, this is exactly the kind of book we might have expected from a professor of comparative literature at the University of California at Berkeley.  It might then have served, as it definitely should now, as an introduction to the lay of the land in literature for students about to embark on their first wholesale encounter with the great books.  In the golden days before angry people began demanding that women and black and third-world contemporary writers be added to syllabuses on an equal footing (or better) with Homer and Henry James, in those days before the doctrine of affirmative action was misapplied to freshman surveys in what was then called, without a trace of apology, Western civilization, Mr. Alter's graceful explications of Fielding, Dickens or Keats, in chapter/lectures devoted to such topics as allusion, structure and style, would have been, so to speak, par for the course.  Today, this is a book that ought to be placed in the hands of any young person who shows the slightest interest in serious reading or in hearing a good, practical defense of high culture.  Since even our best schools may have abandoned the actual teaching of literature in the old way (and since even in the best of times there were few instructors with Mr. Alter's gift for explication), "The Pleasures of Reading" is a simple substitute for what has been deconstructed in contemporary curricula.  Without quite saying so, Mr. Alter has taken up the challenge of the deconstructionists in a personal way.  Or perhaps it would be truer to say that he has put himself forward as the champion of his profession, traditionally conceived, and has dared to show exactly how old-fashioned talk about books can be smarter and tougher and more persuasive than the theoretical attacks on normal reading launched from Nanterre to New Haven.  Summarized here, his elegant little performances would not be done justice.  But his basic method is worth outlining.  Take, for example, his longish analysis of three-and-a-half paragraphs from chapter 22 of part one of Anna Karenina.  This passage (quoted completely) occurs as a section of a chapter on "perspective," in other words, the point of view from which a story is told.  This is a technical issue, one much fought over by academic narratologists.  But Mr. Alter redeems it with his intelligent and sensitive discussion here of Tolstoy's treatment of the entrance of the ingenue Kitty at a ball.  Mr. Alter shows us how Tolstoy works his magic, how he so famously gives us his characters, makes them live.  Mr. Alter calmly dissects the passage, points out its shifting narrative perspectives, its ironic angles of vision.  He turns this jewel around and over, missing none of its facets or the different colors they reflect.  Succinctly, he offers us a brilliant view of Tolstoy's genius and makes us want to read more.  "The Pleasures of Reading" contains many more of these gems, several necklaces of them.  Mr. Alter has things of high interest to say about Pope and Defoe and George Eliot.  He is also extremely good on the Bible -- his formal title is professor of Hebrew and comparative literature.  But I think this book risks misfiring with impatient younger readers because it is not wholeheartedly intended for the innocent.  In addition to the passages of literary discussion, in which one breathes the pure serene, there is also much tactical argument of a more technical sort meant, one imagines, for Mr. Alter's colleagues.  These passages verge on, and sometimes fall into, profspeak.  They have their value; they make their points.  But I often wished, as I hurried through them to get to the literary analysis, that they had been tucked away somewhere in small type, in one of those sections that really old-fashioned primers used to entitle "To the Teacher."  Caveat lector.  If Mr. Alter's preambles don't appeal, skip ahead to the good parts.  I found Arthur Cyr's July 12 editorial-page article, "Only in America Is the Flag King," most interesting.  It is quite ironic that of all the West European countries, West Germany has the toughest laws regarding desecration of the flag.  I couldn't help thinking that some burning of the Nazi flag would have been appropriate during the dark days of Hitler.  Of course, most Germans would have been incensed by such an act; after all, Hitler came to power in a democracy.  Unfortunately, the Germans did not have a firmly established Constitution with a Bill of Rights.  Protesters in general, and the Jewish people in particular, had no lawful protection.  It is with a strong Constitution and Bill of Rights that liberty is guaranteed and dissent protected.  Americans have lost sight of the fact that liberty and democracy are not one and the same.  With no Bill of Rights, the majority could vote to deprive the minority of whatever liberties it decided were no longer needed.  Our Founding Fathers understood this danger.  Now we have our president proposing that the Constitution be amended to provide for laws to prohibit desecration of the flag.  A separate amendment regarding desecration of the flag merely would pit one amendment against another.  For one person's freedom of speech (i.e. flag burning) may be another's desecration.  I suppose that if George Bush had been around during the time of Thomas Jefferson and James Madison he would have written the First Amendment a bit differently.  After all, isn't Mr. Bush really proposing that the Bill of Rights be amended?  As far as I'm concerned, America is strong enough to withstand flag burning.  Just don't burn our Constitution and Bill of Rights]  Christopher W. Carpenter  Seminole, Fla.  Volkswagen AG said it will include several extras as standard equipment in its 1990 models without raising sticker prices, forming the basis of a marketing strategy to retain its leading position in Europe's auto market.  The world's fourth-largest auto maker said that by holding down prices despite the added value to its cars, it will sacrifice about 300 million marks ($156.8 million) in profit.  The marketing strategy will begin in two weeks in West Germany with the beginning of the 1990 model year and will affect, to various degrees, all Volkswagen models.  Volkswagen's Audi AG subsidiary isn't included.  Volkswagen plans to gradually introduce the strategy to other European markets, according to Volkswagen's marketing director, Werner P. Schmidt.  The Volkswagen executive described the move in part as a response to criticism from customers and industry analysts over the equipping of Volkswagen cars.  Volkswagen has made a similar move in the U.S., where it unveiled its new Corrado sports coupe last week.  It is offering the car with standard features, such as power windows and air conditioning, that it previously sold as options.  Volkswagen officials in the U.S. had fought to persuade the West German company to stop shipping starkly furnished cars that must compete with well-equipped Japanese vehicles.  Volkswagen Chairman Carl Hahn said the decision announced yesterday passes recent cost savings on to consumers.  Volkswagen, he said, expects to save two billion marks ($1.05 billion) this year through factory reorganization, lower procurement costs and staff cuts.  The West German auto maker is competing with Fiat S.p.A. for the top slot in the European auto market.  Volkswagen has held on as Europe's leading auto supplier since 1985 and in 1988 had a 15% market share, edging out Fiat's 14.9% share.  In the first half of 1989, Fiat had a 15.4% share of the European market, ahead of Volkswagen's 14.8% share.  Volkswagen's 1990 Passat sedan gives a good idea how the value-added policy will work.  The Passat CL basic model currently costs 24,110 marks ($12,600).  After Aug. 21, it will include as standard equipment a U.S.-style catalytic converter, a five-speed transmission, a passenger-side mirror and electrically controlled headlights, which separately would cost 1,857 marks.  Porsche AG said unit sales were below target in the year ended July 31 because of delays in launching its new models.  Uwe Brodbeck, a spokesman for the West German sports car maker, said the company sold about 30,000 cars world-wide in the fiscal year, short of the target of 32,000.  Mr. Brodbeck cautioned the figure was only preliminary, and said more accurate data will be released next month.  He said the slack in sales was attributable to a slower-than-expected launch of the new series 911 Carrera 4 and the convertible 944 S 2 Cabrio model.  In 1987, it was the 50-mile garbage slick offshore.  In 1988, it was medical waste and sewage spills on the beaches.  For New Jersey, this is the year a garbage dump caught fire and melted a highway.  "In other states when they have overpass problems, it's because of bridges collapsing," says Carl Golden, press secretary to Gov. Thomas H. Kean.  "Only in New Jersey do we burn them with a pile of garbage."  Needless to say, the incident won't do much to help the state's image.  It won't do much for the tempers of commuters to New York, either.  Or people going to Newark International Airport.  Or the taxpayers, who no doubt will have to foot the bill.  The fire, which began early yesterday morning and was still burning late yesterday, occurred in Newark under an overpass of Interstate 78, at a 400-square-yard pile of construction debris at Hub Recycling & Scrap Co., fire officials say.  The intense heat buckled the highway about three feet and melted the steel girders supporting it.  The road section "will have to be rebuilt entirely," an official adds.  Unofficial estimates put the rebuilding cost in the millions of dollars, and it's expected to take six months to a year to fix the East-West highway, which spans New Jersey.  Meantime, the 89,600 cars estimated to use the road daily will have to find an alternate route -- to the Holland Tunnel or Newark Airport, or wherever.  Ironically, a spokesman for the Department of Environmental Protection says it has been trying to close Hub for two years, on the ground it is operating "an open, unpermitted dump."  And the state agency's experts had testified that "the place was a fire hazard and presented a clear and present danger to businesses, residences, and commuters in the area."  Lawyers for Hub say the company asked for a thorough investigation and suggested the fire "may have been deliberately caused."  Hub says it "never accepted hazardous or toxic materials" at the site.  In May, Superior Court Judge Paul B. Thompson agreed with the state, after visiting the site, and ordered that Hub no longer could accept construction rubble. (The company is in bankruptcy proceedings.) But he stayed his order so the company could file an appeal, officials say.  In Michael R. Boldrick's July 6 editorial-page article, "Missile in Goo: A History of the MX," he began by listing an anonymous major's seven progressive phases of a government program gone sour.  I would like to add the following from an anonymous pilot's ready room:  "There is no job so simple that it cannot be done wrong."  And its corollary:  "There is no plan so perfect that enough people studying it cannot prove it won't work."  Lee Paulsel  Fort Worth, Texas  I see in the papers that the Ways and Means Committee is considering an increase in the federal tax on chewing tobacco, under the guise of closing "loopholes."  By my reckoning, the increase would raise the prevailing price of a three-ounce pouch of Beech-Nut in downtown Boston from $1.46 to $1.88, or about 29%.  This is an outrageous attack on an American pleasure older than the Republic.  I hope that our gun-toting, country-music-loving, pork-rind-eating president can be counted on to impress upon Congress the power of the Red Man Chew vote.  R. Newcomb Stillwell  Boston  Speedier Cases Ease  The Pain of Bankruptcy  THE BANKRUPTCY field is like mortuary science.  Most people don't even want to discuss it.  Recently, though, a new approach to bankruptcy cases in eastern North Carolina has been getting attention.  The concept is known as "fast track" bankruptcy, or more formally as a Rule 11a procedure, under which parties agree to move quickly.  Under the plan, certain Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings take only 60 to 90 days, rather than the usual nine months or more.  In the two years since Judge A. Thomas Small of the Eastern District of North Carolina began the procedure, some 56 cases have been handled.  Rave reviews are coming from creditors, debtors and even attorneys, whose legal fees shrink when a case is resolved quickly.  A full 82% of the lawyers involved recommend using the "fast track" procedure, according to a survey by Turnarounds and Workouts, a newsletter for troubled businesses.  The North Carolina experience, which many officials think should be expanded nationwide, parallels a recent trend toward simpler bankruptcy procedures for farmers under Chapter 12 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  "It's an excellent idea," says Thomas Stanton, administrator and counsel for the U.S. Trustee, a Justice Department office in charge of overseeing bankruptcy cases.  "It preserves the enthusiasm that there is a way out" of bankruptcy besides liquidation, Mr. Stanton says.  He believes the "fast track" procedures should be made a formal part of the Bankruptcy Code, especially for cases involving smaller companies.  Franchisers Flip Flop  On Choice for Regulator  THE FRANCHISING industry's biggest trade group is having second thoughts about its second thoughts on who should do the regulating.  Currently, the industry answers to both the Federal Trade Commission and state regulators.  When the FTC earlier this year raised the idea of pre-empting any state jurisdiction, the International Franchise Association approved, saying it made sense for members to work under the same rules nationwide.  But the IFA later pulled back on that support; it wanted to see what the states came up with in the way of uniform regulations.  Now, however, the IFA has taken a gander at a set of model franchise rules that a group of state regulators have submitted to the FTC -- and it isn't thrilled.  Rules submitted by the North American Securities Administrators Association are so tough they could make it "impossible for franchisers to remain in business," the IFA says.  Among other things, the IFA is unhappy about a proposal to require a franchiser to repurchase all of a franchisee's equipment when a pact is terminated.  It also doesn't like state plans to regulate a franchiser's power to terminate or renew a franchise.  So the IFA is again considering support for the FTC, which is still studying the matter.  Surety-Inquiry Update:  3 Arrests, More Doubts  CRIMINAL PROBES of the surety business are continuing, netting new suspects and uncovering new problems.  In the surety business, supposedly well-heeled individuals guarantee the performance of small contractors on government building projects.  Investigators say there is evidence that many of these individuals, with the help of surety brokers, have grossly inflated their true wealth.  Late last month, federal agents arrested Stephen M. Bass, Louis Cassise and Robert Gibson, three officials of Surety Bond Services Inc., an individual surety broker in Phoenix, Ariz.  According to an FBI affidavit filed in San Francisco federal court, the three helped supply falsified financial-guarantee bonds on federal construction projects.  An assistant U.S. attorney said indictments are possible soon.  The three men, who were released on their own recognizance, issued a joint statement denying any wrongdoing.  Meanwhile, federal contracting officers say they have begun receiving financial-guarantee bonds that purport to be from legitimate insurance companies when, in fact, the companies have nothing to do with the bonds.  One federal investigator says he believes the increased scrutiny of individual sureties has pushed some practitioners to come up with new types of bogus bonds.  Franchise Execs Earn  Top Dollar Out West  GO WEST, young franchiser.  That's where the money is, concludes a survey of franchising executives by the International Franchise Association.  Chief executives for Western franchisers in the survey earned an average $154,143 last year.  Their peers in the South averaged $139,647, while the pay averaged $139,000 in Mid-Atlantic states, $117,545 in the Midwest, and $108,750 in New England.  The trend held true for lower-level executives.  Pay for top franchise salespeople averaged $127,500 in Western states -- at least 42% higher than anywhere else.  Lois Marshall, the Carmel Valley, Calif., recruiter who ran the survey, says the tug-of-war for talent in the West is so fierce that franchisers' compensation offers to new hires are running 30% above what they originally expected to pay.  Two years ago, final offers were just 10% or 15% higher than expected, she says.  The talent war is being fueled by the rising numbers of franchising companies starting up in California, she says.  Last year, California ranked as the state with the most corporate headquarters of franchisers -- 332 -- according to one informal count.  Is nothing sacred?  New Hampshire, the most frugal state in the union, the state that boasts the lowest taxes, one of only two states without either a general income or sales tax, is debating -- shock] -- new taxes.  In a move that has some New Hampshirites apoplectic, several legislators plan to introduce income tax or sales tax bills come next year.  And even though they insist that any new tax would only be used to lower soaring property taxes, the idea has the state's penny-pinching residents clutching their wallets.  Taxes have become the hottest topic on radio talk shows.  The Manchester Union Leader -- the conservative newspaper that is one of the state's major political forces -- has declared war.  "They're all a bunch of hypocrites to sit there and say, 'We don't want any more money,'" says Joseph McQuaid, editor of the Union Leader, echoing the rhetoric of the paper's late publisher, William Loeb.  "They will smile and lie through their teeth."  "Stoneheads," retorts Rep. Bert Teague, a Concord Republican who will introduce a 5% income tax.  An income tax is fairer than a property tax, he argues: "I want to shift the burden from those least able to pay to those most able to pay."  But Rep. Teague and other income-tax proponents concede that they face an uphill battle with fellow citizens.  Not only are New Hampshirites cheap, they're proud of it.  "We're a little bit tight, wisely so," says Donald Collins, an optician in Manchester who fled Taxachusetts -- as folks here call the state to the south -- 11 years ago.  The state's residents are quintessential Yankees: independent, thrifty and skeptical.  "New Hampshire still represents distrust of central authority," explains Jere Daniell, a history professor at Dartmouth College.  "Opposition to an income tax isn't so much opposition to that as a form of taxation, but reluctance to give the state sources of income to allow it to do what they see in New York and California and Taxachusetts."  Past attempts to pass a state income tax have failed, often by wide margins, thanks in no small part to the Union Leader.  Since at least the late 1960s, any politician aspiring to higher office than county dogcatcher has had to take The Pledge -- a vow against a state income or general sales tax that is demanded by the Union Leader before the paper will even consider an endorsement.  Voters, Mr. McQuaid notes gleefully, "have clobbered any {gubernatorial} candidate who wouldn't take the pledge."  Instead, New Hampshire relies largely on property taxes to finance local government and a hodgepodge of taxes to run the state.  Some taxes, like the room and meals tax and the liquor tax -- much of which is collected at huge state-run liquor stores on interstate highways near its borders -- are designed in part to bring in as much money as possible from nonresidents.  "We have a way of relying on tourists and outsiders for paying for New Hampshire," says Mr. Daniell.  New Hampshire does have a business profits tax, and a tax on dividend and interest income.  But property taxes account for about two-thirds of all state and local revenue, and have been rising 20% or more a year in some communities.  While overall taxes as a percentage of personal income are the lowest in the nation, property taxes are among the highest.  Cities and towns have had to increase property taxes to pay for things that Concord -- unlike other state capitals -- won't.  State aid to schools, for example, is the lowest in the nation.  Services are among the sparest of any state, and slower economic growth has squeezed budgets further in the past six months.  "We're ending up literally now with people having to sell their homes because they can't pay the property tax bill," says Rep. Douglas Hall, a Republican who will propose a 3.5% income tax during the next session.  His bill will provide for "dollar for dollar" property tax relief.  To get that point across, Rep. Hall says, "My bill won't be titled an income tax bill.  It will be titled a property tax relief bill."  But skeptics abound -- starting with Republican Gov. Judd Greeg, a staunch opponent of the tax.  "If you believe that added taxes will reduce taxes," he said in a recent speech, "I have some swampland I want to sell you."  And while many residents agree that property taxes are too high, they question whether an income tax is the solution to their problem.  "It'll be a wash, huh?  Is that what {tax proponents} say?" asks Robert L. Lavoie, a Manchester travel agent, arching his eyebrows.  "When they start these taxing programs, it starts a spending program."  The Union Leader -- which in the past referred to President Ford as "Jerry the Jerk" and President Eisenhower as "Dopey Dwight" -- isn't taking any chances.  The paper's plan of attack: "early and often," vows Mr. McQuaid.  In addition to two editorials and two cartoons, the paper recently ran a package of stories lending support to its position.  One described a 1982 study that showed states that adopt income taxes don't reduce property taxes.  Another noted that a recently enacted income tax increase in Massachusetts may prompt more companies and workers to flee to New Hampshire.  With feelings so strong, even the state's Democrats -- who normally might be expected to support an income tax over the property tax -- don't want to have anything to do with it.  Long the minority party in New Hampshire, they fear incurring the wrath of the voters.  "The Republicans make the laws, and the laws that don't work out they somehow blame the Democrats for.  It's like the Communists in Poland blaming Solidarity for the problems the country is facing," says Ramsay McLauchlan, executive director of the state Democratic party.  "So the party's position is that if the Republicans want a broad-based tax, let them get out in front."  Given the nature of New Hampshire, proponents aren't predicting victory any time soon.  "This will not happen fast," concedes Rep. Teague.  "But next session around it could go."  Hardly, responds the Union Leader's Mr. McQuaid; the chances are "slimmer than a snowball in hell."  Trustees of public-employee pension funds have been throwing their weight around in corporate board rooms and annual meetings.  How much they will press what are essentially political causes is a matter of some interest to corporate managers.  Interestingly, there is little agreement among public officials themselves over how deeply they should involve themselves in companies whose stock public pension funds hold.  Quite a lot in favor of a more active role has been heard from Harrison J. Goldin, New York City comptroller and a Democratic candidate for New York mayor.  Mr. Goldin argued on these pages in February that pension funds with large holdings in corporations are just as much entitled to seats on boards as are other large holders of common shares, a plausible claim as far as it goes.  Similar views are held by California's state controller, Gray Davis, who may yet enter the wide-open race to become the Democratic candidate in next year's governor's race.  Mr. Goldin and Mr. Davis are leading lights in the Council of Institutional Investors (CII), which is engaged in pension-fund activism.  Recently, the two signed a letter to six major oil and chemical companies asking them to follow the lead of Exxon Corp. and name an "environmentalist" to their boards.  Earlier, the California Public Employee Retirement System (Calpers) won an invitation from Texaco Inc. to submit a list of 15 names as candidates for a board seat.  The board picked New York University President John Brademas, a former Democratic congressman, from the list.  But that invitation was a bit special because Calpers had helped Texaco's management ward off the ardent advances of Carl Icahn last year.  CII claims 68 members with affiliations with state, local and union pension funds holding some $300 billion in assets.  But it is not yet clear how much influence it might gain.  Pension funds mostly are controlled by boards of trustees, not individuals, and consensus is needed before funds take a position on corporate issues.  Trustees are by no means of a single mind about bringing pressure to bear on corporate boards.  New York Republican state Treasurer Edward V. Regan, one of the rare sole trustees of state pension funds, has taken little interest in activism.  California reflects this difference of opinion.  Mr. Davis is on the side of activism.  But state Treasurer Thomas W. Hayes, who manages the state's $18 billion in direct investments and serves on the pension-fund boards, is not keen about corporate interventions.  "I have some real misgivings about governments trying to manage private corporations through the use of public pension funds," says Mr. Hayes, who is seeking the Republican nomination for governor.  "The council says that is not what it's doing, but on individual issues I seem to be on a different side from their public perceptions.  I know this puts me at a little bit of disagreement with the controller of the state, who has taken a more active role, but we just have enough to do in California in managing the money without worrying about corporate politics.  "When you look at where we're going, with the funds projected to grow geometrically, we're going to be basically indexing.  If you had asked me five years ago if I thought that was a good idea, I would have said no.  If you asked me today I would say I'm not 100% convinced but I'm convinced enough that I will vote with the fund managers, the money managers, to go that way.  And that's the way we're moving in both of the funds.  Given that, what's the real benefit of trying to get involved in corporate politics if you're not going to selectively pick stocks?"  Indeed, because of rapid growth of Calpers and the state teachers fund, which now have $75 billion in assets between them, the indexing will have to be as broad as possible.  Indexing, of course, simply means holding a basket of stocks paralleling those in one of the broad stock-exchange indexes.  The portfolio moves up or down with the market itself.  It's a more passive system of portfolio management, says Mr. Hayes, but a fund with many millions of shares can hardly play in-and-out games without affecting the market and perhaps damaging its own best interests.  Once a fund's trustees have committed themselves to indexing, there is less potential for the board to influence management by threatening to boycott the company's stock, as some funds did during the big South African divestiture fight of a few years ago.  That fight, by the way, did reflect the potential power of pension funds as a means of applying political pressure as one large company after another sold off interests in South Africa.  There is, however, another side to indexing.  If the trustees are locked into stocks through an indexed investment program, they have more reason than before to take an interest in management performance.  Not all corporate executives are disturbed by that possibility.  For example, Andrew Sigler, chairman of Champion International Corp., says he welcomes the interest of pension-fund trustees in what he is doing, within limits, because a modern corporation needs identifiable and interested owners.  Public pension funds, by and large, take a long view of the corporation's business, he says.  Since some obligations to public employees will not come due for 40 to 50 years, they have good reasons for taking the long view.  Pension-fund managers usually vote with management.  Some fund managers have been attracted to leveraged-buyout syndicates simply because they often offer substantial opportunities for capital gains, but that is another matter.  Mr. Hayes says the California funds vote management proxies unless some specific proxy question is brought before the trustees and they choose to take a position.  He believes in "voting his conscience" on proxy questions, but he is referring to a "fiduciary conscience" -- what is best for the long-term value of the funds.  That primary responsibility of fund trustees also no doubt acts as a brake on activism.  Indeed, Mr. Goldin and other activists tend to couch their arguments in concerns for corporations' future ability to grow and prosper.  Exxon should take greater pains to avoid oil spills because oil spills cost the company large chunks of its earnings, goes the typical assertion.  Mr. Hayes says that in fact broad issues come up at trustees board meetings only rarely: "There are always going to be people who will bring up the Valdez oil spill or banks doing business in China or something like that.  I don't think you ever get away from that.  But I think we have enough to do in government worrying about how to manage government, let alone trying to manage private corporations.  I like to see boards of directors who are responsive to the kinds of investments we're making.  But I don't want the state teachers retirement system or public-employee retirement system out there saying here's the agenda for IBM and here's where we should be building our new plants and here is our capital-structure program.  We've got enough to worry about in managing ourselves."  Given the problems of state and local governments today, and the specific problem of protecting the interests of future public-sector retirees, it's a good point.  Charisma of Sorts  He disagrees with  Whatever you say,  Insults you in every  Possible way.  Wherever he goes  There's always a flap,  But outside of that  He's a nice enough chap.  -- Henry F. Hill.  ---  Rustling Aloft  Twinkle, twinkle, market star,  How papery your profits are.  If on you I'd lay a wager  I'd lose it to an arbitrager.  -- Ward Winslow.  ---  The In Look  Those smartly garbed young status seekers  Dress in three-piece suits and sneakers.  -- Robert Gordon.  Finding out just who really manages the nation's 3,000 mutual funds could soon become a whole lot clearer.  The Securities and Exchange Commission plans to propose rules in the coming months that would require all mutual funds to disclose portfolio managers in the prospectuses they send investors, SEC staffers said.  The proposed rules, which are sure to produce howls from the mutual fund industry, also would force funds to notify shareholders of any switches in fund managers.  This would be a boon for investors, who now often have trouble tracking the comings and goings of their fund managers.  Some investors are irked that funds aren't required to make such disclosures; a portfolio manager clearly is one of the most important factors in choosing a mutual fund.  Federal regulators said the issue is particularly timely.  "We've begun to see more and more funds themselves choosing to tout portfolio managers," Kathryn B. McGrath, director of the SEC's investment-management division, said.  "Sometimes they name themselves after a portfolio manager, whether or not that person is running the fund."  It won't be the first time that regulators have tried to force such disclosure.  The SEC in 1972, in 1982 and again in 1984 proposed similar rules that died when the fund industry screamed in protest.  The heart of their argument: It is the fund company, not the individual manager, that counts most in running funds.  The bulk of the nation's stock, bond and money-market funds are run by a single portfolio manager, a strategy sometimes known as the "star system."  A handful of funds are essentially run by committee, with investment decisions made by several managers.  For its part, the SEC hopes for a more positive industry response this time around.  The reason: The SEC will allow funds to be more flexible.  Though funds with a single portfolio manager would be required to disclose that person's name, funds run by several people would have a choice: Instead of disclosing the names of all the managers, they could choose to disclose the name of the person who has the most influence and the most significant effect on the fund's performance.  And managerial disclosure wouldn't be required at all in a handful of cases involving rigidly run funds.  The most obvious example: index funds, which simply seek to match a market index and aren't very actively managed.  Such funds wouldn't have to identify a fund manager, because any changes wouldn't have a major effect on the portfolio.  The SEC first disclosed its plans in rule proposals pertaining only to publicly traded funds, so-called closed-end funds.  But these proposed rules, which are open to public comment through Oct. 20, probably will be extended soon to all mutual funds, SEC staffers said.  Whenever the broader rules come out, the industry surely will fight them, fund executives said.  Fidelity Investments, the nation's largest fund company, said it has long opposed such disclosure and hasn't changed its stance.  "We try to avoid what some people view as the star system," Robert C. Pozen, Fidelity senior vice president and general counsel, said, despite the high profile of Fidelity managers such as Peter Lynch, who runs the extremely successful $10 billion Magellan Fund.  In fact, Fidelity has a big research department that helps guide its funds, Mr. Pozen argued.  And he said shareholders buy Fidelity funds for the company, not its managers.  Other fund executives worry that fund-manager disclosures could trigger unwarranted moves by investors.  If the new proposals "caused people to sell if someone left or buy if someone else came on, it may well be the wrong decision," said Jon S. Fossel, president of Oppenheimer Management Corp.  Under the proposed rules, funds would have to issue on a timely basis amended prospectuses in which they would have to list -- and could explain -- any managerial changes, SEC staffers said.  In addition to a manager's name and title, funds would have to disclose the person's business experience and length of time in the fund business.  The SEC is basing its proposals on existing disclosure requirements that affect corporations of all sorts, according to the agency.  These provisions require that investors be told about individuals who aren't officers, directors or major shareholders of a company but nonetheless make a significant contribution.  "One of the arguments that funds are going to have to answer is why industrial companies can, and investment companies can't" determine who makes major contributions, said Robert Plaze, chief of the SEC's office of disclosure and adviser regulation.  Some fund executives said opposition won't be as stiff this go-around, for other reasons.  "There are fewer {fund-manager} stars now," Stanley Egener, president of Neuberger & Berman Management Inc., said.  "You won't see the outrage you would have seen five years ago."  DRUG TESTING by private employers gets chilly reception in some courts.  The U.S. Supreme Court rules the federal government may test workers in sensitive or safety-related jobs.  But a New Jersey court decides a private employee can sue for wrongful discharge if fired merely because of a random drug test, says Howard Lavin of Stroock & Stroock & Lavan, a New York law firm.  A California court awards $480,000 to an office worker fired after refusing such a test, says David Bacon of Adams, Duque & Hazeltine, Los Angeles.  Both decisions are being appealed.  Alaska's supreme court, though, rejects a challenge to an airline's random drug tests, Mr. Bacon says.  And Mr. Lavin notes a federal court in New York says a worker who tests positive can't claim he is a handicapped worker whose job is protected unless he has sought treatment.  A New York court, however, rules that a worker testing positive is perceived to be disabled and can't be fired or refused work unless the company demonstrates he can't do the job.  A dozen states and cities have regulated testing, Mr. Lavin says.  Utah limits employer exposure to suits.  CRY FOR HELP] Lifeguards are in short supply at some beaches and pools.  Swimming areas around metropolitan Boston are shy 100 guards this summer, forcing curtailed protection at some outlying beaches.  A new state regulation requires candidates to pass a $90 course, and some students can't afford the fee.  The Red Cross lifeguard course has been increased to 27 hours from 21, says Jim Kelsea, aquatics director in Corpus Christi, Texas.  "Students find it hard to work in the time," he says.  Inner-city pools are especially hard to staff.  "We try to train kids who have grown up at the pool so everybody knows them," says Lonnie Walker, a Dallas parks official.  But there's no problem at Oak Hills Country Club in San Antonio.  Nor at Los Angeles County beaches, where the base pay is $12.06 an hour.  "We're more aquatic minded out here," an official explains.  SAFETY EMPHASIS grows -- in part under prodding -- at major employers.  Mounting accident claims and tightened federal regulation, plus the recognition that good safety is good business, prompt companies to devote more attention and money to worker safety.  At LTV Corp.'s aircraft products division, spending jumps 25% this year, to $2.6 million, in large measure because of a 27% rise in workers' compensation payments, to $6.5 million last year.  Allen Group's safety-related spending has soared 50% over five years.  Du Pont Co. says it re-emphasizes safety after a lapse a couple of years back, when the stress was on productivity and quality.  "We erroneously thought we would continue to do well without day-to-day attention," Bruce Karrh, a vice president, says.  Now the accident rate is half of what it was in early 1987.  Scott Paper Co. views a safe workplace as one precondition of being a "pre-eminent company," its goal.  "People ought to come to work and go home in the same condition," Coleman Co. says.  THE IRS signals it's OK to use tax-deductible Section 401(h) arrangements to prefund retiree health costs even when a company's pension fund is fully funded.  Fred Rumack of Buck Consultants says the IRS tells employers they can get the necessary blessing from local IRS offices.  OVER 10 MILLION workers by year end will own a stake in their companies through employee stock ownership plans or similar stock bonus plans, the National Center for Employee Ownership estimates.  Some 865,000 employees were added last year.  LEFT-HANDED MEN are one-third more likely to have accidents on the job than right-handers, finds Stanley Coren, a University of British Columbia psychologist.  A principal suspect: the right-handed bias of the equipment they use.  POOR WORKER SKILLS force one in three banks to offer basic training in reading, writing and arithmetic, the American Bankers Association says.  The programs cost the industry $32 million a year.  STOCK FOR DIRECTORS: As more firms use incentive, questions are raised.  Some 40% of the nation's 100 largest companies use stock or stock options to lure and hold on to outside directors, consultant Towers Perrin says.  That's up from 7% in 1985.  Consultant Sibson & Co. finds stock packages at 13% of 275 companies studied, up from 3% in 1983.  In most cases, the stock is thrown in as an added incentive atop annual cash retainers that can run to $25,000 and meeting fees of as much as $1,000.  Owning stock "encourages directors to identify far more closely with the concerns of shareholders," declares Michael Halloran of Towers Perrin.  Sibson's Jude Rich agrees.  But Mr. Halloran sees a potential conflict if directors share in stock plans while judging management stock-based incentive programs.  And Mr. Rich argues that stock should be paid instead of cash, not as extras beyond regularly rising fees.  At some companies, stock awards can add as much as 40% to a director's total compensation.  THE CHECKOFF: Prof.  Henry Higgins would be shocked.  A New York company, Communispond Inc., is opening an office in London to teach the English how to speak. . . .  Thank goodness it's Tuesday.  There never is a good day to fire anybody, human-resource managers say, but if they've got to make a choice, most pick Friday, with Monday second, Adia Personnel Services finds.  Next year, the Census Bureau will conduct the nation's 21st decennial census.  Ironically, while the bureau collects masses of information partly to justify expanding various welfare programs, many poor people will be victimized by their answers.  While many liberal groups are worried about how the census will count the homeless, no one is paying attention to how the census could create new homeless.  The census forms next year will ask up to 59 compulsory questions per household, depending on whether it receives a long or short form.  They will include up to 26 questions on housing -- type of building, approximate number of units in the building, monthly rent or mortgage payment, whether solar energy is used, etc. Anyone who refuses to answer any question can be fined $100.  Each household will receive an official notice with its census form next March: "Although your answers are required, the law guarantees privacy. . . .  The only people allowed to see your answers to the census are Census Bureau employees.  No one else -- no person, government agency, police office, judge, welfare agency -- can see them.  It's the law."  Federal law states that "in no case shall {census} information be used to the detriment of any respondent or other persons to whom such information relates."  Yet, people have been evicted for giving honest census answers.  Though the Census Bureau does not release data on each household, it does release information on blocks -- and a block can have as few as six houses on it.  The average block contains 14 houses.  According to the General Accounting Office, one of the most frequent ways city governments use census information is to detect illegal two-family dwellings.  An American Planning Association survey reported that housing code enforcement was a key benefit of census data for local governments.  For instance, Montgomery County, Md., and Pullman, Wash., use census data on the number of housing units in a structure to check compliance with zoning regulations.  The Long Island Regional Planning Board uses census "block counts . . . to estimate the extent of illegal two-family home conversions," according to a June 27, 1986, board letter.  Such "illegal" two-family dwellings are pervasive on Long Island, according to Anthony Downs of the Brookings Institution.  Such crackdowns are especially unfortunate because, as George Sternlieb of Rutgers University notes, "The biggest source of good-size rental apartments in America is the illegal conversion of single family houses."  Census data help housing inspectors zero in on violators.  Bruce Stoffel of the Community Services Department of the city of Urbana, Ill., declared in an Aug. 24, 1987, letter to the Census Bureau that he "routinely used census data to analyze the development stage of neighborhoods to determine the most appropriate public intervention strategies (e.g., code enforcement)."  Obviously, the people most likely to live in overcrowded situations are poor people, especially immigrants, who often cluster in the same neighborhood.  Housing codes have long been used as a means to "keep out undesirables" and to exclude waves of newcomers.  William Tucker, author of the forthcoming "The Excluded Americans," notes: "Code enforcement has always been a very counterproductive way of trying to help the poor.  It usually sacrifices the adequate in favor of the ideal."  The Census Bureau denies responsibility for the eviction of poor people because the bureau does not release the precise names and addresses of housing-code violators.  It makes a similar argument about events that occurred in 1942, when the Census Bureau provided the Army with a list of exactly how many Japanese-Americans lived in given neighborhoods, making it easy to round them up for internment during World War II.  Census Bureau spokesman Ray Bancroft insists that this was not a breach of confidentiality because the bureau did not give out the names or exact addresses of Japanese-Americans.  This is like someone claiming he bears no responsibility for setting loose on your block a wolf that just happened to gnaw on your leg -- simply because he didn't set the wolf free at your doorstep and tell the wolf to bite you personally.  The IRS in 1983 attempted (largely unsuccessfully) to combine census data with private mailing lists in order to track down people who don't file income taxes.  As computer technology advances, the ability of the IRS to "abuse" census data will increase.  As David Burnham, author of the forthcoming "The IRS: A Law Unto Itself," says: "The IRS will try it again.  As marketing lists become more complete and accurate, the IRS will become more able to combine them with census information to track people down."  Information on race and home ownership is used to discover allocations of housing units that are discriminatory under the Civil Rights Act of 1984.  Oxnard Park, Calif., uses census data to discover areas where landlords illegally discriminate against families with children.  Information on occupations is used by corporations and government attorneys to construct affirmative-action quotas for different industries.  Information on "place of birth" is used by the Civil Rights Commission as a baseline for determining discrimination by national origin.  Even though the census is especially inaccurate with regard to minorities (who often prefer not to be counted), census data are increasingly being used to construct proofs of prejudice and discrimination.  But the more intrusive government becomes, the less information it will get.  The Census Bureau is expecting a sharp decrease in the percentage of households that voluntarily mail back their census forms -- from 83% in 1980 to 78% in 1990.  A lower response rate will sharply increase the costs of doing the census.  The cost per capita of the census has increased from $121 in 1970 to a projected $1,040 in 1990 -- a cost spiral that almost makes the Pentagon look good. (The total census cost next year is expected to weigh in at $2.6 billion.)  While most information-intensive industries utilize computers to sharply lower their costs of operation, the Census Bureau has repeatedly botched its operations and squandered millions.  The bureau will need to recruit 300,000 census takers next year to go around and knock on doors.  But, unless the nation has a major recession between now and then, the efforts to recruit temporary help could be a big failure, and the entire census effort could run aground.  Recruitment is already running into difficulty in many areas.  The more information the government collects on people, the more control the government will have over people.  When there are hundreds of thousands of pages of federal, state and local rules and regulations, almost every citizen must be guilty of something.  And with millions of government employees in this nation, there are too many people with an incentive to abuse government information to fill their quotas of citations, arrests and investigations.  ---  Mr. Bovard, a 1980 census taker, is an associate policy analyst for the Competitive Enterprise Institute.  Marubeni Corp., a Japanese trading house, said it plans to establish an investment subsidiary in Europe.  Marubeni officials said they will make an official decision soon, and hope to set up the company this fall.  A company official said the Netherlands is "one of the top candidate sites.  But we have made no decisions on this, or other details."  Marubeni said it needs the new subsidiary because its existing European offices can't handle large mergers and acquisitions.  Australia & New Zealand Banking Group Ltd. said it has a 19% stake in Helenus Corp. of Australia, which bought New Zealand Steel Ltd. for 323 million New Zealand dollars (US$193 million) last month.  Broken Hill Proprietary Co., Australia's biggest steel producer, controls Helenus with a 56% stake.  Charles Griss, chief financial officer for Australia & New Zealand Banking, or ANZ, said the group's involvement is a commercial decision and isn't related to money the group is owed by Equiticorp International PLC, a failed investment banking and finance company that owned 80% of New Zealand steel.  Sumitomo Chemical Co. of Japan said parent-company pretax profit climbed 44% in the first half, to a record 25.72 billion yen ($183.9 million) from 17.90 billion yen a year earlier, reflecting strong domestic demand.  Net income jumped 55%, to a record 11.63 billion yen from 7.52 billion yen.  Sales rose 8%, to 299.90 billion yen from 277.81 billion yen.  Company officials attributed the gains to growing demand for petrochemical products, generated by Japan's sustained economic expansion.  For the year, Sumitomo expects pretax profit of 40 billion yen, which would be a 9% increase from 36.69 billion yen last year, and net income of 19 billion yen, or a 27% increase from 14.91 billion yen.  Goodman Fielder Wattie Ltd. agreed to buy the 50% of Australian Poultry Ltd. it doesn't already own from its joint-venture partner, Amatil Ltd., for an undisclosed price.  Goodman Fielder said Australian Poultry is the second-largest poultry producer in Australia, with annual sales of more than 350 million Australian dollars (US$267 million).  Goodman Fielder, the biggest food company in Australia and New Zealand, will control about 30% of the Australian poultry market after the purchase, which is subject to regulatory approval.  Goodman Fielder and Amatil have been joint-venture partners in the poultry business since 1984.  Amatil is 59.5% owned by Coca-Cola Co. of the U.S.  The Nasdaq over-the-counter market surged as both individual and institutional investors re-embraced technology issues big and small.  The Nasdaq Composite Index soared 4.31, or nearly 1%, to a record 461.73.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of big nonfinancial stocks vaulted 7.24 to 437.52 on the strength of the technology issues that dominate it.  The Nasdaq Financial Index rose 2.49 to 454.80.  Traders said investors were snapping up technology issues of all sizes -- from giant Intel, to medium-sized DSC Communications, to tiny Chips & Technologies.  Intel, with a market value of more than $4 billion, gained 1 to 32 3/4 on 2.2 million shares; DSC Communications, which has a market value of about $365 million, added 3/8 to 15 1/8 on 2.8 million shares, and Chips & Technologies, valued at about $126 million, jumped 1 3/4 to 25 3/4 on 889,700 shares.  Contrary to widespread Wall Street expectations, Goldman, Sachs & Co. didn't add any technology stocks to the securities company's recommended list.  But that fact didn't dissuade investors.  "The techs are back," declared Lance Zipper, head of OTC trading at Kidder Peabody. "(Investors) were after them all day long, even at the closing."  Mr. Zipper said some investors, who had earlier been betting that technology stock prices would decline further, were also buying shares to replace the stock they had borrowed to "sell short."  Moreover, Mr. Zipper believes the technology group will continue to attract buyers for at least a few more sessions and push the Nasdaq Composite higher.  "They've been depressed for an awfully long time," he said.  William Rothe, OTC trading chief at Alex.  Brown & Sons in Baltimore, said individuals, as well as institutional investors, were buying stocks.  However, he acknowledged that many analysts and investors remain cautious about the overall stock market, worried that it may be headed for a severe correction.  But, Mr. Rothe noted that there is more cash available for stock-market investing now than there was in 1987.  He noted that interest rates now are falling, rather than rising as they were two years ago.  While many investors were buying issues and the Nasdaq Composite was rising, Hedi Reynolds, head of OTC trading at Morgan Keegan & Co., in Memphis, Tenn., said some individual investors seized the opportunity to take profits.  The unusually heavy trading activity for a Monday boosted Nasdaq volume to 135.2 million shares.  Of the 4,401 stocks that changed hands, 1,113 advanced and 780 declined.  Nasdaq's biggest telecommunications issues rose, as well.  MCI Communications added 1 to 38 1/8 on 2.4 million shares.  Class A shares of Tele-Communications also improved 1, to 37 1/8 on nearly 1.1 million shares.  Shares of Jerrico rose 3 3/8 to 24 after the restaurant operator said it agreed to be acquired by an investment group controlled by New York-based DJS-Inverness & Co. and Castle Harlan Inc.  The investment group will acquire Jerrico for $24.25 a share, or $620 million.  Jerrico said the investment group will begin a tender offer through a new corporation later this week for all shares outstanding, subject to, among other things, at least 51% of Jerrico's stock being tendered.  Home Intensive Care tumbled 1 1/8 to 4 5/8.  The company said third-quarter net income rose to $1.3 million, or 14 cents a share, from $1.1 million, or 12 cents a share, a year earlier.  The latest third-quarter earnings represented a decline from the second quarter.  The company said its latest results reflected new administrative costs related to the start-up of its home infusion therapy division.  In addition, the company's third-quarter provision for bad debts increased by about $700,000 over the second quarter.  Helen of Troy added 3/4 to 18 1/4 on 207,000 shares, compared with an average daily volume of 167,300 shares.  The haircare appliance maker's chairman said sales and earnings for the first two months of its fiscal second quarter, ending Aug. 30, outpaced those in June and July of 1988.  He also said he sees record results for the remainder of the fiscal year ended next February.  Gerald J. Rubin, the company's chairman, said he is comfortable with earnings estimates of $2.35 to $2.40 a share this fiscal year, compared with $1.83 a share that Helen of Troy earned last year.  Falconbridge rose 1/8 to 31 bid on 108,800 shares.  An article in Barron's raised doubts about Amax's ability to handle the debt it will assume if its proposed acquisition of Falconbridge, a Canadian nickel producer, is successful.  Vikonics rose 1/4 to 5 3/8 on volume of 20,300 shares, well above its daily average turnover of 1,846 shares.  The maker of computer-based security systems earned $159,000, or seven cents a share, in the first quarter ended June 30, compared with a loss of $579,000 a year earlier.  On Friday, before the earnings were announced, Vikonics rose 3/8 on 51,200 shares.  The National Association of Securities Dealers said it continued the trading halt in shares of Lifeline Health-care Group.  The Securities and Exchange Commission had ordered a 10-day trading halt in the stock beginning July 26 because of questions about recent trading activity and about the adequacy and accuracy of disclosures concerning the company's business operations, acquisitions and major stockholders.  International Business Machines Corp. has called meetings today of customers and consultants to disclose details of some new telecommunications equipment, industry executives said.  Consultants said the equipment should ease customer concerns that IBM had orphaned them when it agreed late last year to sell to Siemens AG most of its Rolm telecommunications subsidiary.  "This should dispel any confusion about IBM's commitment to the telecommunications marketplace," said Dixon Doll, a consultant with DMW Group, Ann Arbor, Mich.  "The way they'll participate is indeed different than people thought a couple of years ago, but the commitment is there."  IBM, Armonk, N.Y., declined to comment, and little information will become formally available today.  The industry executives said IBM is caught in a bind because Siemens doesn't want to announce the telecommunications products until its agreement with IBM is completed.  And that agreement, originally set to be wound up early this year, has proved to be so complex that it is still a few weeks away from becoming final.  So, the executives said, IBM is briefing thousands of consultants and customers at more than 30 sites around the U.S. but won't formally announce the products today.  The industry executives said IBM will describe a new low-end private branch exchange -- a switch that a customer uses to coordinate phone traffic into and out of a building.  The PBX is expected to be more easily expandable than currently possible, and is to be priced fairly aggressively.  "This is a great entry-level product," said Patrick L. Springer, a consultant at Telecommunications Management Consultants, Needham, Mass.  The executives said IBM will also disclose that it has rewritten the software used with its PBXs.  The reworking will help the PBXs work in an Integrated Services Digital Network, which allows voice and data traffic to be sent over the same wires.  Consultants saw that as significant because Siemens' PBXs offer ISDN capabilities, so the IBM move in that direction makes it more plausible that the companies can merge their PBX technology and minimize disruption for customers.  The new software will also let IBM customers' telephones automatically identify the number from which an incoming call originated.  IBM had indicated that sort of capability was coming when it announced its CallPath software earlier this year.  CallPath lets customers use their mainframes and minicomputers to control the workings of their PBXs.  IBM stock closed at $117.375, up $1.875, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday.  With interest rates on money funds and certificates of deposit down sharply since spring, some yield-hungry investors are flocking to a new investment that has a return tied to the prime rate.  The investment is a fund that buys portions of corporate loans from big banks, and passes along the interest, minus management and sales fees, to investors.  The return is supposed to approximate the prime rate, an adjustable benchmark for the rates banks charge on loans to corporate borrowers as well as on many home-equity loans.  Currently, the prime rate is 10.5%, more than 2.5 percentage points above the average yield on a one-year CD.  That sounds just too good for a lot of investors to pass up.  So far, they have put $1.4 billion into two funds that use the new approach, Pilgrim Prime Rate Trust, Los Angeles, and Eaton Vance Prime Rate Reserves, Boston.  Van Kampen Merritt of Chicago has just registered a third fund, its Prime Rate Income Trust Fund, with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  But fixed-income specialists worry that individual investors don't understand their potential credit risks.  "There's no free lunch here," says Ian MacKinnon, head of fixed income for Vanguard Group, a Valley Forge, Pa., mutual-fund family.  "In a recession, these bank loans will be severely tested.  And it doesn't take that many defaults to chew up your interest rate advantage over CDs or money-market funds.  These are really junk loan funds."  Investors who switch their funds from CDs or money-market accounts into prime rate funds "are moving from a relatively risk-free area into the commercial lending business where you must worry about a recession," says Glen King Parker, publisher of Income & Safety, a Fort Lauderdale, Fla., newsletter.  Officials of the prime-rate funds say these fears are exaggerated.  Although 70% of the loans in Pilgrim's portfolio are for mergers and acquisitions, including leveraged buy-outs, the loans are senior, fully collateralized obligations.  Over the past 20 years, the loss on banks' senior, collateralized corporate loans has been less than 1% a year, says Barbara Passino, marketing director for Pilgrim.  Ms. Passino says Pilgrim attempts to be even safer by avoiding energy loans, farm loans, real-estate loans and loans from foreign companies or single-product companies.  "We like boring, old manufacturing companies," she says.  James B. Hawks, president of Eaton Vance's new prime fund, objects to any comparison with junk-bond funds.  "These loans are the most senior debt on the borrower's balance sheet," he says.  "There is collateral available to be sold if the loans default.  Junk bonds, in comparison, are totally unsecured" in most cases.  Still, some fixed-income advisers aren't convinced that these funds are a good deal for the average investor.  "It's not a good investment in this environment," says Marilyn Cohen, president of Capital Insight, a Beverly Hills, Calif., bond-trading firm.  "With a possible recession ahead, what is an excellent quality loan today might be junk tomorrow.  The increased return over CD rates isn't worth it."  Credit-risk considerations aside, the prime-rate funds present a potential pitfall for investors who may want to withdraw their principal.  The funds are being marketed as "closed end" investment companies, a term that usually applies to funds that are traded on stock exchanges.  The prime-rate funds, however, aren't traded on any exchange.  The only way investors can get out is to sell their shares back to the funds once a quarter.  And while the funds say they intend to buy back shares from investors, there are no guarantees they will always do so.  Moreover, investors who sell back their shares may have to pay a withdrawal penalty.  Pilgrim charges 90 days interest if a shareholder withdraws money in the first year; Eaton Vance levies a charge ranging from 3% to 1% if money is withdrawn in the first four years.  The Van Kampen Merritt fund has a similar declining surrender charge.  Pilgrim's Ms. Passino defends withdrawal fees.  "This is designed as a longer-term investment -- not a money fund," she says.  "People use this fund for individual retirement accounts, 401(k) plans, saving to send their children to college, and for portfolio diversification."  Some investment advisers also don't like the sales commissions and management fees on the funds, which are sold through brokers and financial planners.  Pilgrim charges a 3% "load," or upfront sales fee; its management and administrative fees total 1.1% a year.  Eaton Vance management and administrative fees total 1.2% a year.  Both fund prospectuses note that the management fees are higher than those charged by most other investment companies.  Ms. Passino says the fees are higher because the prime-rate fund uses "more portfolio managers per dollar of assets than any of our other funds."  The fund does its own credit analysis of the loans it buys.  Whatever shortcomings the prime-rate funds may have, investors clearly haven't been deterred.  Ms. Passino says the average size investment in the Pilgrim fund, which has been in operation since May 1988, is $25,000.  Investors snapped up $875 million of Eaton Vance's fund in July alone.  China's purge caught up with scholar Li Honglin at his home in the southeastern city of Fuzhou, on Friday, July 7, just about noon.  Mr. Li was sitting down to a family lunch he never finished.  While two relatives watched, 10 policemen entered Mr. Li's home, seized his manuscripts and address books, and escorted him to the jeep in which they took him away.  Since then, Mr. Li's family has had no word from him except brief notes saying that he is all right, and has been taken to Beijing.  Even the Fuzhou authorities at the Fujien Academy of Social Sciences, where Mr. Li was president in the mid-1980s, say they don't know his precise whereabouts.  Mr. Li is one of thousands hauled off to the Chinese gulag since the June 4 massacre of democratic protesters in Beijing.  His tale is "a summary of the Chinese people," as one person close to him puts it.  Long lists of Chinese patriots now in the gulag can be had from organizations such as Asia Watch, Amnesty International and various expatriate-Chinese watch groups.  Of dissidents known to the West, at least 30 have been executed, hundreds are in prison, and hundreds more have disappeared -- whether jailed or in hiding we do not know.  Officially announced arrests number at least 2,500; UPI recently estimated the total at some 10,000.  To focus on a few of these tragedies is to see that the June 4 battle for Tiananmen Square was only the first volley of the latest repressive onslaught by China's Communist Party.  It is also to get a hint that though the recesses of the Chinese gulag may lie farther from Western thought than the Soviet camps and prisons witnessed by Alexander Solzhenitsyn, for the Chinese they are immediate, menacing and packed with some of the country's bravest democrats.  Li Honglin  Mr. Li is a party member who for years worked for peaceful reform within the communist system.  A reporter for a Western newspaper who saw him earlier this year says he was "full of hope" for China.  Born in Manchuria in 1925, Mr. Li joined the Communist Party in his early 20s, before Mao Tse-tung's 1949 revolution.  Schooled as an economist, he taught for a while in the city of Lanzhou, then moved to Beijing to work as a researcher and adviser to the party's Central Committee.  In the late 1960s, during the Cultural Revolution, Mr. Li was sent into rural exile in northeastern China.  There he was forbidden to do scholarly work; he and his family survived the next few years by raising ducks and chickens and gathering dried grass for fuel.  Resurrected as a scholar in the mid-1970s, Mr. Li eventually returned to a research post in Beijing.  A theorist known for his books such as "The Four Isms," he argued that China needed more freedom and democracy.  When Deng Xiaoping began liberalizing China's command economy in the late 1970s, Mr. Li was one of the first to suggest an incentive system for workers.  According to one person who knows him well, he liked to say, "It's not the people who should be loyal to the leader, but the leader who should be loyal to the people."  In 1986 Mr. Li was a visiting professor at Princeton University.  That year he published in the Chinese press an article in which he summed up his views on China's politics: "No Democracy, No Modernization."  In February, shortly before demonstrations for democracy broke out across China, Mr. Li was among the intellectuals who signed a petition asking for the release of political prisoners.  This act earned Mr. Li a mention in a now-infamous speech delivered June 30 by the mayor of Beijing, Chen Xitong.  In his speech, Mr. Chen described the development of China's 1989 democracy movement.  Virtually all the leaders he named have by now been arrested, gone into hiding, or fled into exile.  Liu Xiaobo  There is, for example, 34-year-old Liu Xiaobo, arrested June 6.  Mr. Liu is a party member who worked as a lecturer in the Chinese literature department of Beijing Normal University.  He is married and has a young son.  Some of his acquaintances abroad describe him as a thin, chain-smoking individualist, who likes to stay up late and wears his shirts untucked over faded jeans.  They say he is "witty," has "terrible table manners," and is "very loyal to his friends."  Mr. Liu was spending this year as a visiting fellow at Columbia University in New York.  When the recent democratic revolt began in China, he flew back to Beijing, and became one of the more prominent demonstrators in Tiananmen Square, where he was among those who faced the soldiers during the final June 4 army attack.  He escaped Tiananmen, only to be picked up two days later by plainclothes security officers who knocked him from his bike on a Beijing street and took him away in a white minivan.  Chinese authorities have since accused Mr. Liu of "counter-revolutionary" activities, for which he may yet face a death sentence.  Bao Tong  Among the reformers fallen from grace is the former chief policy adviser to Zhao Ziyang, Bao Tong.  The 56-year-old Mr. Bao, a member of the party's central committee, was appointed in January to head the Communist Party's Political Reform Research Center.  Mr. Bao put his trust in the party's ability to reform itself.  This was the message of a speech he allegedly wrote, and Zhao Ziyang delivered, to reassure delegates at an Asian Development Bank session held May 4 in Beijing's Great Hall of the People while demonstrators marched toward Tiananmen Square just outside.  For publicizing the speech, Mr. Bao was denounced in the Beijing mayor's June 30 peroration: "This speech . . . prepared by Bao Tong beforehand . . . created serious ideological confusion among the masses and the cadres, while inflating the arrogance of the organizers and plotters of the turmoil."  Mr. Bao is reported by various human-rights organizations to have been under arrest since June 3.  Cao Siyuan  Another liberal leader who vanished into the gulag is Cao Siyuan, a 43-year-old social scientist.  Mr. Cao went to the market for groceries the day before the army occupied the capital and didn't come back.  According to an Amnesty International bulletin, "He is reported to have been arrested in the afternoon of 3 June in Beijing."  Mr. Cao is a short, plump, energetic man with thick round glasses, rumpled suits and hair sticking out in all directions.  A party member who has held a series of jobs as a teacher and political researcher, Mr. Cao was appointed last October as director of the Stone Research and Development Institute, a liberal research outfit affiliated with one of China's most successful companies, the quasi-private Stone computer group.  Over the past few years Mr. Cao served as a policy adviser to the recently deposed party secretary, Zhao Ziyang.  Mr. Zhao backed some of the protesters' demands for reform on May 19, and has not been heard from since.  Starting in the late 1970s, Mr. Cao had been urging China's government toward a series of crucial reforms.  In 1979, he suggested loosening up the state ownership system.  In 1980 he began pushing for laws that would allow companies to go bankrupt -- and so encourage more efficient production.  Over the past two years he had proposed that China's legislature, the National People's Congress, become a genuinely democratic branch of government instead of a rubber stamp for the Politburo.  When Premier Li Peng declared martial law for Beijing starting May 20, Mr. Cao and some of his colleagues at the Stone group looked for a way to peacefully resolve the confrontation.  They circulated a petition calling for a special meeting of the NPC's standing committee in the hope that the committee might overturn the martial-law declaration.  Mr. Cao, cheerful right up to his disappearance, told one reporter in late May that he didn't think the strategy would succeed, but it had to be tried.  The proposed NPC meeting never took place.  Instead, Mr. Cao was arrested.  Another colleague who worked on the petition drive, 42-year-old Stone economist Zhou Duo, was detained July 10, according to Asia Watch.  Stone's president, Wan Runnan, has fled China and is currently in the U.S.  Dai Qing  Of the writers dragged off these past few months, the most prominent is a woman in her early 40s, Dai Qing, a columnist for the Guangming Daily.  A party member who grew up as the adopted daughter of prominent party members, she was privy to many inside stories of high cadres.  One friend recalls her tale of what it was like to watch Mao Tse-tung dance -- stiffly and in straight lines until he bumped into something.  An exuberant woman with a broad smile, Ms. Dai made her reputation by publishing the true accounts of episodes erased by the party from China's official history -- such as the tale of a group of Trotskyite cadres slain in the 1950s.  "She knows the dirt and will publish it," says an acquaintance.  During the final days of the demonstrations in Tiananmen Square, Ms. Dai led a drive to persuade the protesters to disband peacefully.  This left some dissidents in doubt of her real loyalties.  The party apparently had its doubts too.  Amnesty International reports that on July 14, according to Ms. Dai's husband, plainclothes police arrested Dai Qing, searched the couple's apartment, and seized her manuscripts.  She has not been heard from since.  Ren Wanding  Finally, there's the case of Ren Wanding, the 45-year-old founder of the China Human Rights League.  Mr. Ren took part in the Beijing Spring democracy movement shut down by Deng Xiaoping in 1979, and served four years in prison for his efforts back then to liberalize China.  Last year he began again to speak out.  On Dec. 26, 1988, Mr. Ren published an article in the New York Times, in which he wrote that "the opening trend in China has become irreversible," and criticized the party as corrupt and unresponsive to the people's needs.  In the Beijing mayor's speech of June 30, he was named as one of the pro-democracy speakers who "spread a lot of fallacies" at a "democratic salon" run this past year in Beijing by student leader Wang Dan.  Mr. Ren was arrested at his home June 9.  ---  Add to these cases the "hooligans" arrested and in some cases already executed for burning the bus barricades with which civilians tried to stop soldiers from shooting their way into crowds of peaceful, unarmed demonstrators.  Add the thousands of people who will never be known to the West, but are known well enough inside China to warrant arrest because they dared to demand self-government.  Add the name of Wei Jingsheng, serving his 10th year of a 15-year prison sentence because in 1979 he explained clearly why China needs democracy to become a modern nation.  Add the weird spectacle of China's best-known dissident, physicist Fang Lizhi, a wanted man now besieged along with his wife inside the American Embassy in Beijing.  Asked earlier this year about the extent of the Chinese gulag, Mr. Fang told a friend that no one can know its full reach.  But everywhere in China, he said, you hear stories of it. ---  Ms. Rosett is editor of The Asian Wall Street Journal's editorial page.  Geodyne Resources Inc. said it agreed to buy oil and gas properties for $32 million from Consolidated Operating Partners L.P. of Denver.  Geodyne, based here, said it is purchasing the properties, primarily interests in natural gas wells in southern Texas and northwestern New Mexico, on behalf of oil and gas partnerships it sponsors.  Consolidated, an operating unit of Consolidated Energy Partners L.P., said last month that it and its parent company plan to liquidate their assets by Oct. 31 to repay about $40 million in bank debt.  Consolidated said the oil and gas properties represent at least 80% of its assets, leaving it with scattered oil and gas properties.  For years, Christopher Whittle, the quintessential baby-boom media tycoon, has been telling friends that what he really wants to do is get into politics.  And now he has -- but not the way he had planned.  After a remarkably successful career in publishing, the multi-millionaire head of Whittle Communications L.P. last spring launched Channel One, a plan to pipe teen-oriented, television news and commercials into the nation's classrooms.  From a business standpoint, it seemed brilliant, cornering a captive audience of young, impressionable consumers and generating potential advertising revenue of $90 million a year.  It was also typical Whittle: finding yet another way to expand the frontiers of American marketing.  But this time, Mr. Whittle, a former co-owner of Esquire magazine and a self-proclaimed "revolutionary" in the communications business, may have overreached.  Already, state authorities in New York and California, among others, have vehemently barred Channel One from their schools, angered by the prospect of commercials in the classroom.  In fact, much to Mr. Whittle's surprise, virtually the entire American educational establishment is up in arms over the plan.  "He walked into an arena basically funded by tax dollars, where decisions are not based on business, they're based on politics and public policy," says Thomas Griscom, former communications director in the Reagan White House and now a professor of communications at the University of Tennessee.  "For the first time, he was suddenly on the national stage."  It is too soon, however, to count Channel One out.  Mr. Whittle, for one, remains cheerfully optimistic, insisting that support is growing for the project.  If Channel One ultimately does succeed, the 41-year-old publisher stands to become one of the most formidable figures in the media industry and in education.  He will also be poised to launch his long-delayed political career.  But if it fails, his privately held, Knoxville-based company will be out $165 million in start-up costs and will be "digging out for 10 years," says Mr. Whittle.  Win or lose, the experiment is likely to help define the blurred boundary between private enterprise and the public sector.  Mr. Whittle is foremost one of this era's best salesmen, as much a packager of advertising as a publisher.  In the past two decades this only son of a small-town Tennessee doctor has built a publishing base and a life style that has earned him the sobriquet "William Randolph Hearst Lite."  Unlike the famed press baron, Mr. Whittle isn't a crusader.  He remained aloof from such weighty issues of his era as the Vietnam War, which he says "wasn't at the top of my agenda" (he got a medical deferment).  And although he says he has seriously considered running for governor of Tennessee in 1994, he insists that he isn't positive which party he belongs to.  But like Mr. Hearst, Mr. Whittle has built a fabled fortune, and trimmed it with lavish surroundings.  His company is now worth about $400 million.  Last October, when Time Inc. bought half of it for $185 million, he personally pocketed $40 million.  A bachelor who has few close friends ("very few people really know me," he says), he has poured much of the money into what friend and author Richard Stengel calls an "obsession with beautiful places and things."  At last tally Mr. Whittle owned a neo-Edwardian co-op in New York's posh Dakota crammed with 19th century art and painstakingly renovated right down to the hand-tooled leather lining in his sock drawers (after 28 months of redoing the decor, he now plans to sell the place for a larger one); a restored farmhouse in Waitsfield, Vt., equipped with heated towels for guests; a beach house under renovation in tony East Hampton, N.Y.; and a 19th century-style, 70-acre country estate under construction in Tennessee.  He is also building a $50 million faux-Ivy-League-campus-style corporate headquarters in a depressed section of Knoxville, an urban renewal project that has made him the toast of the Appalachian capital.  "Chris is always calling me from some airport somewhere with his blueprints in hand -- he thinks about these things all the time," says his architect, Peter Marino.  "I just like to get things right," Mr. Whittle explains.  He once tore down a newly built porch that he felt was 18 inches too narrow.  This attention to packaging, after all, is his strong suit.  So it isn't surprising that Mr. Whittle has turned this skill to fashioning a political image as well.  For starters, he has thrown himself into a crash course on modern-day issues, taking private tutorials on topics such as arms control and welfare at Harvard and Vanderbilt.  He has been practicing his delivery with New York political consultant Roger Ailes, the man who coached Richard Nixon and George Bush.  And, his lack of an announced party affiliation notwithstanding, he is forging some strong alliances with Tennessee's Republican establishment, such as former Gov. Lamar Alexander, who has consulted for Mr. Whittle, and former Sen. Howard Baker, whom Mr. Whittle hopes to hire to help with Channel One.  "Some people are born with ink in their blood," says Mr. Whittle.  "I think I had politics in mine."  Logical, engaging and self-deprecating when required, Mr. Whittle has impressed scores of acquaintances as capable of selling anything, not least of all himself.  But last spring, when he set out to pitch Channel One, Mr. Whittle encountered more than he bargained for.  His plan was to "donate" to high schools and middle schools the equipment needed to receive 10 minutes worth of Whittle-produced, daily current-events programming.  In exchange, he would broadcast two minutes of commercials.  The backlash was instant.  "Channel One is a dead duck," says Peggy Charren, founder of the advocacy group, Action for Children's Television, and a vocal critic of Mr. Whittle.  "If this was his first political test, he flunked."  The decision by New York and California to bar Channel One from their classrooms effectively lopped off 22% of the market, though California's decision may not be legally binding. (Mr.  Whittle didn't help his case much by taking out a full-page newspaper ad lecturing the New York authorities about the merits of his project just before their decision was due.) An increasing number of other states have also denounced the venture.  Mr. Whittle needs to enroll 8,000 schools to make Channel One profitable.  As of last week, only 14 had signed up.  The publisher says, however, that only 155 school districts have been contacted so far and that, in addition to those schools that signed up, dozens more were positively inclined toward the project.  Besides, the real marketing push won't start in earnest until the school year begins, he says.  But within the media industry, some people are already wondering how an operator as astute as Mr. Whittle could have stumbled so badly.  Steven Florio, who knows Mr. Whittle and is president of the New Yorker magazine, no longer believes Channel One can succeed.  "I've been surprised so many mistakes have been made," he says.  "That's not a Whittle trait."  He says it may have been another Whittle trait -- pleasing the advertiser first -- that in this instance hurt him.  Much of Whittle Communications' success has rested on form, not content, in particular its ability to design magazines and other publications perfectly suited to advertisers' needs.  The company, originally called 13-30 Group for the age cohort it targeted, was founded by Mr. Whittle and Phillip Moffitt, friends and successive student body presidents during the late 1960s at the University of Tennessee.  Their first publishing ventures were "survival" guides for freshmen, but they soon branched out to other service-oriented publications frequently underwritten by single advertisers. (In 1987, Mr. Whittle and Mr. Moffitt split up, the latter taking Esquire, which has subsequently been resold, and with Mr. Whittle taking the rest of the company, which he renamed after himself).  Mr. Whittle's claim to fame was his prescient hunch that mass-market media would be overtaken by more specialized and targeted competitors.  He thus promoted such marketing concepts as "niche" advertising -- narrowly targeting specific groups of readers -- and "exclusivity" -- limiting the number of advertisers to avoid "clutter."  He has pitched product in everything from commercially underwritten books to billboard-sized posters plastered on laundromat walls.  The financial success of his little publications -- such as Southern Style Magazine, a beauty magazine underwritten by Procter & Gamble Co. and distributed in Southern hair salons, and Special Reports, a set of monthly magazines given away free in doctors' offices -- rattled Madison Avenue.  Many advertisers began to reconsider the premises on which mass market, general interest media buys are made.  Critics, though, have long raised questions about the editorial integrity of Mr. Whittle's advertiser-friendly, and often puffy, publications.  "Whittle," the New Republic asserted this year, "hasn't just compromised the ideal relationship between advertising and journalism, he has inverted it."  Now, with Channel One, Mr. Whittle's tendency to let advertising drive everything else has "backfired," says Mr. Florio.  "Instead of enlisting the support of the school boards and educational groups first," he says, "they went to the advertisers first.  Now, opposing it has become a 'noble cause' among educators."  Mr. Whittle admits that he underestimated how controversial Channel One would prove to be.  "I didn't see it coming.  We could have been much more politically active than we were," he says.  But in the same way that he seems not to see any tension between advertiser and editorial interests, he sounds genuinely baffled by the hullabaloo over ads in schools, asserting simply, "If commercials were overall a negative force, we as a society would have dealt with them."  Mr. Whittle acknowledges that he ignored warnings.  When friend and banker Richard Holbrooke, managing director of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., first heard Mr. Whittle describe plans for Channel One, he recalls saying, "It's a great idea -- but have you read any George Orwell?"  He advised playing down the commercials, and playing up the educational benefits.  Others warned Mr. Whittle to debut his project on a smaller scale.  But says one associate, "there's some cockiness there -- maybe even hubris."  Mr. Whittle maintains that Channel One will triumph yet.  He cites public opinion polls and market tests done this spring that show a majority of students, teachers and parents support the trade-off of commercials for special programming and equipment.  And he has sharpened his sales pitch, focusing on the need for current-events education in high schools: These days, he quips, many students think "Chernobyl is Cher's full name."  He confidently predicts that, when Channel One officially airs March 5, 1990, 1,114 schools will have signed on, and 5,000 more will be committed.  And he likes to point out that he has trumped naysayers before, such as when he helped turn Esquire around financially.  "Our critics have grossly underestimated us," he says. (At least two other groups -- Turner Broadcasting and public television -- clearly believe Mr. Whittle may be on to something.  Both are exploring introducing programs for high schools, but with one politically astute difference.  Having witnessed Mr. Whittle's troubles, they don't plan to carry commercials.)  A close associate suggests it may have been Mr. Whittle's political ambitions that impelled him to move ahead on Channel One so quickly -- a theory Mr. Whittle denies.  If he is serious about running for governor in 1994, he clearly has his work cut out for him.  One Republican, resentful of Mr. Whittle's waffling about party affiliation, asks, "What does he expect, a draft from the entire state of Tennessee?"  Others wonder how a man with such a jet-set life style and flair for fashion would play in Davy Crockett's state.  "He'd have to get rid of the bow tie," suggests James Haslam II, a Knoxville Republican powerhouse.  The publisher, however, says he has no plans to change his style, and no interest in conforming to conventional wisdom.  "I don't think any rules in life are rigid," he says.  That isn't to say that the pummeling he has taken hasn't left this political newcomer a little chastened.  "For much of my life, politics was an unchallenged assumption," he says.  "Let's just say, I'm challenging it now."  It takes a good stretch of the imagination to conclude that the FHA provisions of the National Affordable Housing Act now under consideration by Congress would lead to the "S&L Bailout II" you describe in your July 12 editorial.  Worse yet, many of the facts you presented are wrong.  In its 55 years as a self-supporting mutual insurance program, the FHA has not cost the American taxpayer a single penny.  The FHA program has been certified as sound by the HUD actuary.  In addition, the FHA's record of financial soundness is actually more likely to stand under the housing legislation proposed by Sens.  Alfonse D'Amato (R., N.Y.) and Alan Cranston (D., Calif.) than without it.  Successful operation of the FHA is based on the participation of a broad spectrum of borrowers across the country.  As proposed in the Cranston-D'Amato bill, FHA loans of up to 95% of an area's median home sales price will allow the program to remain viable in such high-cost-housing states as California and Connecticut so that loans can continue to be insured in markets such as Denver and Houston that were abandoned by private mortgage insurers when the going got tough.  It is also erroneous to assume that raising the FHA mortgage limit in high-cost areas would benefit only affluent borrowers taking out mortgages at the new ceiling.  Rather, there would be a range of borrowing activity between the current cap of $101,250 and that new ceiling.  Another fact: FHA purchasers cannot, as you state, finance the full $100,000 of a $100,000 home, including points and fees.  A down payment of at least $4,500 would be required; in fact, the average FHA owner-occupant puts down just under 10%.  It is untrue that proposed changes in the FHA program would crowd out the poor.  FHA serves all qualified borrowers and Congress has not set binding limits on program activity because no federal outlays are involved.  Shirley McVay Wiseman  President  National Association of Home Builders  Washington  In his June 30 editorial page essay, Robert H. Bork contends that the body of decisions by the current Supreme Court term has not represented a reversal of past protections of the rights of minorities, but only "moderate and overdue adjustments to legal doctrine in the field of civil rights law."  He then dismisses criticism of these decisions, which he sees as arising from the erroneous assumption "that the court's function is to replace law with moral passion, even if that moral passion produces dubious results."  In his opinion, the president and Congress should undertake no action to undo these decisions, since they are "clearly correct," and the court should resist "moral intimidation" and stand by its positions.  Mr. Bork's is an eminently logical position, but one that would be more believable if he were not simultaneously criticizing the Supreme Court for choosing law over passion in the flag-burning decision.  To what, save moral passion, was President Bush appealing in his appearance at the Iwo Jima monument?  Was it concern for the law that caused the House of Representatives to stay in session all night for emotional, if unheard, speeches?  Could the vocal and angry public outcries constitute anything but attempted moral intimidation in its most basic form?  The proposed constitutional amendment would be a dubious result indeed.  It would attempt to protect the symbol of our freedoms by abridging, however slightly, the most basic of these freedoms.  Its use of the term "desecration" is not only imprecise, but also hints at the establishment of a state religion.  Mr. Bork's opinion in this matter clearly puts him not among conservative advocates of the rule of law, such as Justices Antonin Scalia and Anthony Kennedy, but rather among the activists of moral passion such as Chief Justice William Rehnquist, who joked that he would rather celebrate the anniversary of the Alien and Sedition Acts than that of the Bill of Rights.  One shudders to imagine what other "adjustments to legal doctrine" might have come about with a Justice Bork on the Supreme Court.  Martin E. Cobern  Cheshire, Conn.  --- Congratulations to Mr. Bork for his excellent article.  One issue that is ignored in the affirmative-action debate is the right of the consumer to the best possible products and services.  The typical minority member is not a government employee or an independent contractor.  He is most certainly a consumer, a taxpayer and a recipient of government services ranging from fire and police protection to national defense.  In what way is the average minority citizen better off when a less qualified person is hired to teach, manage or pave a highway?  I would ask those who support affirmative action to imagine this.  It's a cold rainy night and you have been injured seriously in an automobile accident.  In walks the doctor who will try to save your life.  Do you want the most qualified doctor, or do you want a doctor who has been selected to offset possible past discrimination?  Rice P. York Jr.  Jackson, Miss.  ---  Mr. Bork states, "All the Supreme Court has held is that discrimination must be proved rather than assumed.  Only to those who think America pervasively and incurably racist does that seem outrageous."  But the doctrine that America is pervasively racist is being taught in colleges and universities across the country.  Even when not explicitly proclaimed in the minority-studies courses and sensitivity seminars that are the fashion to require of all undergraduates, it is the premise on which such requirements are based and it is, therefore, taught, all the more effectively, by implication.  Thus has higher education lent itself to dubious political purposes, at the expense of its rightful mission.  Thomas Short  Associate Professor of Philosophy  Kenyon College Gambier, Ohio  Jack Kemp, secretary of housing and urban development, speaking to the NAACP on July 10:  Enterprise zones will be of little help . . . if there is no capital available to invest in new businesses in the zones.  The people who cannot afford high capital gains taxes are not the rich.  Publisher John Johnson, a true entrepreneur, just wrote a deeply inspiring book called "Succeeding Against the Odds."  The seed capital he needed to begin publishing in 1942 amounted to just $500 -- so near, yet so far.  Unable to get a loan from Chicago's biggest bank, his only solution came from his mom who put up her new furniture as collateral for a $500 loan from a small thrift.  So risky was that venture that Mrs. Johnson prayed and cried for days before she felt she could take the chance on losing every piece of furniture she had.  Not every potential entrepreneur is lucky enough to have a mom with even $500 worth of furniture to put up.  But somebody has to invest the seed corn when an idea-rich but money-poor man or woman in a ghetto or barrio wants to imitate the John Johnsons . . . by putting their dreams to work.  And that somebody should not be stopped because the capital gains tax is too high to make the risk worth taking. . . .  If we are serious about unlocking the door to opportunity, we have to unlock the seed capital for black and hispanic and minority and women's enterprises.  We must convince Congress to cut the capital gains tax to 15% nationwide and to eliminate it in our rural and urban enterprise zones.  It may be cold comfort to investors who sold shares of UAL Inc. on Friday -- thus missing the stock's 46 1/4-point leap yesterday -- but takeover lawyers say UAL was on solid legal ground when it decided last week not to disclose that it had received a takeover proposal.  After UAL, the Chicago-based parent of United Airlines, yesterday confirmed a report in this newspaper that it had received a takeover proposal from Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, the company's stock soared 28% to close at $210.75 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The stock market's violent reaction to what UAL termed an "unsolicited, highly conditional" proposal caused some investors to wonder whether UAL should have disclosed Mr. Davis's overture on its own.  But takeover law experts say that under federal securities laws, companies don't have a general obligation to disclose merger or acquisition proposals, or even negotiations that may result.  Companies will usually issue a news release when they reach an agreement in principle on a merger or acquisition, but even that is more a matter of cautious practice than legal doctrine, the experts say.  "Essentially, corporations have no general affirmative duty of disclosure under the federal securities laws," says Arthur Fleischer, a partner in the New York law firm of Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson.  "The disclosure of material developments is as specified in the law," he said; that means companies must disclose such things as changes in the number of shares outstanding and acquisitions that are significant in relation to a company's size.  And what of investors who sell stock after a takeover proposal has been received but before it becomes public knowledge, missing whatever price run-up might follow?  "That's the breaks of the game," said Bernard Black, an associate professor at Columbia University Law School.  "One of the chances you take when you buy and sell stocks is that you won't know material nonpublic information," Mr. Black said.  And corporate insiders like officers and directors who know such important information are legally barred from trading on it.  There are several exceptions under which companies must disclose merger talks, Mr. Fleischer and other lawyers say.  But none of them appears to apply in the case of UAL.  One exception occurs when secret merger developments render previous statements by the company misleading.  If, for example, a company says it isn't involved in merger negotiations and then begins such talks within a few days, it would probably have an obligation to disclose those talks.  That's why lawyers advise companies to decline comment on merger rumors, and that has been UAL's policy.  Indeed, UAL, in yesterday confirming Mr. Davis's proposal, provided virtually no details.  UAL declined to say when it received the proposal or what price Mr. Davis suggested, though it's believed to exceed $200 a share.  Another exception that could trigger a duty to disclose takeover talks is an apparent leak of information into the market.  "Where there is reason to believe that information about the event is circulating in the marketplace and is the subject of insider trading, there's certainly a suggestion in some of the court cases" that it should be disclosed, Mr. Fleischer said.  While there had been reports that Mr. Davis owned a stake in UAL of less than 5%, there apparently hadn't been rumors of a takeover proposal.  In fact, UAL shares had been sinking for more than a week, as various rumored bidders for UAL failed to surface.  So when would UAL have to be more forthcoming?  The situation would be different if someone had already made a tender offer for UAL and UAL had responded to the offer.  Then, a company is under a specific obligation to disclose whether it is involved in talks about mergers, acquisitions or significant asset sales.  In a decision last year involving the acquisition of Basic Inc. by Combustion Engineering Inc., the U.S. Supreme Court declined to detail specific circumstances under which merger talks must be disclosed.  The court said disclosure obligations depend on the specific facts of each case, such as the likelihood of completing the merger.  Federal prosecutors in New York must be awfully proud of themselves, having cut down the high-flying Saudi financier, Adnan Khashoggi.  He was, at least at one time, one of the world's richest men, a fact that seems these days to be prima facie evidence of wrongdoing.  So Rudy Giuliani's heirs and implants extradited him from Switzerland and forced him to spend a week in a Manhattan jail while they tried, albeit unsuccessfully, to deny him bail.  Now of course, although Mr. Khashoggi has pleaded innocent, come trial he may be found guilty.  He's accused of mail fraud and obstruction of justice in helping the former Philippine president, Ferdinand Marcos, unload some real estate that had been frozen by a federal judge.  Thwarting a judge's order, even one suspect on its merits, would be a serious crime, which we don't wish to belittle.  The man-in-the-street attitude, of course, is that if Mr. Khashoggi is not guilty as charged, he is probably guilty of something.  Maybe hubris.  There are, nonetheless, aspects of the campaign against Mr. Khashoggi that are troubling and instructive.  In addition to mail fraud and obstruction, the Justice Department also originally charged Mr. Khashoggi with violating the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law and, believe it or not, conspiring to violate RICO.  The punctilious Swiss, to their great credit, saw through this gambit.  It's another case of the hair-trigger use of RICO against a politically unpopular individual.  Though the Swiss detained Mr. Khashoggi in April on an extradition request from the U.S., they refused in the event to hand him over for prosecution under RICO -- since they don't have a RICO law.  They also refused extradition for two obstruction counts stemming from Mr. Khashoggi's replies to a French magistrate in Cannes.  So the Saudi may be tried only for the alleged "predicate acts" -- the original mail fraud and obstruction of justice.  In a sense, it's heartening that at least some institution exists to force federal prosecutors in the U.S. to address the substance of the crimes they are alleging.  But it is disheartening that it has to be a foreign government.  The kinds of protections afforded by Switzerland, after all, are not available to all who deserve them.  It would be far better were America's own courts or Congress to end prosecutorial abuses of RICO.  More broadly, there is the question of the Marcos investigation itself, without which Mr. Khashoggi never would have been jailed.  Mr. Marcos also was indicted under RICO, which led to the freezing of his assets prior to a verdict, putting into question his financial ability to defend himself.  It's not hard to understand why an Adnan Khashoggi might want to help a pal facing that kind of justice -- just as Doris Duke came up with $5 million in bail for Mrs. Marcos.  Beyond that, the Marcos prosecution struck us as unseemly from the beginning, making it all the more likely future strongmen would not follow the Marcos example of leaving peacefully, but the Noriega example of toughing out the U.S.  After all, no prosecutor or politician went after Mr. Marcos when he was powerful.  Only after he fell.  In the Marcos case even Swiss punctiliousness failed; the Bern government had his bank accounts frozen even before legal proceedings began.  We carry no brief for Mr. Marcos either.  But if he stole it was not from the U.S. but from the Philippines.  Any rip-off of the American taxpayers was by the Congressmen and Senators and World Bank management that provided foreign aid to the Philippines through the long years when Mr. Marcos was so widely being accused of building up his billions.  If Adnan Khashoggi was too good a friend of the deposed Filipino he was not the only one.  Reebok International Ltd. said it reached an agreement in principle to buy the Boston Whaler unit of CML Group Inc. for about $42 million, signaling a significant broadening of Reebok's product base.  Reebok has made several acquisitions in recent years to expand its athletic footwear and sportswear lines.  But the purchase of Boston Whaler, a builder of power boats, "is certainly a little far afield of exactly where we were," acknowledged Paul Duncan, Reebok's chief financial officer.  Mr. Duncan said Reebok "will certainly look at {further} acquisitions outside of footwear and clothing," as well as within those industries.  "We consider ourselves a marketing-type company," he said, with an emphasis on sporting goods with an "upscale" image.  The purchase of Boston Whaler also will give Reebok its first significant manufacturing operation.  While Reebok has spent heavily on advertising and research-and-development, most of its shoes are made under contract in Asia.  Boston Whaler had sales of $66 million in its fiscal year ended July 31, 1988, and is expected to report about a 10% decline in sales for its just-ended fiscal year.  Reebok had net income of $90.2 million, or 79 cents a share, on sales of $920 million for the first six months of this year.  CML, an Acton, Mass., recreational equipment and sportswear company, last week said it intended to divest itself of several of its business units, but didn't identify the prospective buyer of Boston Whaler.  The restructuring announcement came in the wake of the disclosure by investor Irwin Jacobs of a 14.2% stake in CML, and indications by Mr. Jacobs that he might seek to acquire CML.  As part of the Boston Whaler purchase, Reebok also will receive warrants to buy 400,000 shares of CML common stock at $31.25 a share, exercisable at any time before July 1, 1997.  CML currently has about 6.5 million shares outstanding.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, CML closed at $26, down $1.  Reebok closed on the Big Board at $14.375, down 25 cents.  Charles Leighton, CML chairman, said the warrants were included in the sale package at Reebok's request, but added that CML sees Reebok as potentially a "good shareholder."  Mr. Leighton said he has spoken with Mr. Jacobs since CML's restructuring plans were announced, and said Mr. Jacobs "applauded" CML's steps "to enhance shareholder value."  Mr. Jacobs wasn't immediately available for comment.  Reebok said its purchase of Boston Whaler is expected to be completed within 60 days.  The National Conference of State Legislatures reckons that 30 states raised taxes this year while 11 cut them, for a total increase take of $3.5 billion.  For your planning purposes in this highly mobile society, the states that cut taxes by more than 1% are: Hawaii, Wisconsin, Louisiana, New York, Virginia and Texas.  Only in New York could a kitten end up as a bar of soap merely because a would-be owner doesn't have a spare bedroom.  In its zeal to find the best people to adopt the 30,000 or so dogs and cats that end up at its shelter here on the East River each year, the American Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals is making some enemies over its definition of "a good home."  The debate is impassioned because the alternative to adoption might well be a lethal injection and a truck trip to a rendering plant in New Jersey.  There, erstwhile pets (along with meat scraps and fish parts) are boiled down to byproducts used in cosmetics and other products.  Helen Davis of Manhattan is one rejected cat lover who is furious at the ASPCA, a New York City outfit not to be confused with the local, autonomous SPCAs, which have their own and different ideas about who is suitable to adopt.  Recently, Ms. Davis ended six months of mourning for her 19-year-old cat, Madame, and began to look for a new feline companion.  She quickly fell in love with an affectionate 12-week-old ASPCA kitten -- a little brown female with a caramel-colored diamond on its forehead.  After filling out forms and awaiting reference checks, Ms. Davis was cradling the cat in her arms and making plans to take her home.  Then it happened.  Ms. Davis let it slip that she has a job downtown.  The cat was plunked back into its cage, and Ms. Davis went on the ASPCA's blacklist.  The ASPCA doesn't give young kittens, which are more in demand than cats, to people who are away from home during the day.  That is one of several, usually iron-clad rules.  Some others: No cats to homes without screened windows; no pets to people who are about to move (it is upsetting to the animal); no two animals of the opposite sex to the same home (it risks mating); no pets to any home until every adult in the household has been contacted and approves.  Finally, everyone must be checked against The List -- in reality, a bookcase of black binders bulging with names of everyone who has been rejected or "restricted" by the ASPCA.  Ms. Davis, who says she was told that it had been "cruel and inhumane" of her even to leave her now deceased cat alone all day, admits to having been pretty upset to be spurned in this way.  "I was vulnerable," she explains.  "This kitten was reaching out to me and purring, I was thinking of my old cat."  She is contemptuous of the ASPCA's notions.  "You come home from work at 6 o'clock, and they call it 'abandonment.'"  But the ASPCA has no apologies to make for its policies.  "We aren't a pet shop.  We're not concerned with making a 'sale,'" says Christopher Hamm, the director of animal placement at the ASPCA's Manhattan headquarters.  "We're concerned with the animal's life {after} it leaves here.  It has to go into a home where someone will provide adequate care," he says.  Jeffrey Hon, an ASPCA spokesman, describes the society's policy from a different perspective: "A humane death is sometimes preferable to a life of neglect or abandonment."  Because the private, nonprofit organization is New York's official animal-control arm (and gets money from the city), the ASPCA is inundated with stray animals.  Last year it managed to spare the lives of more than a third of its charges.  That is, it either found new homes or returned animals to their rightful owners.  The others -- about 20,000 -- were put to death in accordance with the rules.  A recent visit to the shelter on one of the hottest days of the year found there a hard-working staff, a steady (though thin) stream of pet-seekers and a placement rate low enough to explain why some people feel they have to lie to the ASPCA in order to get a pet and others leave in a tearful rage.  Consider the case of Brenda Brock.  Ms. Brock, who plays Brenda McGillis on the television soap opera "One Life to Live," came to the shelter seeking a pair of kittens.  Completing the scene is Ms. Brock's nine-year-old niece, Hilly.  The two neatly fit anybody's stereotype of responsible pet owners, but Julie Bank of the ASPCA is, as the rules require, suspicious.  For starters, Ms. Bank, who is 22, phones Ms. Brock's employer, ABC, and finds out that it is OK for Ms. Brock to have a pet at the studio.  Her plan is to take the kittens to work, where several other actors also have their pets on the set.  "Basically," says Ms. Bank, "we don't give kittens to people who work.  Kittens need socialization."  Once a kitten is more than four months old, it is considered mature enough by the ASPCA to be on its own during the day.  Ms. Bank, a sometime-viewer of the soaps, approves of the ABC arrangement and escorts Ms. Brock to the adoption room.  Remarkably clean and hospital-like, it is, nonetheless, a despairing place.  There are maybe 60 cats, including several litters of kittens, in facing rows of cages.  No fools, they poke little paws between the bars and purr when the door opens for a closer look.  Ms. Brock is first drawn to two little black kittens, then to a pair of white ones.  She considers taking one of each, but she is summarily informed by Ms. Bank that they are of different sexes, which is forbidden even though they are to be neutered.  "You might not catch it in time, and you'll have lots more," explains Ms. Bank.  Ms. Brock perseveres.  She doesn't want an over-groomed, over-priced pet-store pet.  She wants ASPCA cats because, she says simply, "they don't have a home and I do."  Eventually, she settles on a gray-and-white kitten who seems a bit under the weather.  Because ASPCA rules require that a sick cat be kept away from other pets, in a separate room that Ms. Brock can't provide, she ends up with just this one kitten, after a long visit with the shelter vet.  Ms. Bank moves on to her next interview: a young man who was turned away the previous day because he wanted to find a Chihuahua for his girlfriend.  The ASPCA, you see, frowns on the concept of animals as gifts.  Now he is back with the girlfriend, Bonnie Tucker of Tarrytown, N.Y. Ms. Tucker, just out of high school, lives with her parents, but so does a Labrador retriever and there's a rule against letting pups go home to big dogs that might have them for breakfast.  "We'll put your application in the Chihuahua file" says Ms. Bank, as the two leave empty-handed.  One fib ASPCA detectives don't catch comes from a Manhattan woman who, to get a kitten, maintains that she works at home.  The woman (who asks that her name be withheld to protect the innocent cat) is a cat lover from way back and is well aware of the no-work rule, so she has arranged for a friend to corroborate her story.  Saved by a white lie, Ernie (not his real name) had what looked to be a short leash on life.  His little adoption ticket was marked with a code "2," which isn't as good as a "1," the rating for a healthy, outgoing, newly arrived pet.  But even a "1" gets only about two- or three-week stint in the adoption rooms.  An animal in the direst straits -- a sick or old or ill-tempered creature unlucky enough to come in when the shelter is packed, may get just a few days on display.  The average is about a week.  Now at home with an active, playful pet, the "liar" says facetiously: "How awful for Ernie to be left alone during the day with the stereo playing soft music and the air conditioner on, watching the boats go by on the river."  Still, the ASPCA's Mr. Hamm defends the policy of withholding kittens and puppies from people who work.  "A small kitten needs to be fed three or four times a day.  There's also the socialization of the animal {to consider}.  It's going to be very bored {if left alone} and start knocking things around."  Veterinarians say the rule makes sense for dogs, who need much more attention, but they challenge the theory as it is applied to cats, who can easily be left with enough dry food to get them through the day.  And since the alternative is death, some animal lovers protest the rule per se, as bizarrely inhumane.  Says Jane Bicks, a veterinarian and the education director for Fauna Foods Corp., a pet food company in Long Island City, N.Y.: "You have to make rules, but you have to be able to bend them."  It's August, and the only relief from the humidity in Washington is that Members of Congress have left town.  The calm before their return after Labor Day is a good time for President Bush and his advisers to sit back and look where they've been and where they're going.  If they do, they might be struck by the continued deterioration of the presidency as an institution.  It is weaker now than Mr. Bush found it eight months ago.  This observation may surprise some in the administration, which does have some good reasons to be pleased with its tenure so far.  President Bush's popularity ratings are higher than Ronald Reagan's.  To the amazement of many, some version of a capital-gains tax cut looks certain.  For better or worse, President Bush got close to his savings-and-loan bailout plan.  His partisan and institutional opposition suffered the embarrassment of Speaker Wright's resignation.  Yet at the same time, Congress has asserted ever more power over the Executive Branch.  With partisans like George Mitchell and Richard Gephardt asserting themselves in Congress, there's trouble ahead.  The most obvious new congressional assertion is denying Mr. Bush the right to hire his own staff.  In its battles with President Reagan, Congress learned that criminalizing policy differences could topple key officials.  Now the push is to start to eliminate President Bush's personnel before they take office.  Congress began this new separation-of-powers assault with John Tower.  By last week, the Senate had stalled some 110 nominations to various agencies, departments and federal courts.  One of the Senate's final acts last week was to "return" the names of three nominees.  Fred Bush, picked to be ambassador to Luxembourg, was held up because he was a HUD consultant.  Diane Morales was returned because Greenpeace and others oppose her for assistant energy secretary for environment, safety and health.  Alan Cranston arranged for San Francisco lawyer Vaughn Walker to be kept on ice despite first being nominated as a judge by President Reagan.  Contrary to the Constitution's mandate, this means the Senate neither advised nor consented, instead forcing President Bush to decide whether to resubmit the names.  Even conservatives joined the Congress vs. the President game.  A group of Republican Senators forced Robert Fiske Jr. to withdraw his name for Deputy Attorney General, a key position that could well be vacant for the first quarter of the Bush term.  Jesse Helms -- who should be made Secretary of State out of spite some day -- has blocked the nomination of the director general of the Foreign Service.  The liberals who trashed William Lucas also denied him his elemental and probably constitutional right to an up-or-down vote on the Senate floor.  Even Robert Bork got that much.  White House aides are downplaying the chances of a recess appointment for Mr. Lucas, but Senate Majority Leader Mitchell took the threat seriously enough to send a letter lecturing President Bush that a recess appointment "would be a very unwise course of action."  The letter is best taken as evidence of the wisdom of such a move.  Yet it's true that President Bush has not laid the groundwork for such a step by enunciating a committed defense of his constitutional prerogatives.  If he wants to reserve such options as recess appointments for future cases, he needs to start now.  Clearly Congress is girding for more battles ahead.  For example, take the breathtakingly dangerous rider that Pat Moynihan tacked on to the Senate's $4.6 billion State Department authorization, criminalizing any discussions by government officials with third parties to help support "any similar activities" whose funding Congress has prohibited.  This would violate the President's right to negotiate as he pleases with other countries.  State and Justice already have urged a veto because otherwise Executive-Branch officials will be indicted as felons for engaging in routine negotiations.  President Bush did take a good first step last week in defending his constitutional rights.  He invoked separation-of-powers grounds in vetoing the protectionist joint resolution demanding that he renegotiate the FSX fighter deal with Japan.  His veto message warned Congress against any such measures that "would tie my hands in the exercise of my constitutional responsibilities."  This is precisely the correct test, but one that needs to be applied more broadly, consistently and vigorously.  The immediate task for President Bush is to get all his men and women on board.  He needs all the help from them he can get not just to exercise his presidential responsibilities, but also to protect the powers of his branch from Congress.  If he can turn back congressional efforts to hamstring the Executive Branch, there's no telling what other successes this success might create.  A Chicago Mercantile Exchange board member publicly broke ranks with the futures industry and delivered a blistering critique of the Merc's ability to regulate its members and markets.  Regulation of futures trading here is a "Chicago mirage" and "something of a myth," according to Thomas Eagleton, a Merc governor and former U.S. senator.  In an appeal for tougher federal oversight of the futures markets, Mr. Eagleton also lambasted the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, calling it a "sleeping pygmy" compared with the Securities and Exchange Commission, which regulates the securities markets.  Mr. Eagleton's comments are among the harshest criticism leveled at the industry in the wake of the indictment of 46 Merc and Chicago Board of Trade futures traders on criminal fraud charges here last week.  Such a public tongue-lashing is unprecedented coming from a sitting board member of an exchange.  Mr. Eagleton, currently a lawyer in St. Louis, said he approved of recent steps taken by the Merc to better police its trading floor.  But the changes are too little, too late, and underscore the problems inherent in allowing traders to regulate their own markets, he said.  "The self-interest of the trading exchange can prevail over the public interest," he said.  "The Merc is not a private downtown athletic club.  It impacts tellingly on the financial markets of the entire free world."  Mr. Eagleton has been a public governor of the Merc since 1987, and said he plans to step down at the end of this year.  He also served on a special committee of the board that recommended certain changes in Merc trading practices after the federal probe of futures trading became public earlier this year.  When the committee made its recommendations he issued a separate opinion that elaborated on certain points, but fell far short of yesterday's salvo.  Mr. Eagleton praised the Merc's plans to introduce Globex, an after-hours electronic trading system.  But he said the CFTC should eliminate "19th century" trading practices such as verbal orders and the open outcry method of face to face bidding for trades, which limit the exchange's ability to trace suspect transactions.  He said in an interview that he was particularly incensed recently to discover that the Merc was prosecuting members based on trades they made with the undercover federal agents who posed as traders to investigate the industry.  "You don't screw around with a case that's under investigation," said Mr. Eagleton, former attorney general of Missouri.  But he stopped short of criticizing Merc officials, saying his argument was with the exchange's compliance officers.  Merc Chairman John Geldermann said he wasn't aware of Mr. Eagleton's criticisms.  The exchange subsequently issued a statement playing down the rift with its public governor, saying that while he has expressed some concern about Merc activities, he has been supportive of most the rule changes adopted by the exchange.  The CFTC's official response noted that Mr. Eagleton hasn't previously made his complaints known to the commission.  Individual commissioners were more forthcoming.  "I can't say I disagree with a lot of what he says," said Fowler West, a CFTC commissioner since 1982.  "I don't think we've been sleeping, but we are too small," he maintained, saying in an era of federal budget constraints the agency's growth hasn't kept up with the industry.  As for the board member's unusual public criticism of the Merc, "I say more power to him," Mr. West said.  There's probably not a school band in the country that hasn't attempted "Take the A Train," or a radio listener who hasn't encountered "Mood Indigo."  Duke Ellington's music pervades American culture.  But what we hear is not what Ellington wrote or what his orchestra played.  From "Azure" to "Zweet Zurzday," Ellington tunes are performed in arrangements by other musicians.  That's a common practice in jazz, but Ellington deserves better, say his devotees.  "Why settle for a version by a second-rate arranger when you could get the version by the greatest American arranger and composer?" asks David Berger in New York.  "Would you ask the New York Philharmonic to play an arrangement of a Beethoven symphony?" inquires Andrew Homzy in Montreal.  They're among a dozen or so patient people who are trying to remove arrangers' tarnish from the Ellington legacy.  To do this, they have to transcribe the original music off old records, since that's the only way of getting at the music Ellington wrote.  Published scores are virtually nonexistent, and lead sheets supply only the melody and chord changes, not the whole piece.  Last year the Smithsonian Institution acquired a treasure trove of Ellingtonia from his son Mercer that includes scrapbooks, clothing, letters and most importantly, 2,500 separate compositions.  They're a mess of unpublished, unlabeled and incomplete sheets of music that will take three to five years to catalog.  But they'll be a help to Messrs.  Homzy and Berger and others who face the herculean task of transcribing Ellington's vast output of big-band dance tunes, popular songs, mood pieces and large-scale suites.  The ultimate goal is performance: Mr. Berger will conduct his transcriptions in an all-Ellington program at Alice Tully Hall here on Aug. 9 and 10, the concluding nights of Lincoln Center's Classical Jazz series.  And the Smithsonian, in conjunction with Oberlin College, plans a monumental publishing project of 12 volumes of music by Ellington and other big-band composers, to be followed eventually by recordings.  The transcribers are making all this possible, with their careful eavesdropping on old records.  It's like going to a cocktail party with a microphone, Mr. Homzy says, and recording all the conversations that are going on in the room at one time and then going home and writing them down.  "It means really trying to put yourself in the middle of that room and trying to hear all these individual voices.  There is so much room for error.  You could be familiar with a piece for several years and play it on somebody else's stereo system, and hear something you'd never heard before."  A transcriber has to be able to hear all the pitches played by 12 to 18 musicians simultaneously, to identify what instrument is playing each pitch and to keep track of the rhythm -- all as the music is flying faster than you can say "Sophisticated Lady."  The recordings were produced with one microphone, which can make it tough to hear whether the drummer is striking the snare or the floor tom.  Written parts such as those found at the Smithsonian are a help, but they're often incomplete or marred by mistakes.  Typically, Ellington would compose a tune, try it out in rehearsal, make changes and continue to revise over the course of many performances.  His players lived with the changes; they didn't need to write them down precisely.  They would have found it difficult, anyway.  The system of notation that was perfected for and by classical music doesn't always work for jazz.  Any player knows how "swing eighths," the most characteristic rhythmic figure of the period, sound and feel, but nobody has yet figured out how to write them so that the first eighth lasts slightly longer than the second.  Similarly, everybody is familiar with the growl-and-plunger style that Bubber Miley on trumpet and Tricky Sam Nanton on trombone perfected with a toilet plunger.  But who knows how to write down those "wawas"?  Transcribing takes more than a good ear, imagination and a fast pencil.  Mr. Berger is equipped with a reel-to-reel tape recorder with three speeds, a Walkman with headphones, and a piano.  Mr. Homzy is more high-tech.  With the help of a digital sampler and an equalizer, he can listen to a single measure over and over again, freeze a single chord for as long as it takes for him to pick out all the pitches, change the speed of the music without changing the pitch, or cut out all the high or low frequencies to hear a note from a slightly different perspective -- useful when trying to dig out a trombone from under four saxophones.  Still, Mr. Homzy's most recent transcription, "Idiom 59," a 20-minute piece, took four to five months to do.  "There are still sections that are mysteries to me," he says.  What makes Ellington's music so difficult to transcribe is harmony, Mr. Berger says.  "He has an extremely large harmonic palette.  He'll go from the squarest chord, a triad, to a chord with 12 different notes in it, and you can't predict which one he'll do."  Ellington, unlike most other big-band composers, was not a songwriter, but a complete composer concerned not only with melody, but with harmony, rhythm and instrumentation too.  John Hasse, curator of the Duke Ellington collection at the Smithsonian, sees it this way: "The Ellington sound depended on very specific voicings by all the members of the orchestra.  One of the most famous examples is the opening of 'Mood Indigo,' which inverts the usual role of clarinet, trumpet and trombone.  You expect the clarinet to have the high register, but the clarinet plays the very lowest note, with the trombone and trumpet sounding above.  If you don't have those specific notes played by those specific instruments, you don't have the real Duke Ellington."  And you don't have those notes without transcription.  The irony is that the whole notion of crystallizing great jazz note for note runs counter to the improvisational nature of jazz.  The transcribers would seem to be trying to pin down a musical moment like a butterfly, so that it can be heard again and again exactly the way it sounded the first time, when some performer invented it on the fly.  But Mr. Homzy insists that isn't so: "We're not trying to re-create the sound of Ellington's band.  We're trying to play Ellington's music as best as we can, just as a symphony orchestra tries to play a piece by Debussy as best as it can."  Such reverence for jazz's past is nothing new; witness all the imitators of Johnny Hodges, Benny Goodman, Louis Armstrong and other great solo players.  A saxophonist trying to replicate a Hodges solo is like an artist copying great paintings at the Metropolitan Museum or a young composer writing a fugue in the style of J.S. Bach.  They're learning from the masters.  The transcriptions make that process more historically precise.  And they recapture the original text, as it were, for future performances of the new-found Ellingtonia.  Mr. Hasse, for one, hopes the transcriptions will become part of the repertory of special jazz "symphony" orchestras in all the major cities.  The need, he says, is acute.  "The situation in jazz today is the way classical music would be if the only published editions of the great Mozart, Beethoven and Brahms symphonies were versions for piano.  It wouldn't be the real thing, and it would greatly hinder any appreciation of this music."  But Mozart, Beethoven and Brahms made it easy to keep their music in circulation; they wrote down every note, and saved it, too.  "Unfortunately Ellington didn't fully perceive his worth as a composer," laments Mr. Berger.  "For some reason, he kept the music, but not in complete form.  It's a mystery why he didn't keep it all."  ---  Ms. Orgill is the music critic of the Record in Bergen County, N.J.  Quick: Mention "Mazda" and what comes to mind?  Apparently, for most people, not much.  The Japanese auto maker's cars don't look a whole lot different than any other Asian imports.  If consumers have any thoughts about Mazda at all, it's probably as a generic Japanese car, something like Toyota or Honda but more forgettable.  But with a new ad campaign breaking next week, Mazda hopes to create something radically different for itself: a personality.  And with its new personality, Mazda hopes to ratchet itself up to an upscale automotive company.  Mazda's own research found that "there was a very vague perception of Mazda," says George McCabe, group vice president of sales and marketing.  "Most people didn't have any feeling for the essence or the culture of the company.  We really needed to articulate that."  The new campaign capitalizes on Mazda's Japanese roots by emphasizing the car company's "kansei" engineering.  Kansei very loosely translated, means "in harmony with the five senses," Mazda says -- and kansei engineering is the technical steps Mazda takes to make sure its cars feel good to drive.  Thus, the campaign's tag line, which should be bombarding consumers everywhere as Mazda throws its entire $150 million annual ad budget behind the effort: "It just feels right."  Mazda hopes the campaign can make its cars and trucks stand out -- create a "point of difference" in ad lingo -- in a field that most people perceive as a parity business littered with clones.  "How can we tell consumers why they should buy a Mazda?  Why shouldn't they buy a Toyota?" asks Jan Thompson, vice president of advertising.  The answer, which she is only too quick to supply, is that Mazda engineers its cars specifically to "feel right . . . like an old jacket or broken-in pair of shoes."  But with its new campaign, Mazda risks snickers from its competitors and, worse, possible alienation of some potential customers.  Nissan was roundly criticized when it introduced a campaign with a similar "built for the human race" theme.  And Nissan's upscale Infiniti unit, which hasn't even introduced its cars yet, has already been the butt of endless jokes because of its zen marketing approach, featuring plenty of Oriental screens and closeups of pussy willows.  Still, Richard Winger, a partner with Boston Consulting Group, says Mazda's approach is a "potentially powerful strategy," and believes more Japanese auto makers will begin cultivating an unabashed Japanese image.  "The days when 'made in Japan' meant a cheap version of 'made in America' are really past," he reasons. "'Made in Japan' stands for uncompromising quality, so they might as well take advantage of it."  And Mazda, in its ad campaign created by Foote, Cone & Belding's Los Angeles office, plays that image to the hilt.  In one commercial, it focuses on Mazda's "telemetry" center, where scientists monitor a driver's pulse rate and heartbeat, among other vital signs, to ascertain how driving a Mazda feels.  "What are you really feeling?" asks one of the pseudo-scientists doing the monitoring, just to make sure we get the point.  Here, the voice-over solemnly intones to hammer home the point again, "Mazda can learn to create cars that feel just right."  And, just in case we haven't gotten the message yet, the ad ends with a shot of the driver murmuring, "Wow."  Other ads focus on specific models, with images like a relaxed mom driving her kids home through a driving rainstorm because her car is "like a friend you don't have to talk to."  The new "kensai" campaign is part of what Mazda terms a complete overhaul of its product line and its operations.  "We're repositioning the company," Mazda's Mr. McCabe says.  "We're moving more toward the upscale segment of the market, and we're moving away from the strictly price conscious part of the market."  Mazda needs to reposition itself if it is to boost its sales and its reputation.  Sales of Mazda cars and trucks have been lackluster, remaining basically flat since 1986.  But the company's first step in its repositioning -- its recent introduction of the sporty Miata, a roadster-style convertible -- has already helped bolster Mazda's recent performance, and it hopes to seize on that momentum now.  According to Mazda's Ms. Thompson, passenger car sales grew 13.3% in July largely because of the Miata; year to date, sales were up 2% through July.  The new ads, making their debut on Monday Night Football next week, replace a four-year-old campaign featuring actor James Garner talking rather pragmatically about the cars, with the tag line, "The Mazda Way."  That campaign failed to turn around lackluster sales and speculation had been rife that Mazda would drop Foote Cone as its ad agency.  Mazda's Mr. McCabe yesterday acknowledged that when he took on his post last July, "we reached a low point with our relations with FCB.  We weren't happy with the way things were going."  But he said that after discussions with Norman Brown, Foote Cone's chairman, the agency vowed "to do whatever it took to get the advertising back the way we wanted it."  The agency has since hired away William Hagelstein, who had worked on the Honda account at ad agency Rubin Postaer & Associates, to head up the Mazda account at Foote Cone's Santa Ana, Calif., office.  Foote Cone also brought in help from its own San Francisco, Chicago and other offices to create the new campaign.  "Our relationship is the best it's ever been," Mr. McCabe says.  As Mazda tries to go upscale, speculation continues that the car company will soon introduce a super-luxury division, the way Toyota has created Lexus and Nissan has Infiniti.  Mr. McCabe said the company is "studying" that possibility, but said it won't make any announcement until fall.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   EARNINGS: Grey Advertising, New York, reported second-quarter net income of $4.9 million, or $3.73 a share, vs. $6.3 million, or $4.82 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  The year-earlier figure includes a one-time gain of $1.9 million from the sale of a foreign subsidiary.  NEW ACCOUNTS: TAG-Heuer S.A., a Swiss watchmaker, awarded its $4 million account to New York-based Ammirati & Puris, an Omnicom Group unit. . . .  Saatchi & Saatchi Advertising, New York, got the estimated $1 million ad account for Cozumel, Mexico.  Saatchi last week picked up the $7 million account for Cancun.  A subsidiary of Emerson Electric Co. said it will sue the Federal Aviation Administration for canceling the unit's $79 million contract for microwave-landing systems.  A spokesman for the subsidiary, Hazeltine Corp., called the agency's action "unsupportable" and said the company hopes to have it overturned in federal claims court.  It will also seek damages.  Hazeltine made the statement in response to an FAA letter, released yesterday, that said Hazeltine "has failed to perform and deliver in accordance with the schedule" of the contract.  Engineering and production obstacles have delayed the delivery date three years, the FAA said.  Hazeltine alleges that problems were caused by both "massive" changes imposed by the FAA over several years and the agency's "maladministration" of the contract.  An FAA spokesman last night said the agency had no comment on any possible legal action at this time.  Hazeltine said the dispute centers strictly on issues involving payments, timing of deliveries and the FAA's performance of its contractual obligations.  The company stressed that performance of its systems isn't an issue.  "The FAA has stated publicly that there are no microwave-landing-system performance issues in dispute and that Hazeltine's units have functioned as the company promised," a spokesman said.  The spokesman added that Emerson management believes that the outcome of the dispute matter won't have a "material adverse effect" on the company's operations.  Last year, Hazeltine had revenue of approximately $158 million, representing about 2.4% of Emerson's total 1988 revenue of $6.7 billion.  An FAA spokesman last night said the agency had no comment on any possible legal action at this time.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Emerson Electric closed at $37, up 62.5 cents.  During his days as an avid fox hunter, Andrew N. Heine showed an uncanny ability to stay on his mount no matter how wild the chase.  "I never saw Andy fall," says one fellow rider.  "He certainly didn't get his hands dirty."  But now that he's after bigger game -- Victor Posner's DWG Corp. -- Mr. Heine is finding it harder to keep out of the mud.  Five months into his $572 million takeover effort, the patrician, Yale-educated lawyer is mired in a bitter name-calling contest with DWG that has seen the two sides trade accusations of market manipulation and other crimes.  A key associate in the bid for the Miami Beach conglomerate was indicted on thrift fraud charges.  And Mr. Heine's initial choice of investment banks provoked such skepticism on Wall Street that DWG's stock fell when the financing arrangements were announced.  "The whole thing is a joke," says one arbitrager, noting that DWG's share price remains far below Mr. Heine's $22-a-share offer.  In trading on the American Stock Exchange yesterday, DWG closed at $13.125, up 12.5 cents.  Mr. Heine may yet win his prize, but the DWG imbroglio caps a series of business and personal setbacks for the 60-year-old attorney in recent months.  An earlier bid for Mr. Posner's Fischbach Corp. collapsed because Mr. Heine failed to obtain financing.  In April, he stepped down as chairman and chief executive of his first big corporate conquest, Kinney System Inc., amid signs that the acquisition's main financial backer was unhappy.  Last week, a New York state judge entered an order requiring him to pay $2.8 million to his second wife, whom he divorced in January, according to his ex-wife's attorney.  Mr. Heine's business divorce has also been costly.  Although he left Finley, Kumble, Wagner, Heine, Underberg, Manley, Myerson & Casey in 1987, before it broke up and entered bankruptcy-law proceedings, he remains on the hook for part of the estimated $35 million the New York law firm will have to pay creditors.  Under a preliminary settlement proposal by Finley Kumble's trustee, Mr. Heine's contribution would be $2.7 million. (Mr.  Heine, who opposes the plan, predicts his final assessment will be much less, in part because his Finley Kumble membership is held by a professional corporation with meager assets.)  But if Mr. Heine is at all dismayed by the events of the past several months, he doesn't show it.  "I am undaunted," he says.  "I intend to pursue {the DWG bid}.  I'm very serious in that."  Those who know Mr. Heine aren't surprised at his pugnacious stance.  As head of Finley Kumble's corporate department, Mr. Heine earned a reputation as a brilliant attorney whose smooth manner masked a flair for infighting.  He waged legendary turf battles at the firm, eventually emerging as the nemesis of co-managing partner Steven Kumble.  The former friends are no longer on speaking terms.  Now Mr. Heine is applying his fighting skills to DWG, the centerpiece of Mr. Posner's once-mighty empire.  In a lawsuit filed in April in a Cleveland federal court and amended twice since, Mr. Heine's Granada Investments Inc. charged that Mr. Posner and the DWG directors shirked their fiduciary duty and manipulated DWG's stock in rejecting the takeover bid.  Later amendments to the complaint raised the stakes, accusing Mr. Posner, among other things, of racketeering.  In its counterclaim, DWG contends that Mr. Heine's bid is a sham intended to boost the value of his DWG holdings. (Granada currently holds about 1.1% of DWG's common stock; Mr. Posner, after a disputed conversion of securities, claims to control a 46.5% stake.) DWG also claims that Mr. Heine violated federal securities law by failing to register Miami Beach developer Leonard A. Pelullo as a member of his takeover group.  Several Pelullo affiliates withdrew from the takeover group recently after Mr. Pelullo was indicted by a federal grand jury on five counts of defrauding an Ohio thrift.  Mr. Pelullo has denied the charges, which aren't related to the DWG takeover bid.  DWG and Granada Investments -- both of which deny any wrongdoing -- recently agreed to a 30-day truce to give the two sides a chance to negotiate their differences outside the courtroom.  Mr. Heine insists that Granada can foot the bill for DWG.  He claims that suitors for various of DWG's holdings have flocked to him, some offering to provide bridge financing for the deal.  He also boosted his credibility on Wall Street recently by switching investment banks from Trafalgar Holdings Ltd. -- a Los Angeles concern with little successful takeover experience -- to Paribas Corp., a North American subsidiary of Paris-based Paribas Group.  But whether he's equipped to run DWG -- which owns such profitable concerns as Arby's Inc. and Royal Crown Cola -- is a matter of some dispute.  Some associates give Mr. Heine high marks for business acumen.  "He's very astute," says William Olsten, chairman and chief executive officer of Olsten Corp., a Westbury, N.Y., temporary-service concern of which Mr. Heine is a director.  "He can read a balance sheet faster than most CPAs or financial men."  But critics say he should stick to lawyering.  They point to his experience at Kinney System, a New York-based parking-garage concern that he and a group of investors acquired in 1986 in a $47 million leveraged buy-out.  Hobbled by a stagnant market and straining under its debt load, Kinney began suffering cash flow problems, according to people familiar with the company.  Mr. Heine, who became chairman and chief executive in 1987 after his predecessor committed suicide, says the primary investor, Prudential Insurance Co. of America, resisted his recommendation to pump more money into the company to allow it to expand.  "Prudential and I were on different wave lengths," he says.  Mr. Heine resigned in April, although he remains a director.  A Prudential spokesman says: "Our view was that everybody understood initially that Andy Heine agreed to step in as CEO on an interim basis."  Meanwhile, Mr. Heine's lifestyle doesn't reflect any serious cash shortages.  Now counsel to the New York law firm Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle, Mr. Heine boasts a Georgian-style brick home in Manhattan and a 75-acre farm in upstate New York where he still does a little fox hunting.  "I'm worth over $10 million," Mr. Heine says.  "I'm not wanting for anything I desire."  Jerrico Inc. said it agreed to be acquired by a New York investment group for $24.25 a share, or $620 million.  The operator of Long John Silver's restaurants said the investment group, led by DJS-Inverness & Co. and Castle Harlan Inc., will launch a tender offer later this week.  Representatives of the investment group couldn't be reached immediately for comment.  But W. McComb Dunwoody, president of DJS-Inverness, said in a prepared statement that the group was "delighted at the opportunity to acquire a company with the resources, reputation, and excellent management of Jerrico."  Although somewhat surprised by the bid, analysts said Jerrico was a long-rumored takeover candidate and the company's stock may have been rising in recent days in anticipation of the transaction.  In the last month, Jerrico's stock rose 18% to $20 a share Friday.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, the company's stock jumped $3.375 to close at $24 a share.  Both investment companies have recently acquired a taste for restaurant businesses, although Jerrico is their largest target yet.  DJS-Inverness recently completed a $434 million management buy-out of S&A Restaurant Corp. from Grand Metropolitan PLC.  And Castle Harlan, through its Legend Capital Group L.P., acquired Peasant Restaurants, based in Atlanta, and Morton's of Chicago.  Indeed, John K. Castle, head of Castle Harlan and former chief executive officer of Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., has actively sought out restaurants to purchase since acquiring Delaware Management Co. for an estimated $300 million earlier this year.  Analysts note that Jerrico has been a prime candidate for a buy-out, despite steadfast claims by management it would fight such a move.  The company, with its 1,500 Long John Silver's restaurants, already dominates the quick-service, seafood restaurant niche.  And since a majority of its restaurants are owned and operated by the company, it has a strong cash flow.  In addition, Jerrico's senior management has been under attack for generating lackluster profits after boasting the company would have a record year.  For fiscal 1989, ended June 28, the company had profit of $25.3 million, or $1.30 a share, on revenue of $663.7 million, compared with net of $23.5 million, or $1.20 a share, on revenue of $635.5 million the year earlier.  Analysts had estimated profit of $1.45 a share for the year.  "The year-end earnings were well below expectations," said Steven A. Rockwell, an analyst with Alex Brown & Sons Inc.  "That may have contributed to initiating the transaction."  The offer includes an agreement to retain senior managers and give them equity participation.  That may have swayed top executives, who already were wary of pressures from shareholders to meet earnings goals.  The financing for the acquisition is coming from Legend Capital and DJS-Inverness, as well as institutional investors that include Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. and an affiliate of First Boston Corp., the company said.  The transaction includes refinancing of $97 million in Jerrico debt.  AMERICAN FEDERAL BANK, Dallas, was recapitalized last year with assistance from the Federal Savings & Loan Insurance Co., and is financially solvent.  A table in a previous edition misstated the company's financial condition and incorrectly said the thrift might have to be liquidated by regulators.  (See: "The Thrift Rescue -- New Fiscal Game: Big Thrift-Rescue Bill Is Likely to Realign The Financial System --- Many S&Ls Seem Doomed, But Banks May Well Gain; Mortgages May Cost More --- Wave of Acquisitions Looms" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  Ramada Inc., clearing the way for its pending restructuring and name change to Aztar Corp., reported a second-quarter net loss of $8.1 million, compared with restated earnings of $389,000, or one cent a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 34% to $147.3 million from a restated $109.8 million a year ago.  The revenue gains stemmed largely from Ramada's newly expanded TropWorld casino-hotel in Atlantic City, N.J., and the Ramada Express hotel-casino in Laughlin, Nev., which opened in June 1988.  The 1989 quarter included several nonrecurring items, including a $5 million loss provision for Ramada's casino in Reno, Nev., that closed July 30.  The firm also recorded $3.5 million in previously deferred pre-opening costs and $1.3 million in restructuring costs.  Interest expense rose to $12.1 million from $5.1 million.  Ramada posted an operating loss of $378,000 for the quarter, compared with $5.3 million in operating income a year earlier.  The company restated its 1988 results to reflect its lodging and restaurant units as discontinued operations.  For the 1988 second quarter, net income included $1.2 million from discontinued operations.  For the six months, Ramada reported a net loss of $26.7 million compared with net income of $512,000, or one cent a share, a year ago.  Revenues rose to $200.4 million from $158 million.  The first half of 1989 included weak first-quarter casino win levels, or revenue after paying wagers but before taxes and certain expenses.  The win level returned to normal in the second quarter, the company said.  Ramada's restructuring is expected to be completed in mid-September pending approval from gambling regulators in Nevada and New Jersey.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Ramada rose 25 cents to $14.  George Bush's presidency has entered a period of extraordinary opportunity -- but equally great peril -- with the latest twist in the hostage crisis.  The Bush administration has become a tacit player in the bargaining that has begun between Israel and the Shiite terrorists holding U.S. hostages in Lebanon.  The hostage-holders' willingness to dicker over a prisoner swap, and Iranian President Hashemi Rafsanjani's offer to help, mean President Bush faces the clearest opportunity yet to oversee an end to the long hostage agony -- and to reap the enormous benefits the triumph would bring.  Such a coup would put a substantial foundation under Mr. Bush's high approval ratings in the polls.  But Mr. Bush runs enormous risks that could just as easily bring down those approval ratings, which are broad but not deeply rooted.  The rapid movement of recent days could easily give way to prolonged dickering in which the U.S. appears powerless and the agenda is controlled by Israel and Iran.  By giving Israel the green light to propose deals for the release of hostages, the administration runs the risk of raising the price of captives -- precisely the trap the president has repeatedly said the U.S. should avoid.  And if the Israeli initiative turns sour and brings more hostage deaths or military action, Mr. Bush could be accused of ignoring the very policy prescriptions he offered as head of the Reagan administration's terrorism task force, when he said the U.S. "will continue to urge other countries not to make concessions."  "I think right now they're facing both a tremendous opportunity that may not come along again for a long, long time, and at the same time a very real challenge to pull it off," says Clay MacManaway, who until recently was deputy to the chief of counterterrorism at the State Department.  For all the hope that has arisen recently, the president has lost some of the leverage he held at the outset of the crisis when it seemed he might resort to military action against hostage-holders and their sponsors.  After Shiite extremists in Lebanon said they had killed Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins and threatened to kill Joseph Cicippio early last week, there was an expectation the U.S. would use force.  The Federal Bureau of Investigation said yesterday it had determined that the hanging victim shown in a videotape released in Lebanon last week was Col. Higgins.  But despite that further evidence, the crisis atmosphere has given way to dickering and posturing, and the possibility of U.S. military action has faded.  And as White House aides realize, whatever the tantalizing prospects, the odds of pulling off a grand hostage deal still are daunting.  "It seems to me to be very difficult to arrange a swap for all the hostages," says Shaul Bakhash, an Iranian writer and scholar now living in the U.S.  "And expectations have built up for a release of all the hostages."  So far, President Bush and his aides seem to have handled the hostage drama smoothly.  When Israel set the current chain of events in motion by kidnapping Abdel Karim Obeid, a prominent Lebanese Shiite cleric, President Bush publicly distanced himself from the Israeli move.  Then when Israel proposed a grand swap in which it would release the sheik and other Shiite prisoners it holds in return for three Israeli soldiers and all Western hostages in Lebanon, President Bush and his aides artfully moved away from the rigid official U.S. policy on dealing with terrorists, while insisting that they were sticking by it.  In both a private message to Israel and in cryptic public statements, the administration declared that it still won't deal with terrorists -- but that Israel was free to do so if it wanted to.  That represents a subtle shift away from earlier declarations that the U.S. would encourage other countries to avoid deals with hostages.  Mr. Bush's new posture helped open the way for the weekend proposal in which Mr. Cicippio's captors offered to free him in return for release of Shiite and Palestinian prisoners in Israel.  As a result of the new posturing, United Nations envoy Marrack Goulding said yesterday that "there are certain trends in the international climate which suggest that circumstances may be more conducive to a settlement for this problem now."  At the same time it has been more supple diplomatically, the Bush administration has tried to maintain a tough posture as well.  It advertised that it was moving ships toward Lebanon and Iran.  And then, even though final decisions on military retaliation apparently weren't made and U.S. forces weren't prepared to move for at least two days, administration officials privately passed the word that Mr. Bush had decided that he would order bombing of targets in Lebanon if Mr. Cicippio were killed.  A story saying so was leaked to the New York Times, where they figured it would have the greatest impact internationally.  Mr. Bush's posture seems to be in step with the U.S. public mood.  In a new poll by Time magazine and the Cable News Network, 58% of those surveyed said the U.S. should negotiate with terrorist groups for the release of hostages.  But the danger now is that the hostage-holders and the Iranian government that supports them may have the power to drag out any dickering over the hostages.  Iran and the terrorists may calculate that it is in their interest to prolong the bargaining, because in that way they can appear accommodating and avoid any punishment for the apparent murder of Col. Higgins without actually having to make a deal to give up the hostages.  For that reason, some administration aides say the U.S. should give Iran and the hostage-holders a precise period of time to arrange a hostage release before reconsidering its position.  "In this case, we would be making a mistake if we let them drag it out," says Mr. MacManaway, the former State Department aide.  But if the administration were to seriously contemplate military action, it also would have to be prepared to tangle with Syria, whose forces control the area of Lebanon where Shiite extremists operate; and confronting Syria would be politically and militarily difficult.  It's also far from clear that anyone in Iran, Lebanon or Syria has enough control over all the groups holding hostages to order a grand release of the eight Americans and seven other Westerners held captive.  The various terrorist cells holding Western hostages are believed to be at least loosely affiliated with Hezbollah, or the Party of God, the Shiite organization prominent in South Lebanon.  But U.S. analysts aren't sure there is a "center of control."  And though Iran's Mr. Rafsanjani appears more willing and able to help than ever before, it's unclear how much control he can exercise over Lebanese terrorists.  In addition, while Secretary of State James Baker said this week that the U.S. is "consulting very, very closely" with Israel over the hostages, it's far from clear that Israel always will have the same goals as the Bush administration.  For instance, if Israel could swing a deal freeing its soldiers and a few -- but not all -- of the Western hostages, Israeli leaders probably would jump at it.  That might leave the remaining hostages stranded in captivity, with few Israeli or U.S. bargaining chips left to win their release.  ---  @ Americans Believed Held in Lebanon  TERRY ANDERSON, 41, chief Middle East correspondent of the Associated Press.  Held since March 16, 1985.  THOMAS SUTHERLAND, 58, acting dean of agriculture at the American University of Beirut.  Held since June 9, 1985.  FRANK HERBERT REED, 58, director of the private Lebanon International School.  Held since Sept. 9, 1986.  JOSEPH JAMES CICIPIO, 58, acting comptroller of the American University of Beirut. held since Sept. 12, 1986.  EDWARD AUSTIN TRACY, 58, author of children's books.  Held since about Oct. 21, 1986.  JESSE TURNER, 42, visiting professor of mathematics and computer science at Beirut University College.  Held since Jan. 24, 1987.  ALANN STEEN, 50, journalism professor at Beirut University College.  Held since Jan. 24 1987.  Robert Polhill, 35, assistant professor of business and lecturer in accounting at Beirut University College.  Held since Jan. 24, 1987.  Source: The Associated Press  MONEY for a proposed $1 billion fund to pay for cleaning up oil spills would be raised by a tax of 1.3 cents a barrel on crude oil and petroleum products.  An earlier edition misstated the amount of the tax.  (See: "Congress Could Break Deadlock On Oil Spills --- Senate Bill on Prevention, Cleanup, Funds Clears; Liability Is Still at Issue" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  Precious metals futures prices declined under the influence of a stronger dollar and the ebbing impact of the Middle Eastern hostage crisis.  August delivery gold eased $1.90 an ounce to $365.90.  September silver fell four cents an ounce to $5.16.  October platinum was down $4.60 an ounce to $484.60.  "The dollar has long been the primary influence on precious metals, and the market has again shown that military and political crises have only a short-lived impact," said William O'Neill, vice president, research, of Elders Futures Inc., New York.  Mr. O'Neill also noted that oil prices were easier and that the Commodity Research Bureau Index declined.  These two anti-inflationary developments hurt precious metals prices, he said.  There has been barely any retail interest in bullion, which has seriously hampered precious metals, he noted.  "Normally, we see some anticipatory buying for fall needs," he said.  Mr. O'Neill suggested that the widening ratio of gold to silver prices might have contributed to selling of silver futures.  "The ratio now is about 71.2 in favor of gold," he said.  "Most recently, 50 times has become acceptable, and 60 times is mediocre."  What appears to be an attitude of more compromise in racial relations in South Africa may be weighing on platinum because it reduces the chance of production problems caused by political upheavals, Mr. O'Neill said.  Also afflicting platinum, he said, is that it's again being treated by traders as more of an industrial metal, reflecting the U.S. industrial slowdown, and as less of a precious metal.  Prices may continue to decline but not significantly more, according to Peter Cardillo, trading adviser for Josephthal & Co., New York.  "August gold isn't too far from its contract low of $360.50, but I don't think it will break below that.  Likewise, silver is close to its low of $5.105, but it will hold without breaking through," he said.  Support will come because while there is widespread concern about a recession, "a soft landing is more likely," Mr. Cardillo said, and this will inhibit aggressive selling of precious metals.  Not everyone saw the market's performance as wholly negative.  Sharon Ziemian, assistant vice president, Citibank N.Y., said gold performed pretty well "considering the heavy pressure of selling induced by the dollar.  There was strong support on the buying side, more than I thought there would be."  There is a good chance that gold will hold in the lower $360 range, she said.  "But if it breaks below $360, it is likely to go as low as $350," she said.  According to Craig Sloane, analyst for Smith Barney, Harris Upham, New York, the interest-rate market is of significant importance to precious metals.  "Interest rates influence currency markets, which in turn affect precious metals," he said.  "The tone in interest rates has changed dramatically recently.  Anticipation of lower interest rates were dashed by Friday's employment report, which came in stronger than expected."  One effect was that it is unlikely that the Federal Reserve will lower interest rates over the near-term, Mr. Sloane said.  "That, along with the strong dollar, have contributed to weakness in precious metals," he said.  Mr. Sloane explained that as interest rates rise, gold prices often drop to attract investors away from rising risk-free returns in Treasury bills.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Crude-oil futures prices drifted lower in light trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  Overproduction and sluggish demand lopped 12 cents a barrel off the September price of West Texas Intermediate crude, the U.S. benchmark, pushing it down to $17.91 a barrel.  Reports estimated output from the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries as being as high as 21.8 million barrels a day for July.  That group, set to meet again next month, had agreed to quotas totaling 19.5 million barrels a day.  Demand for crude generally slackens during this time of year as the U.S. summer driving season winds down.  Products followed crude lower.  Gasoline for September delivery fell 0.49 cent to 49.75 cents a gallon, and September heating oil ended the session at 48.44 cents a gallon, down 7.44 cents.  COPPER: Futures prices fell back from Friday's advances.  The September delivery declined 2.25 cents to $1.1055, which was just above the low of the day.  One analyst said there is a growing belief that the Highland Valley strike in British Columbia, which began July 9, will be settled by the end of the week.  He noted that talks are recessed until the middle of the week, but not because of problems.  The mediator was tied up with other work, the analyst said.  Selling in London that depressed the cash position there and narrowed its premium over the three-months contract was also a contributing factor in New York's decline, he said.  There was technical weakness as well, he said, as the September contract's price fell below $1.11, a key support level, which triggered selling orders that accelerated the decline.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Soybean and corn futures prices rose because the monthlong trend of falling prices finally triggered buying by bargain hunters.  The correction, which began Friday, follows a drop of about $1.50, or 20%, in the value of some soybean futures contracts.  Traders said the soybean rebound was primarily based on technical signals.  Fundamental developments for the July price decline, such as the weather, continue to indicate a relatively good-sized harvest.  In recent weeks, much of the Midwest has received rainfall.  And, despite forecasts for drier weather this week, the soybean and corn crops are expected to benefit from cooler temperatures, said Victor Lespinasse, a floor broker for Dean Witter Reynolds, Chicago.  Corn futures prices rose in part because brokers for South Africa reportedly bought contracts for delivery of roughly 14 million bushels of U.S. corn.  COTTON: Futures prices fell as selling accelerated the decline from recent highs.  The December contract ended with a loss of two cents a pound, the maximum daily permitted amount, to 73.96 cents.  Other contracts at times touched their limit lows during the session.  The action was mostly technical, according to one analyst, who said that the market had been heavily overbought during the recent rise.  He noted that from June 7, when the Chinese political situation was most critical and the December price was at 63.40 cents, that futures contracts rose as high as 76.75 cents on July 27, a gain of 13.35 cents.  A court hearing on Oxdon Investments Inc.'s request for an injunction blocking a rival bid for Steinberg Inc. was adjourned until Friday.  After two hours of procedural wrangling before Quebec Superior Court Justice Pierre Tessier, Oxdon withdrew its request for an emergency injunction blocking Socanav Inc.'s 1.33 billion Canadian dollar ($1.13 billion) tender offer for Steinberg, a Montreal real estate and food retailing concern.  Oxdon, a Toronto group including Unicorp Canada Corp., asked to proceed directly to the next stage in Quebec's three-step injunction process, a request for a temporary injunction blocking the Socanav bid until the court can rule on a permanent injunction.  On Friday, Justice Tessier will first hear a motion to dismiss Oxdon's injunction request.  Socanav, a small Montreal shipping concern, and its financial backer, the Quebec government's pension fund agency, said they will argue that the Steinberg matter belongs before the Quebec Securities Commission, rather than in Superior Court.  Oxdon's C$1.31 billion tender offer for Steinberg expires Friday.  A lawyer for Oxdon said he was unable to say if the offer will be extended.  Separately, Steinberg said an independent appraisal of its Ivanhoe unit's real estate holdings values those assets at about C$1.1 billion.  Net of external debt and internal inter-company debt, the real estate assets are valued at more than C$860 million, substantially more than the indicated value Socanav placed on the real estate, mostly shopping centers, in its offering circular.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Aug. 4, July 28,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.71 7.98  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.30 8.59  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.35 8.69  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 8.95 9.14  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.48 8.84  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 7.73 7.86  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 7.66 7.77  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 7.64 7.75  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 7.82 7.97  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 7.91 8.08  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, August 2, 1989 and Wednesday July 26, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  Canadian natural-gas producers rejected for the second time three contracts to supply gas to New England through the proposed $354 million Champlain pipeline.  But producers voted to approve most of the gas-sales contracts to the Northeast U.S. through a second proposed pipeline sponsored by the Iroquois Gas Transmission System.  Industry analysts say the results of producer votes on a dozen contracts to supply gas to New England, New York and Connecticut demonstrate that Canadian producers are interested in serving the Northeast market, but question the need for two pipelines to do so.  The three contracts to serve New England utilities and power producers accounted for nearly half of the Champlain pipeline's proposed capacity.  The contracts, reached on producers' behalf by Calgary, Alberta, gas marketer Pan-Alberta Gas Ltd., called for delivery of as much as 153 million cubic feet of gas daily.  Dwight Curly, president of Champlain Pipeline Operating Co., of Burlington, Vt., previously said the rejection of those contracts could "significantly delay" or halt the pipeline project.  But he said the company plans to review the results to determine if the contracts can be changed to suit producers and added that customers may try to replace those volumes with gas purchased directly from large producers.  Iroquois Gas said producers approved the largest contracts for gas to be shipped on its system.  Under the contracts, negotiated by Western Gas Marketing Ltd. and ProGas Ltd., producers agreed to supply as much as 341 million cubic feet of gas daily to a consortium of U.S. utilities.  Stock prices soared as investors shifted perceptions about the economy, but bonds and the dollar had a much less exciting day.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average surged 41.54 points to 2694.99, a post-crash high and less than 28 points shy of its alltime high of 2722.42, set Aug. 25, 1987.  Even more spectacular was a 94.06-point leap in the Dow Jones Transportation Average, propelled by a $46.25 gain in the stock of UAL Corp., which is a takeover target.  The transportation average closed at a record 1344.06; its previous record one-day gain was 46.76 points.  Traders questioned the durability of the stock market rally, however, noting that much of the price gains were the result of computer-aided trading and other strategies unrelated to long-term values.  In any event, the rally fireworks failed to ignite other financial markets.  Bond prices fell at first, then recovered to end unchanged, and the dollar posted only modest gains against major currencies.  Analysts said yesterday's stock market action was a continuing reaction to Friday's employment report showing a stronger than expected economy.  That set investors to rethinking their investment and trading strategies, which had been heavily geared toward so-called defensive and interest-sensitive stocks that would be expected to fare well in a slowdown.  This shift began Friday and continued yesterday.  Consumer stocks that had been the darlings of anxiety-ridden investors were left languishing while prices of technology and industrial stocks spurted.  "The employment number was the first number, and there will be many more, that show the economy is not about to go over a cliff," said Joseph McAlinden, director of research at Dillon Read.  "The emphasis has clearly shifted away from defensive and recession-resistant issues to stocks that have earnings leverage in an economy that's going to continue to expand."  Mr. McAlinden said many investors had become convinced in recent weeks that the economy was slowing too fast and would probably slip into recession rather than achieve the much-discussed "soft landing" -- moderate economic growth with declining inflation and lower interest rates.  But he said the recession fears were effectively scotched last week and even the soft landing now appears too tame.  "I prefer to call it 'buzzing the airport,'" he said.  But analysts point out that an expanding economy might not be great for stock prices in the long run, either.  The problem is inflation.  Until this summer the Federal Reserve had been driving interest rates steadily higher in an effort to cool off the expanding economy and slow rising inflation.  Only after it appeared that high interest rates were slowing the economy too much did the Fed begin to let rates fall modestly.  With fresh evidence that the economy wasn't as sluggish as believed come renewed worries that inflation, too, will heat up.  The threat of inflation is already evident in bond prices.  As long as a recession seemed in the cards bond prices were rallying, reflecting the expectation of further Fed easing.  But just as Friday's employment report sharply altered perceptions for stock investors, it shook up the conventional wisdom among bond investors, too.  What had been a vigorous rally was transformed into a sudden sell-off Friday.  Traders said the selling could easily resume in the face of more evidence of a healthy economy or rising inflation.  The dollar strengthened modestly yesterday on the growing assumption that the latest news on the U.S. economy will prevent interest rates from falling any further.  Currency traders said underlying sentiment toward the dollar is bullish, but added that they expect the Federal Reserve to intervene to keep the dollar from rising sharply.  In major market activity:  Stock prices soared in active trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 197.6 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of losers, 1,054 to 476.  Bond prices were about unchanged.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond stood at 8.07%.  The dollar gained against major currencies.  In late New York trading the currency was quoted at 1.9162 marks and 140.05 yen, compared with 1.9070 marks and 139.90 yen.  The Securities and Exchange Commission filed civil insider-trading charges against two former Merrill Lynch & Co. employees and a New York lawyer whose stock transactions in 1985 led to the unraveling of Dennis Levine's illegal stock-trading scheme.  The civil suit is one of the first in which the SEC has filed insider-trading charges against investors who "piggy-backed" on someone else's insider trading.  In such transactions, the investor doesn't have direct access to the inside information but buys whatever stocks the insider trader has bought.  The suit was filed in U.S. district court in Manhattan.  Theodore Levine, a corporate lawyer with the New York firm of Wilmer, Cutler & Pickering, said the courts haven't yet resolved whether piggy-backing falls under insider-trading laws.  "The key point is whether the defendant knew or had reason to know that there was inside information," he said.  The defendants' attorneys, who dispute the allegations, say they will challenge whether such piggy-back transactions violate the federal law against insider trading.  The SEC maintains that the case falls within insider-trading precedents because, it alleges, the three defendants either knew or should have known that their trades were based on inside information.  The defendants named in the suit are Brian S. Campbell, 32 years old, formerly a securities account executive at Merrill Lynch, Pierce Fenner & Smith Inc. and at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.; Carlos A. Zubillaga, 39, formerly a broker in Merrill Lynch's New York and Caracas, Venezuela, offices, and Kevin P. Barry, 33, until late 1985 a corporate attorney in the New York City law firm of Tenzer, Greenblatt, Fallon & Kaplan.  The three are accused of trading on inside information that they indirectly received from Mr. Levine from March 1984 to June 1985.  The SEC's suit says information concerning Mr. Levine's trades was passed on to them by Bernhard Meier, who served as Mr. Levine's account executive at Bank Leu International Ltd. Mr. Levine conducted his illegal stock transactions through those accounts, and the SEC says he gave inside information to Mr. Meier.  Mr. Levine pleaded guilty to insider trading and other charges in June 1985.  Mr. Meier, who has been barred from the securities business, now lives in Switzerland.  Barry Fallick, an attorney for Mr. Campbell, said the defendants were "piggy-backing on information received elsewhere.  Whether that is a violation of the law has yet to be addressed by the courts."  He said his client was notified last year that the SEC planned to file the suit.  Paul Huey-Burns, an SEC branch chief working on the case, however, said, "We believe that {Mr.  Campbell, Mr. Zubillaga and Mr. Barry} weren't merely piggy-backing on the trades of Mr. Levine."  He said the defendants' efforts to disguise their trades indicated that they knew the transactions were based on inside information.  Therese D. Pritchard, an assistant director at the SEC, said, "They should have known from the pattern of trading and the identification of the source" that inside information was involved.  It was the stock transactions by Mr. Zubillaga and Mr. Campbell that led the SEC to its investigation of Mr. Levine.  In May 1985, Merrill Lynch received an anonymous letter suggesting that some transactions made in the company's Caracas office might be based on inside information involving U.S. stocks.  An investigation by Merrill Lynch later found that Mr. Campbell had been trading the same stocks, and that the trading was linked to Bank Leu.  Merrill Lynch alerted the SEC, which eventually discovered Mr. Levine's insider-trading scheme.  In the suit filed yesterday, the SEC accused Mr. Campbell, Mr. Zubillaga and Mr. Barry of trading on inside information involving 15 companies, including takeover targets such as G.D. Searle & Co. and Textron Inc.  Although the SEC wouldn't give a total estimate of the defendants' alleged illegal profits, the suit says that in five of the stocks the three men made illegal profits of $397,437.  The SEC suit also says that a friend of Mr. Campbell's and relatives of Mr. Barry, including his mother, traded on some of the inside information.  The SEC said the friend and relatives made illegal profits of $54,738 on the five stocks.  The SEC's Ms. Pritchard wouldn't say whether charges would be filed against those people.  Said Mark D. Lebow, an attorney who previously represented Mr. Zubillaga: "Mr.  Zubillaga cooperated at all times with the SEC's investigation.  It was his testimony that began the SEC on the path to Dennis Levine and upward.  It is unfair that in exchange for that cooperation the SEC has brought these proceedings."  He said Mr. Zubillaga, a citizen of Venezuela, lives in Caracas.  Mr. Campbell's attorney, Barry Fallick, said his client, who lives in Manhattan, denies the allegations in the suit.  Michael Pelletier, the attorney for Mr. Barry, said he hadn't seen the suit and wouldn't comment.  He said Mr. Barry, who met Mr. Campbell while playing basketball in a city league, is a lawyer in Rhinecliff, N.Y.  In its lawsuit, the SEC also accused Mr. Campbell and Mr. Meier of trying to make it appear that the alleged insider trading was based on publicly available information.  The suit says that in 1985, when the Levine trading came under investigation, Mr. Campbell gave Mr. Meier old research reports and other material that was used to falsify claims that the Levine transactions were based on publicly available information.  In addition, the SEC accused Mr. Campbell of keeping Mr. Meier posted on the SEC's investigation of the transactions.  The lawsuit says Mr. Campbell informed Mr. Meier of inquiries made by the SEC and the compliance departments of Merrill Lynch and Smith Barney.  Lawyers who have followed such cases say there is a fine line between illegal insider trading and piggy-backing that doesn't violate the law.  Robert M. Romano, a lawyer with Morgan Lewis & Bockius in New York, said, "Piggy-backing is a tough case to bring. . . .  The test is whether or not there came a point in time when the {defendant} knew he was trading based on a tainted source."  He said the circumstances of the case would have to determine whether the defendant should have known.  Stanley Arkin, a lawyer in New York who has defended insider-trading cases, said, "In order for something to be insider trading, you must know that you are receiving inside information," such as proprietary information about a planned takeover.  He said it isn't enough to "receive only the bare bones" of information about other trades that are being made, even if those trades are based on inside information.  The SEC asked the court to require the defendants to account for and to disgorge all profits they made from the alleged insider trading.  The agency also asked that they be required to pay civil penalties in the amount of three times the allegedly illegal profits.  Stocks rallied as recession fears continued to fade, propelling the Dow Jones Industrial Average to within 30 points of its all-time high.  The industrials shot up 41.54 to 2694.99, just 27.43 points below the record of 2722.42 set in August 1987.  Much of the buying in large blue-chip shares was attributed to big orders from foreign accounts and from Wall Street firms that are heavily involved in program trading.  Broader indexes and the Dow Jones Transportation Average ran up to new records.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index closed 5.49 higher at 349.41, and the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index rose 2.55 to 194.19.  In its largest single-day gain ever, the Dow Jones Transportation Average soared 94.06 to 1344.06, led by UAL's tremendous 46 1/4-point gain.  The Wall Street Journal reported that the company, the parent of United Airlines, received a takeover offer from investor Marvin Davis valued at well over $200 a share.  Last week's U.S. employment report for July, which didn't confirm fears of weakening in the U.S. economy, launched a big move by investors Friday out of defensive stocks and into cyclical shares.  That pattern continued yesterday, though less aggressively.  Money managers jumped on cyclical blue-chips, or big-name shares that generally rise and fall with the state of the overall economy.  Among defensive issues -- or stocks expected to hold their value in times of economic downturn -- that were swamped by selling yesterday, Philip Morris tumbled 2 3/4 to 159 1/4, Walt Disney fell 1 3/8 to 114 3/4, and MCA dropped 1 3/4 to 67 1/4.  Among cyclical shares, Du Pont gained 5 1/4 to 119 1/2, International Paper rose 2 3/4 to 57, International Business Machines gained 1 7/8 to 117 3/8, and Alcan Aluminium advanced 1 5/8 to 24.  Traders on the floor of the New York Stock Exchange counted as many as 40 buy programs, a technique in which brokerage firms shop for large baskets of blue-chip stocks.  Kidder Peabody and Morgan Stanley were behind much of the buying, traders said.  Price differences between futures and stocks weren't big enough yesterday for normal arbitrage-related trading, they said, so the two big firms appeared to be pursuing strategies that anticipated dividend payments on some of the blue-chip stocks.  Analysts at such Wall Street firms as Morgan Stanley, First Boston, PaineWebber and Dean Witter Reynolds recommended cyclical issues to investors after the employment data and other reports last week eased fears that the U.S. may be headed for a recession.  "We're running out of time for a downward spiral here," said John D. Connolly, chairman of Dean Witter's investment committee, because the economy's gradual slowing is relieving pressures that otherwise could cause a recession, such as high interest rates.  Dean Witter increased its earnings and dividend estimates and price targets on many cyclical issues, he said, and raised the weighting of stocks in its model portfolio.  The firm is now recommending 75% stocks and 25% bonds, compared with previous weightings of 48% for each plus 4% cash.  Buyers flocked to other airline stocks in response to the Davis offer for UAL. AMR, the parent of American Airlines, rose 3 1/2 to 71 1/2; Delta Air Lines climbed 2 3/8 to 74 1/2; USAir Group gained 1 to 53; and Southwest Airlines rose 1 to 27, all on the Big Board.  Texas Air, which owns Continental and Eastern airlines, gained 3/8 to 16 1/8 on the American Stock Exchange.  Takeover speculation also boosted the savings-and-loan sector; the industry bailout legislation awaiting President Bush's signature allows commercial banks to acquire healthy thrifts immediately.  CalFed climbed 1 5/8 to 26 1/2, GlenFed rose 1 7/8 to 22 5/8, Coast Financial advanced 1 3/8 to 19, and Great American First of San Diego rose 3/4 to 11 1/4.  Paper issues other than International Paper also benefited from the interest in cyclical issues and from speculative buying, traders said, with the latter coming in response to news that Britain's Jefferson Smurfit Group plans to raise more than $1 billion by consolidating and recapitalizing its U.S. operations.  Bowater jumped 2 1/8 to 31 5/8, Stone Container gained 1 1/4 to 28 3/4, Federal Paper Board went up 1 1/4 to 27 3/4, Scott Paper advanced 1 1/4 to 50 1/4, and Kimberly-Clark rose 1 7/8 to 68 7/8.  Cyclical plays abounded in the chemical and metals sectors.  Dow Chemical rose 2 1/2 to 95 1/2, Monsanto jumped 3 7/8 to 120, Air Products & Chemicals gained 2 1/2 to 48 1/8, and Great Lakes Chemical rose 3 3/8 to 88 3/8.  Aluminum Co. of America rose 1 1/8 to 72 5/8 on the Big Board, and Maxxam, the parent of Kaiser Aluminum & Chemical, climbed 2 3/8 to 40 3/4 on the Amex.  Technology stocks posted solid gains even though Goldman Sachs failed to recommend the issues as had been expected.  Rumors that the firm would take that step fueled buying in the sector Friday, traders said.  William J. Kealy, the firm's co-director of research, declined to comment on the rumors.  Digital Equipment went up 2 3/4 to 98, Unisys climbed 5/8 to 22, Hewlett-Packard jumped 3 1/8 to 57 1/2, Compaq Computer gained 3 3/4 to 98 3/4, Motorola rose 2 1/4 to 61 1/4, and Texas Instruments went up 1 1/8 to 41 3/4.  Wyse Technology jumped 1 1/4 to 6 5/8 amid speculation that the company may go private in a leveraged buy-out or put itself up for sale.  One report said Wyse officials have agreed to a buy-out if they can get the financing.  Ambase, the most active Big Board issue, finished down 1/8 at 15 3/4.  Industrial Equity (Pacific) sold its 5.3% stake in the company; the sale accounted for about 1.8 million of the 2.8 million shares that changed hands.  U.S. Shoe fell 7/8 to 19 3/4 in trading that included a block of nearly 1.9 million shares, or 4.3% of the total outstanding.  A trader at Salomon Brothers, which handled the block, said both the buyer and the seller were institutions but wouldn't comment further.  Sea Containers dropped 3 7/8 to 62 5/8.  Sweden's Stena and Britain's Tiphook, which jointly made a $50-a-share bid for the company, said they may sell all or part of their stake.  The companies also said they met with Sea Containers officials to discuss the possible purchase of certain assets.  Harcourt Brace Jovanovich went up 1/2 to 15 5/8.  The Financial Times reported that British publisher Robert Maxwell, who tried to acquire the company two years ago, plans to pursue some of its publishing units.  Harcourt, which is selling its theme parks and land holdings, said it doesn't plan to sell any other operations.  The American Stock Exchange Index rose 3.08 to 379.18, another all-time high.  Volume totaled 13,120,000 shares, compared with 14,100,000 Friday.  There were 334 issues advancing, 258 declining and 258 unchanged.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co. accused MCI Communications Corp. of providing several big customers with special discounts without disclosing details to the Federal Communications Commission.  The complaint could lead to a re-examination of the commission's policy on dominant carriers -- something AT&T has been informally pushing for during the past two years as MCI and U.S. Sprint Communications have bitten into AT&T's market share.  The unusual complaint, filed with the FCC, maintains that MCI is required to file rates and terms of its service offerings, just as does AT&T.  The commission, however, adopted rules in 1983 making tariffs optional for so-called non-dominant carriers such as MCI and U.S. Sprint, which is controlled by United Telecommunications.  In the complaint, AT&T, which has more than 70% of the long-distance market, acknowledged that the commission has different rules for AT&T, as the market's dominant carrier, than for the other long-distance companies.  AT&T noted, however, that although MCI challenged the commission's rules in 1983 to make sure that all carriers had to file tariffs, MCI now files tariffs selectively.  "The law is unambiguous," said Tom Norris, AT&T's vice president, federal regulatory affairs.  "MCI and others seem to be doing this to an increasing degree."  In a letter accompanying the complaint, AT&T said it had viewed the commission's "forbearance from regulating non-dominant carriers as a transitional, interim step that would lead quickly" to ending unneeded regulation of all carriers.  AT&T contended that the rules have given MCI and other carriers "unwarranted advantages" because they can offer some customers attractive rates without disclosing details to the FCC and, thus, to competitors.  Meantime, the FCC requires AT&T to make detailed disclosures.  AT&T has made some headway on the tariff issue, winning FCC approval to offer custom-designed services for big business customers without disclosing all of the features and prices.  FCC officials said late yesterday that they hadn't read the complaint and had no immediate comment.  MCI called the complaint "a smokescreen to achieve AT&T's own deregulation through the complaint process.  AT&T's real motive is to challenge the FCC's competitive-carrier policy and rules, not to attack MCI particularly in the way it conducts business as a non-dominant carrier."  The spokeswoman said MCI files tariffs on most services, but that with big business customers it provides discount services under contract and doesn't file details of those agreements with the FCC.  AT&T wants the commission to investigate and stop the alleged abuses, and is seeking unspecified damages "equal to the net revenue AT&T has lost on account of MCI's unlawful practices" plus interest.  AT&T said MCI has unlawfully failed to file tariffs for providing telecommunications services to Merrill Lynch & Co., Westin Hotels Co., United Airlines unit of UAL Corp., the Pentagon, University of Colorado at Boulder and Unigard Security Insurance Co., as well as other companies.  Westin Hotels is owned by Robert M. Bass Group and Aoki Corp. of Japan.  In the Merrill Lynch example, AT&T said that it figured MCI's offer was at rates at least 8.5% below the lowest rates specified in MCI tariffs.  MCI won the contract in June.  Hiroshi Hashimoto's rigid office routine just loosened up.  Until last week, the 25-year-old Toyota Motor Co. employee fit neatly into an orderly corporate structure.  He reported to a section chief, who reported to a division chief, and so on up the line.  After a couple of decades, a patient Mr. Hashimoto himself might have expected to ascend to section or division chief.  Suddenly, though, there are no section chiefs at Toyota.  Worried that management was bogged down by the swollen number of middle-aged, white-collar workers getting automatic seniority promotions, Toyota last week abruptly eliminated two tiers of middle-ranking positions.  With the shift, about 1,000 people were reassigned, many to lower-level jobs.  The move had the double effect of eliminating inefficient layers of bureaucracy and averting top-heaviness in management.  It also should prepare the company to deal with thinning numbers of younger workers.  Mr. Hashimoto is delighted at the change.  Though he may have to wait longer to get into upper management, he now has fewer people looking over his shoulder and more-direct access to top people.  "Before, the "kacho" (section chief) just gave instructions," the third-year employee says.  "From now on, we can ask him to move the pencil a bit, too.  Now, I feel that we're people working together."  The collegial approach welcomed by Mr. Hashimoto once would have been heresy in Japan's hierarchical corporate world.  Far from an egalitarian society, Japan's business world still relies heavily on rank and tenure; titles such as kacho have tended to denote longevity rather than managerial expertise.  But change is afoot, and not just at Toyota.  Like many U.S. corporations, Japan Inc. is doing away with layers of middle management in hopes of improving efficiency.  But beyond efficiency, the revamping of some renowned Japanese employment practices also reflects shifting demographics.  With the bulk of the country's work force now passing through middle age, Japanese companies are fretting about how to sidestep seniority systems for older employees and how to win new, young employees, who are becoming a rare commodity.  In a country where rigid structures are the norm, a little less rigidity is probably attractive to young people.  "Right now, Japan has too many chiefs and too few Indians," says an executive recruiter for one U.S. firm in Tokyo.  And the situation isn't improving.  "Anybody who can read a population chart can tell you that these numbers aren't going to go away," says Dan Maher, co-head of consulting at Chuo Coopers & Lybrand K.K.  Japan's most recent population statistics show a big bulge in the age group between 35 and 39 years old.  Nearly one in 10 Japanese falls into that small bracket, and almost a third of all Japanese are between 30 and 50 years old.  Moreover, the pool of young people is drying up: Only one in 12 Japanese will be joining the work force in the next five years.  Companies are feeling the rising age curve.  At Nissan Motor Co. the average age of employees today is 38.1 years, up from 33.9 in 1979.  As the average age rises, more and more workers expect to get automatically promoted to managerial positions.  At some companies, employees are promoted by rote to managerial positions with nobody working under them.  Some even end up without responsibilities themselves, and become known as "madogiwa zoku," or window-side sitters, because they have nothing to do but gaze out the window.  Nissan was one of the first to act on the growing managerial problem.  Four years ago, the auto maker began dropping the courtesy titles, like kacho, that employees attached to their supervisors' names, hoping to reduce the pressure on automatic promotions.  And more recently, Nissan told workers it will base promotions on ability, rather than tenure.  A smaller Japanese company, die-cast maker Ryobi Ltd., has taken an even more direct approach: It bases middle managers' salaries on performance.  That may sound standard to Western ears, but in the land of lifetime employment, salaries traditionally have been determined by length of tenure.  A Ryobi spokesman says the move is intended to "activate" managers and to spur initiative.  The move by Toyota is the most severe effort yet to steer out of the traditional seniority-promotion system.  Not only did the company eliminate the titles of 1,000 middle managers, but it flattened out some vertical management structures to reduce the number of people and bureaucratic steps involved in key business decisions and strategies.  The company says that quick decision-making is important, particularly for getting new car models off the drawing board and into production.  "By eliminating titles, the organization becomes more flexible," says Yoshihisa Murasawa, a vice president at Booz-Allen & Hamilton (Japan) Inc., consultants.  "Business is becoming much more complex, and it was too easy for decisions to fall between different sections in the same company."  At the same time that Japanese companies are finding they have too many workers of middle-manager age, they're suffering from a lack of young blood.  As a result, competition to lure new workers is intense.  Today, there are nearly 130 job offers for every 100 applicants in Japan, and major universities report that graduating seniors have an average of three job offers from which to choose.  With such rosy prospects and a booming Japanese economy, young workers have the luxury of becoming picky with what job they take.  More surprising, they are willing to desert jobs they don't like, a major break from the past.  "People's values are changing," says Yoshiaki Noguchi, a business strategy consultant at ODS Corp.  For decades, Japanese have tended to stick with the same employer until retirement.  Nowadays, with Japan's affluence rising, workers are more concerned with their own lives, and less concerned with their employers.  "There's a lot less loyalty towards companies," Mr. Noguchi says.  "Job-hopping is becoming natural."  Adds Booz-Allen's Mr. Murasawa: "People take it for granted that there is money and Japan is affluent.  Loyalties are to jobs, not companies."  That fact is forcing companies to improve the conditions they offer to new employees.  Young, single workers traditionally have tended to live in company dormitories, mainly because of sky-high real estate and consumer prices in Tokyo.  Now, many big companies are polishing up those company apartments in hopes of winning and keeping new workers.  Along with announcing the middle-management changes, Toyota last week said it would commit 100 billion yen ($714.8 million) to improve employee residences.  And Nikko Securities Co. raised 100 billion yen through a new share issue, of which 43.7 billion yen is earmarked to upgrade employee quarters with telephones, satellite television and health centers.  Nikko also hopes to double the average size of its employee dormitory rooms to about 100 square feet.  "In some dormitories, space was so, so small," says Yuko Onuma, a spokeswoman for Nikko.  "Employees have come to expect help from their companies, so we have done this."  Analysts say the Japanese efforts to adjust to the new demographics will continue, and take many different forms.  Notes Coopers & Lybrand's Mr. Maher: "There's probably as many ways as there are companies."  Fifth Third Bancorp. said it agreed to acquire First Ohio Bancshares Inc., Toledo, in exchange for about $178 million of Fifth Third common stock.  Cincinnati-based Fifth Third said it will exchange $40 market value of Fifth Third common for each share of First Ohio.  The acquisition is subject to regulatory approval.  First Ohio is a bank holding company with $1.01 billion of assets and 28 bank offices in and around Toledo.  When the transaction is completed, First Ohio will be renamed Fifth Third Bank of Toledo, the companies said.  Fifth Third has assets of $5.49 billion.  It operates 149 banking offices in Ohio, Kentucky and Indiana.  The holding company said it expects by year end to acquire four other banks with combined assets of $275 million.  Those agreements were announced previously.  Yesterday, Fifth Third stock rose 50 cents to close at $53.25 a share and First Ohio stock fell $1.50 to close at $32, both in national over-the-counter trading.  A surprising number of slow-selling cars got high marks from J.D. Power & Associates in its annual survey of customer satisfaction among new-car buyers.  The results are sure to be cited by manufacturers eager to boost sales -- and just as certain to spark debate about how much such surveys really mean.  The survey found that Honda Motor Co.'s Acura division had the highest customer satisfaction for both product quality and dealer service during the first 12 months of car ownership.  Acura, whose sales were up about 16% during the first half of this year, has held the top spot for the three years of its existence.  Power, a car-marketing research concern based in Agoura Hills, Calif., began the survey four years ago.  Power isn't the only concern rating car quality and customer satisfaction, but along with Consumer Reports magazine, it is the most influential.  As a group, Japanese nameplates continued to dominate the survey, capturing six of the top 16 rankings.  Asian car makers -- the Japanese companies and Korea's Hyundai Motor Co. -- were given an average rating of 130.  Detroit's Big Three manufacturers had an average score of 112 on the survey, edging out European car makers for the first time.  Some of the top scoring nameplates have suffered sharp sales slumps this year.  Mercedes-Benz, for instance, has posted an 18% sales decline this year, and Porsche AG has had a 44% sales drop.  Luxury-car buyers have balked at price increases on European cars that began after the dollar's decline three years ago.  At the other end of the price ladder, Hyundai's sales have plunged 33% this year despite good marks in the Power survey.  Hyundai's bread-and-butter model is a subcompact, the Excel, a market segment that has been sluggish this year.  Sales of Korean cars in general have sagged as prices crept near those of Japanese subcompacts.  But some models seem to have benefited from good results in the survey.  General Motors Corp.'s Buick LeSabre model ranked highly in a June J.D. Power survey on "initial" customer satisfaction, which covers the first 90 days of ownership.  In July, LeSabre sales surged to 15,468 cars, up 82% from the same month a year ago.  "When news gets out on one of these surveys, the customers really get running," says Robert Cox, general manager of Hub Buick in Houston.  But the link between sales and surveys is far from clear.  Some experts say that sales are the ultimate customer-satisfaction survey, because sales reflect word-of-mouth opinions among owners.  Ford Motor Co.'s peformance on the Power surveys has consistently lagged the company's sales record.  The best Ford did on the most recent survey was a tie for 15th place, by its Mercury nameplate.  Ford's Lincoln nameplate didn't make the rankings -- only cars that score above average are listed -- and thus trailed GM's Cadillac division, which placed No. 5 overall.  But the Ford plant that produces Lincoln models has been running flat-out for years, while GM's Cadillac sales have kept production down.  Ford officials say the Power ratings are misleading, because they emphasize dealer service and play down manufacturing quality.  But Ford hasn't done well in some recent quality surveys by Consumer Reports, which has criticized the Taurus/Sable models and all three Lincoln models.  Big Three manufacturers have been narrowing the gap in customer satisfaction.  They trail the Japanese car makers by 18 points in the latest survey; they were behind by 25 points in 1986.  European car makers, on the other hand, have been losing ground, trailing the Japanese by 19 points in the new survey.  They trailed by 13 points in 1986.  Laventhol & Horwath, the seventh-biggest U.S. accounting firm, is launching an advertising campaign aimed at luring away clients of Big Eight firms that are merging.  The six-week campaign will run in national and regional newspapers and cost $500,000.  It asserts that Philadelphia-based Laventhol can give midsized companies "a refreshing alternative" to big accounting firms that are merging.  "The Big Eight firm . . . may already be feeling the pressure," the Laventhol ad states.  "Maybe the partner isn't calling as often.  Maybe the team keeps changing -- and getting younger.  And maybe you feel caught in the grips of a bureaucracy."  The Laventhol ad may signal rougher competition ahead for all accounting firms, say accounting business specialists.  "What was once a genteel and gentlemanly business has now become a battlefield with no holds barred," said James Emerson, publisher of Emerson's Professional Services Review.  Some of the merging firms aren't happy about the Laventhol ads being launched this week.  Pointing to the ads' theme, Ray Groves, co-chief executive of Ernst & Young, said that "neither negativism nor puffery serve the business community well."  Ernst & Young was recently formed by the merger of Ernst & Whinney and Arthur Young & Co. Mr. Groves said a major reason for the merger was "to enhance our ability to serve" the middle market.  Deloitte Haskins & Sells and Touche Ross & Co. recently said they also plan to merge and Arthur Andersen & Co. and Price Waterhouse said they're mulling a merger.  George Bernstein, chief executive officer of Laventhol, said he wouldn't be surprised if some Big Eight firms are upset at the ads.  "But advertising is getting more pointed and forceful and the days of soft competition and shadowboxing are over," he added.  The Laventhol ad, for example, asks companies if they're interested in hiring CPA firms that are "as interested in growing your business as they are their own" -- a direct slap at accounting firms in the midst of combining.  "An ad campaign of this scope is unprecedented for us -- and for most accounting firms," said Mr. Bernstein.  "We are obviously in an accounting war, and Laventhol is prepared to use all the tools of battle."  He estimates that 80% of Laventhol's $350 million in annual revenue comes from midsized companies.  Big Eight firms in recent years have been trying to attract more midsized clients, but a major portion of their revenue derives from serving large, multinational companies.  Other second-tier accounting firms are trying to run ads to draw away business or personnel from the bigger merging firms.  But their themes are somewhat gentler than the Laventhol approach.  Kenneth Leventhal & Co., a Los Angeles-based firm, recently began a campaign saying "Mergers.  Not for us]" The ad states that the firm's title is "a name that won't change."  Pannell Kerr Forster, a Los Angeles-based accounting firm, is about to begin a print campaign to attract employees of big merging firms.  "We will tell them that if they're tired of the disruption, they should talk to us," said Charles Kaiser, Pannell Kerr chairman.  Until this year, the total advertising outlay of the entire Big Eight firms was fairly modest -- ranging from $2 million to $4 million a year.  But Arthur Andersen & Co.'s Andersen Consulting unit recently began a more than $10 million name-recognition television and print campaign.  Before the venture capitalist had finished explaining his investment criteria and expected return, the would-be entrepreneur was packing her papers.  "You venture capitalists are all alike.  You're too damn greedy," she complained.  A minute later, she was gone.  For the venture capitalist, Kenneth Moch, such encounters are common these days.  As managing partner of Catalyst Ventures, a Baltimore venture-capital fund founded seven months ago, he has met with nearly 250 entrepreneurs this year.  Yet he hasn't made a single investment.  Entrepreneurs often gripe that squeezing money out of venture capitalists is one of their biggest headaches.  But the 35-year-old Mr. Moch, a former entrepreneur himself, is fast discovering that passing out the money is no piece of cake either.  Mr. Moch's Catalyst Ventures is one of a growing number of small venture-capital funds that focus on financing very small, young companies in a given area or industry -- in this case, the Baltimore-Washington region.  Financed by several companies and the Abell Foundation in Baltimore, Catalyst has $12.3 million to invest.  It also plans to share research and possibly co-invest with two larger Baltimore venture-capital funds, New Enterprise Associates and ABS Ventures.  But so far, the going has been slow.  One big obstacle: The capital in venture funds -- over $31 billion nationally -- has doubled in the past four years.  Thus, cash available greatly overshadows obviously attractive investment opportunities.  Moreover, Catalyst is operating in an area without the entrepreneurial tradition of Silicon Valley or Route 128.  So, although Mr. Moch hears from many people with promising technologies or business ideas, they often don't have a lot of business experience.  And providing seed funding is always more chancy than investing in the later stages of a company.  Still, by year's end, Mr. Moch hopes to make a dozen or so investments.  Of the proposals he has seen so far, he rates about a half-dozen as promising.  He says he is currently discussing the terms under which he will invest in these start-ups.  Also, he has identified two promising areas in pharmaceuticals.  Last month, Catalyst invested $20,000 in two technical teams to evaluate the potential of these fields.  A look at a recent day in Mr. Moch's life sheds light on how venture capitalists work -- and why they reject so many "sure-fire" proposals from entrepreneurs:  The day begins in the basement of Baltimore's Johns Hopkins Hospital.  Amid a battery of X-ray machines and high-tech scanners, radiologist Elliot Fishman is working on a three-dimensional imaging system to let doctors analyze fractures and bone damage in greater depth.  Mr. Moch comments on the improvements made in the system since he met with Dr. Fishman about six weeks earlier.  And he is excited when Dr. Fishman says a major medical company is interested in marketing the system.  But Mr. Moch frets that the system's $125,000 price tag will put it beyond reach of many potential buyers.  Besides, he doesn't think it is simple enough to be used by doctors with little time and patience.  "The design needs more refinement," Mr. Moch says.  He plans to talk to Dr. Fishman again after he has interviewed some potential users and the medical company interested in the product.  Even when venture capitalists like an idea, they have to worry about obstacles that could prove decisive, such as the time it will take to develop a finished product.  For instance, in his next appointment back at Catalyst's small brownstone office, Mr. Moch meets with an Israeli-born software designer who desperately needs $1 million to keep alive his project: a software system to aid managers in advanced decision-making.  Mr. Moch, a Stanford M.B.A. who was an executive at a biotechnology start-up for almost six years, attends the meeting with a New Enterprise venture capitalist, a former computer industry analyst.  Until now, the venture has been a bootstrap operation, financed by the programmer and his family.  But it is rapidly exhausting his resources -- at about $35,000 a month.  Without new money, the project will have to be halted, the scientist says.  Both Mr. Moch and the analyst feel that the entrepreneur's software fills an important niche.  But they worry that it may take a year or more to complete development of the product and that managers may find it hard to use.  "Ease of use determines who will use the product and how much it can sell for," says Mr. Moch.  Another area of concern: The company needs much help with business planning and marketing.  Over a working lunch, Mr. Moch next meets two corporate refugees: former employees of Comsat Corp. who have a product to connect remote networks of Macintosh computers.  The two already have spent their own savings to design and test the product.  Now they need money for full-scale production and marketing.  The entrepreneurs, both scientists, clearly know more about the product and the business than about marketing.  Mr. Moch worries that the Macintosh market isn't large enough to support a big company.  He also is concerned about competitors.  Do the entrepreneurs have plans for a broader-based company?  And what about the competition?  Why can't Apple create a similar product?  Mr. Moch decides to talk to telecommunications analysts and explore the broader market.  Though venture capitalists reject one project after another, sometimes they reconsider.  After lunch, Mr. Moch meets with Lee Feldman, an entrepreneur who wants to raise $12 million for his venture: a company that will use sophisticated software for medical diagnostics.  Mr. Moch already had sent the entrepreneur a polite rejection.  He wanted too much money for a market that hadn't been properly identified yet, Mr. Moch explains.  But then, on the recommendation of a New York venture capitalist, Mr. Moch decided to see the entrepreneur.  Mr. Feldman, after working as a scientist on many research projects, says he now wants to apply his technology to business.  Though he doesn't have a ready product or a blueprint, he has talked to a big computer company about using the technology on the company's system.  Moreover, he is sure he can sell the software to big health insurers and corporations.  Mr. Moch likes the idea but feels that much development work is needed to create a prototype.  Besides, Mr. Feldman has no business experience to help launch a start-up.  Mr. Moch decides to consult the colleague who referred Mr. Feldman before making a decision.  The last meeting is with a scientist seeking $1 million to develop a new and more efficient way to produce an existing drug.  The resulting product not only would have new applications but would be far superior to the existing drug, she claims.  For Mr. Moch, the market the scientist describes is too vague and undefined.  Moreover, he worries that the product has no proprietary value and that others can easily copy it.  His biggest concern, however, is that the potential size of the company is too small to be a profitable investment.  "This isn't a project for a venture capitalist.  You need to work with a corporate partner," he tells the scientist.  She replies: "I will never work with a corporation."  Mr. Moch then explains that he expects returns of five to 10 times his investments over a five-year to 10-year period.  And he fears that the company she is planning won't fit the bill.  That's when the entrepreneur walks out.  Mr. Moch says he will write a letter thanking her for the visit.  But by day's end, the venture capitalist is essentially where he started: many avenues to explore -- but no investments to make.  Warner-Lambert Co., the subject of a steady beat of takeover rumors, said it is encouraged by rising earnings prospects, is seeking acquisitions, and isn't interested in merging.  In an interview, Joseph D. Williams, chairman and chief executive officer, said the health and consumer-products company based in Morris Plains, N.J., expects profit this year to rise 20%; Mr. Williams previously said profit would climb 17% or 18%.  The company earned $340.3 million, or $5 a share, last year, which would give the company indicated profit of about $408 million.  Mr. Williams also said the company is optimistic about prospects for marketing THA, its controversial drug for treating Alzheimer's disease.  Mr. Williams said he expects the company to seek approval early in 1990, sooner than expected, from the Food and Drug Administration to market THA.  He called interim results of a 300-patient study of the drug "very encouraging" and said he expects the FDA to "move quickly" on the application.  His comments are the strongest endorsement for the drug, whose effectiveness has been called into question by researchers.  Last month, scientists reviewed interim results of the THA study to monitor the drug's safety and effectiveness.  Mr. Williams said the company was so encouraged by the interim findings that it has christened THA with a brand name, Cognex, an indication that Warner-Lambert expects FDA approval.  There currently isn't any available treatment for the 2.5 million Americans with Alzheimer's disease, a degenerative brain disorder.  Mr. Williams plans to make his earnings projection and discuss THA and other matters at a meeting today sponsored by Cowen & Co., a Boston securities firm.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Warner-Lambert gained $1.875 to $109.  Warner-Lambert's stronger-than-expected earnings growth in part reflects a burst of sales from its anti-cholesterol drug, Lopid, and its Listerine mouthwash, Mr. Williams said.  Lopid's sales are expected to rise more than 50% to $300 million this year, as a result of a study reported last year showing that the drug could reduce the risk of a heart attack.  Listerine sales are up 19% for the first six months of this year to $125 million because of new plaque-fighting claims.  Mr. Williams said Warner-Lambert isn't seeking any merger proposals, nor will the company entertain any.  Following the recent string of mergers in the drug industry, some analysts said Warner-Lambert might be a logical target for a larger drug or chemical company seeking access to the company's product line, sales force and growing research and development operations.  But Mr. Williams said the company is in "excellent" shape to weather the industry's stiffening competition.  He said that's because the company has spent the previous decade slimming operations.  The work force of 32,000 employees is half what it was in 1980 and the cost of selling goods is 33% of sales, down from 48% in 1980.  "Because we are so lean, good new products have a significant incremental effect on earnings," he said.  "We're in a position to produce very good long-term, as well as short-term, results."  Mr. Williams said the company expects earnings growth to perform in the "very top tier" of U.S. drug companies over the next few years, rising at least 15% to 16% a year.  He said he expects the company to benefit from Lopid, which should generate sales of $500 million to $600 million within a few years, from the introduction of several drugs, and the continuing strength of the company's consumer health products and candy and gum businesses.  The company, Mr. Williams said, anticipates robust sales from a nicotine skin patch tested as a smoking cessation product.  The company has sought FDA approval to sell the patch, which secretes nicotine into the body via the skin.  Warner-Lambert also expects approval in 1991 for a new medicine for high blood pressure called accupril.  The drug is very similar to Vasotec and Capoten, $1 billion-a-year drugs sold by Merck & Co. and Squibb Corp., respectively.  Mr. Williams said the company is seeking acquisitions to strengthen its marketing presence in Europe.  He said Warner-Lambert would be interested in acquiring a drug or consumer health care products company.  But "I'm not looking for a company with problems or one that would dilute our earnings," he said.  The board, he said, will consider whether to raise the dividend within a few months, as well as a stock split.  At London's Gatwick airport, delays are so bad the airport has put up two marquees with 1,000 extra seats, and brought in clowns to entertain children.  In Honolulu, travelers coming from Asia have been stuck in two-hour lines at customs and immigration.  And tales of marathon waits abound.  Last May, Barry Slobodow took a British Airways flight to Manchester, England, that was supposed to land at 6 a.m.  It got in at 3 a.m. -- 21 hours later.  "It was a horror," recalls the New Jersey businessman, who missed an important appointment.  Traveling abroad has become as unreliable as traveling in the U.S. Flight delays have risen sharply this year in some foreign airports, particularly in Europe.  Several major carriers admit their trans-Atlantic flights -- once renowned for their punctuality -- are now on schedule less than half the time.  One-hour delays are becoming routine.  And once on the ground, the waits to clear customs, immigration and security are even more staggering.  "People used to brag about how much better things were abroad," says Mary Hadwin of McIntosh Travel in Charleston, S.C.  "They don't do that anymore."  Some delays are being caused by new security measures, or by periodic labor strikes abroad.  But the biggest problem is the world-wide boom in airline travel.  The number of U.S. and foreign trans-Atlantic passengers has grown at an average annual rate of 8.6% since 1983.  Air travel to and within Asia has surged at double-digit rates in recent years, and these increases have all but overwhelmed many countries' air traffic control and customs systems.  By far, the worst gridlock is in Europe.  In June, 31% of departures within Europe were more than 15 minutes late, up from 22% in the same month a year ago, according to the Association of European Airlines.  That's affecting U.S travelers to Europe, since many trans-Atlantic flights involve intra-European connections.  It's also spilling over to nonstop trans-Atlantic flights, since airlines must wait for late-arriving connections in Europe.  In fact, British Airways says only 33% of its departures from London to North America were within three minutes of schedule from April to June, compared with 42% in the year-earlier period.  Pan American World Airways and Trans World Airlines also concede that only about half of their trans-Atlantic flights have been leaving on or within a few minutes of schedule.  American Airlines, which flies to 14 European cities, flatly warns travelers to "expect delays up to one hour" on westbound trans-Atlantic trips.  Airlines say airspace has become so crowded in Europe that any airline missing an assigned takeoff slot may have to wait an hour for another free slot.  Each country in Europe also operates its own air traffic control system, and this makes the entire European air system vulnerable to the continent's frequent air-controller strikes.  Two weeks ago, for instance, a weekend strike by engineers who control airplanes in flight over France caused horrendous backups on British flights heading through French airspace.  By contrast, travelers to Asia encounter most of their problems on the ground.  At Tokyo's Narita airport, industry officials say, it can take an hour and a half to park and get through the airport's customs and immigration lines; they cite an expected 16% increase in the traffic this summer.  The crunch at many airports has become so critical that some airlines are telling overseas travelers to arrive two, and even three hours early.  The airline industry is also becoming more active in fighting delays.  The Association of European Airlines says the 21 airlines in its group have started alternating schedules and rerouting trips to reduce gridlock.  Britain's Civil Aviation Authority says it will invest #600 million pounds ($994.5 million) to improve the country's air traffic control system.  Nobody, though, is expecting any letup in delays for the rest of the summer, since airline traffic generally peaks then.  Jim Pagano, a vice president at U.S. Travel Systems, a major travel agency based in Rockville, Md., says, "We're telling people to prepare for the worst in Europe."  ---  Yumiko Ono contributed to this article.  Invacare Corp. said second-quarter net rose 32%, to $1.2 million, or 20 cents a share, from $876,000, or 16 cents a share, a year ago.  But citing the short-term impact of investments in new plants and equipment, the Elyria, Ohio, maker of health care and extended care products said it expects third-quarter profit to be "down somewhat" from the year-earlier net of $1.7 million, or 31 cents a share.  For all of 1989, Invacare said it expects to report record earnings and sales, but wasn't more specific.  Last year, the company earned $5.1 million, or 90 cents a share, on sales of $160.8 million.  Sales in the second quarter increased 22% to $47 million from $38.6 million.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Invacare closed at $14.375, down $1.25.  For the six months, the company said net rose 30% to $1.9 million, or 34 cents a share, from $1.5 million, or 26 cents a share.  Sales increased 19% to $89 million from $74.8 million.  American Greetings Corp., which produces greeting cards and related products, said it will close its distribution center in Brigham City, Utah, within the next 60 to 90 days, reducing to three the number of its centers in the U.S.  The Cleveland-based company said new technology in its Danville, Ky., and Osceola and McCrory, Ark., centers will enable American Greetings to give improved service to retail customers in the western states now served by the Utah facility.  The company said the 160 employees at the Utah center will receive severance pay and assistance in finding new jobs.  It declined to say how much it will save by the closing.  The 586,000-square-foot building will be sold or leased, the company said.  Gidon U. Cohen, David P. Loseff and Michael A. Smith were named senior managing directors in charge of this holding company's new investment-banking unit.  Messrs.  Loseff and Smith were formerly managing directors at Bear, Stearns & Co.'s Chicago office; Mr. Cohen also worked for the firm as an associate director.  At Continental, the three will co-manage a subsidiary offering advice on mergers and acquisitions.  John R. Chase was named president of the HomeClub division.  Mr. Chase most recently served as president of Fotomat Corp. Waban is a warehouse club merchandiser.  Ashland Oil Inc. said it retained First Boston Corp. as its financial adviser in pursuing the possible sale of Beaird Industries Inc., a metal products unit with sales last year of about $40 million, but declined to say how much it expects to receive for the business.  Beaird, Shreveport, La., fabricates and machines metal products, including large pressure vessels for refineries and chemical plants.  It has 680 employees.  The parent, based in Ashland, Ky., is a major petroleum refiner and marketer, and has units involved in motor oil, chemicals, highway construction and coal.  "The decision to pursue the possible sale of Beaird Industries is in keeping with Ashland's strategy to emphasize its petroleum, chemicals and related businesses," said John R. Hall, chairman and chief executive officer.  PRICOR Inc., Murfreesboro, Tenn., said former U.S. Ambassador to France Joe M. Rodgers and Pricor President Gil R. Walker were nominated to its board, which would increase the board's size to 11 directors.  Their election is scheduled for the correctional-services company's annual meeting Sept. 1.  Triton Group Ltd. said in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that it boosted its stake in Fuqua Industries Inc. to 16.4%, continuing its steady accumulation of Fuqua's common shares.  Triton, La Jolla, Calif., gradually has increased its ownership in the consumer products and service company since January, when it lifted its stake to 9.9%.  Triton has said it plans to acquire a controlling stake in Fuqua.  In Atlanta, a Fuqua spokesman said that there's "a very friendly relationship" between Fuqua and Triton.  Triton is a holding company with interests in turbine-engine overhauling and construction-industry products.  It is 40%-owned by Intermark Inc., a holding company based in La Jolla.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Fuqua shares rose 62.5 cents to close at $28.375.  W.R. Grace & Co. said it signed a definitive agreement to sell its profitable industrial equipment rental unit to Compagnie Francaise de l'Afrique Occidentale of Paris for $305 million.  The rental unit, Grace Equipment Co., earned $12 million on revenue of $111 million in 1988.  The proposed sale received board approval from both companies, but is subject to government approvals.  Compagnie Francaise is an international retailing and equipment distribution company.  The New York diversified chemicals concern also announced that its board approved an initial public offering of about 15% of its energy business.  Grace said the transaction still requires shareholder approval.  A company spokesman said proceeds from both sales will be used to reduce Grace's debt outstanding.  Here's a stock market puzzle: Though stocks are sizzling, corporations are failing to take advantage of the rally by issuing more shares.  And with the market brushing against its all-time high, companies with a need for capital may look back on 1989 as an opportunity lost.  "The calendar {of equity issues} is picking up, but it's nothing like the froth we had when the market reached this level in 1987," says Hayter Haynes, equity syndicate manager at Dean Witter Reynolds.  "If for balance-sheet purposes you need equity, you should be in this marketplace."  In 1987, many public companies issued shares and looked brilliant, in retrospect, after the stock market crashed.  Citicorp, for instance, raised $1.14 billion by selling shares at 58 1/4 each a month before the Oct. 19 crash.  On the day following the crash, with its stock at 31 3/4 a share, Citicorp pivoted 180 degrees and announced it was buying its stock back.  So far this year, primary offerings -- sales of new stock by already-public companies -- are a bit ahead of last year, but they have fallen 70% from 1987.  Primary offerings totaled $11.63 billion in 225 separate issues in the first seven months of 1987, according to IDD Information Services.  So far this year, 100 companies have issued stock for $3.47 billion. (The figures don't include initial public offerings by private companies.)  Underwriters say it's a good time for selling stock.  "For equity issues of decent quality, this is a very receptive market," says T. Anthony Brooks, a managing director at First Boston.  By selling new shares, a company bolsters its balance sheet.  Many companies, however, no longer want a conservative balance sheet.  Conservatively financed companies are ripe for hostile raids.  "Because of takeovers and leveraged buy-outs, companies are much less inclined to sell stock and put cash on their balance sheets," says Roger Elsas, equity syndicate manager at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Also, companies are reluctant to issue equity because they view debt -- tax-free because interest payments are deductible -- as cheaper.  And when they do sell equity, many are inclined to look for private buyers -- who are valuing companies more highly than public shareholders.  Indeed, "the big story has been and continues to be retirement of equity," says Robert Salomon Jr., a managing director at Salomon Brothers.  Raising equity, he says, "is contrary to what's going on in the world."  Some contrarian companies are doing it all the same.  L.A. Gear expects to close tomorrow on a sale of new stock that will net it $70 million.  Elliot Horowitz, chief financial officer, says the fast-growing running shoe company had exhausted its bank borrowing lines and was getting "pretty highly leveraged."  Mr. Horowitz may have also figured out that since L.A. Gear's stock has tripled this year, he isn't exactly selling on the cheap.  Total Petroleum North America recently raised $110 million in equity, which it used to acquire gasoline stations.  "We could have done it with debt," says Vice President Gilbert Kiggins.  But Total envisions making more acquisitions.  By keeping its debt-to-equity ratio at prudent levels, Total will preserve its future borrowing power and its "financial flexibility," he says.  But neither Total nor L.A. Gear have to worry much about takeovers.  Total is 51%-owned by Paris-based Total Cie.  Francaise des Petroles.  L.A. Gear is 30%-owned by insiders, and its hunger for cash (to sustain growth) makes it unappealing to raiders.  Duramed Pharmaceuticals, on the other hand, is expected to net roughly $14.3 million from a recent equity offering.  Apparently, the company is trying to work its way back to health.  As of March 31, it had negative net worth (assets minus liabilities), negative working capital and lots of costly debt.  A public filing by the company says proceeds of the stock sale would be used to retire debt, "for working capital purposes" and for new-product studies.  The company didn't return telephone calls.  Its reticence notwithstanding, Duramed may at least be around to answer telephone calls in the future.  But not everyone who follows the fashion for debt vs. equity will be able to say the same.  Management at Integrated Resources, the former king of real estate syndications, debated whether to sell stock to fuel its expansion into life insurance.  It could have taken advantage of a share price of 32 before the crash and as high as 23 last year.  Instead, Integrated borrowed and kept on borrowing.  Then, in June, it defaulted on its short-term debt.  Its share price -- and its apparent prospects -- collapsed.  Why didn't Integrated sell stock when it could?  "You tend to be an optimist about your own company," says Integrated President Arthur Goldberg.  "You believe your own plans.  You always tend to believe your stock is too cheap."  According to the Federal Reserve, share buy-backs, mergers and other forms of equity retirement outpaced issuance of new equity -- including initial offerings -- by $76.5 billion in 1987, and by $130.5 billion in 1988.  One reason, according to academics and analysts, is that companies increasingly fear that if they issue new shares, the public will interpret it negatively.  According to a 1986 study by Harvard Business School Profs.  Paul Asquith and David W. Mullins Jr., companies' share prices dropped by an average of 3% when they announced stock sales.  Mr. Asquith says that when companies sell stock, "they are sending a signal."  When a company buys its stock, its management signals that its stock price is too low.  "What are you supposed to think when they sell stock?"  Mr. Asquith asks.  In theory, a company's share prices shouldn't drop, so long as it employs the capital from its stock sale as effectively as its existing capital.  L.A. Gear's stock has risen 6% since its stock-sale announcement.  But Messrs.  Asquith and Mullins, who looked at 128 stock issues from 1963 to 1981, found that for many companies, selling stock is, in effect, a celebration of past performance, rather than a preview of things to come.  The companies' share prices, they say, beat the market by about 40% in the two years before selling stock.  But in the two years after selling stock, their shares lagged the market by about 6%.  Merry-Go-Round Enterprises Inc., Towson, Md., said it expects to report second-quarter earnings in the range of 11 cents to 13 cents a share on a pre-split basis, nearly triple the earnings of a year earlier.  Based on 10,459,000 pre-split shares outstanding as of April 29, the specialty clothing retailer expects to post net income of $1.2 million to $1.4 million for the second quarter that ended July 29.  The company expects to release second-quarter results at the end of August.  In the year-ago quarter, the company had net of $390,000, or four cents a share, on sales of $59.1 million.  Michael D. Sullivan, president and chief executive officer, said the increase reflects better-than-expected growth in sales volume.  Merry-Go-Round acquired 124 outlets from Retail Ventures Inc. and Natco Industries Inc. earlier this year.  Merry-Go-Round announced a 3-for-2 stock split on July 31, after a 5% stock dividend paid in May.  David Michael Moss, 45 years old, resigned as the company's chairman, president and chief executive officer, and as a director.  He will remain a consultant to the maker of lighting fixtures and consumer products and will pursue other business interests.  John Browder, 42, was named president and chief executive.  He is currently president of Christina Lighting Inc., a Catalina unit.  A new chairman wasn't named.  The long-awaited trial over patent rights to biotechnology's hottest new drug, erythropoietin, is set to begin today in U.S. District Court in Boston.  Amgen Inc. and Genetics Institute Inc. both charge, among other things, that the other's patent for the anti-anemia drug, EPO, is invalid.  Genetics Institute's partner, Chugai Pharmaceutical Co. of Tokyo, is also a party in the complex litigation.  "The trial is being watched intensely by people in the industry for broad implications," said Lisa Raines, director of government relations at the Industrial Biotechnology Association in Washington.  Most biotech patent disputes are settled before they reach trial.  "Companies have found it more convenient to simply cross-license (patent rights) rather than slug it out in litigation," Ms. Raines said.  If Amgen loses, she thinks other biotech companies could be discouraged from efforts to press their patent claims in court.  Many securities analysts plan to be in the courtroom this morning to hear the opening arguments because of the high stakes involved.  While sales forecasts for EPO vary wildly, analysts expect the drug to garner annual sales of $100 million to more than $1 billion.  "This is the big (trial).  The one for all the marbles.  There will be a winner and there will be a loser," Stuart Weisbrod at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. told clients in brief written remarks yesterday.  But Amgen has more to lose than Genetics Institute or Chugai, Mr. Weisbrod and other analysts agree.  Amgen, based in Thousand Oaks, Calif., has hired a sales force and is building a full-fledged drug company around EPO, its first commercial product.  Amgen's version of the drug, sold under the Epogen trademark, was approved by the Food and Drug Administration on June 1 for treatment of anemia in patients suffering from chronic kidney failure.  Genetics Institute in Cambridge, Mass., and Chugai have licensed U.S. marketing rights to Chugai-Upjohn Inc., a joint venture of Chugai and Upjohn Co., the giant U.S. drug company based in Kalamazoo, Mich.  Chugai-Upjohn, based in Rosemont, Ill., is awaiting FDA approval for Marogen, its version of the drug.  Amgen runs the risk of losing all rights to EPO, whereas the worst Genetics Institute can do is "lose partially," said Robert Kupor, an analyst at Kidder Peabody & Co.  If Amgen's patent is upheld, Genetics Institute won't be able to manufacture EPO in the U.S., but the company will be able to receive royalties from Chugai-Upjohn on domestic sales of imported Marogen, he says.  Federal Judge William Young, who has ruled on most pretrial motions since Amgen fired the first legal volley in the patent litigation in October 1987, is tied up with a criminal case outside of Boston.  To accelerate the patent trial, the parties agreed in February for the case to be heard by Magistrate Patti B. Saris.  Magistrate Saris, a Harvard Law School graduate, was an assistant U.S. attorney in Boston and chief of the civil division before she was named a U.S. magistrate in 1986.  This will be the first patent trial over which she has presided, although she has been involved in preliminary hearings and other procedural matters involving patent disputes, according to her law clerk.  The trial is expected to take six to eight weeks, a Genetics Institute spokesman said.  "We look for a decision at the end of November at the earliest."  Commerce Bancshares Inc., Kansas City, Mo., agreed to buy its corporate headquarters building and other facilities from Tower Properties Co.  The agreement, which must be approved by shareholders of both companies, is expected to be completed by year's end.  As previously announced, Tower will transfer other assets to a new company that will continue in Tower's main business of managing and developing real estate.  Shares of the new company will be distributed, on a 1-for-1, tax-free basis, to Tower's stockholders.  After the distribution, Tower will merge with Commerce on a tax-free basis.  Tower shareholders are expected to receive eight shares of Commerce stock for each Tower share, subject to adjustment.  Commerce will issue about one million common shares in the transaction.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Commerce closed at $26.50, up $1.  Southmark Corp. said it will ask federal regulators and a bankruptcy court to let its San Jacinto Savings Association unit convert debt to equity, allowing the thrift to meet new regulatory requirements.  San Jacinto owes about $110 million in subordinated debt to Southmark, a real-estate and thrift concern.  Under regulatory accounting practices, that debt can be counted as capital, allowing the Houston thrift to exceed current regulatory requirements.  But under the new requirements of the thrift-rescue plan just passed by Congress, San Jacinto will need tangible capital of at least 1% of assets.  At June 30, the thrift's ratio of tangible capital to assets was negative 1%, said Joseph E. Settle, San Jacinto's chief operating officer.  Converting the debt to equity would improve the ratio to about 3.5%, he said.  San Jacinto has a large portfolio of troubled real estate and had a net loss of more than $100 million for the year ended June 30.  Southmark has been able to keep control of the thrift -- even after entering bankruptcy-law proceedings last monthby promising to maintain San Jacinto's capital at acceptable levels.  To keep the thrift, Southmark transferred about $64 million in assets to San Jacinto as compensation for a tax-sharing agreement and converted $110 million in intracompany loans into the subordinated debt just before it filed for bankruptcy.  Southmark said its lawyers are preparing papers to ask regulators and an Atlanta bankruptcy judge to allow it to convert the debt to equity.  It also has promised regulators that it will ask the court for permission to transfer $60 million more in assets into San Jacinto to make up for the approximately $5 million a month that San Jacinto was losing.  Huntington Bancshares Inc., Columbus, Ohio, said it agreed in principal to acquire First Banc Securities Inc., Morgantown, W.Va., for about $85 million of stock.  The exchange ratio will depend on the price of Huntington stock in the five days preceding the merger.  Based on the current price, Huntington would exchange 1.33 shares of its common for each share of First Banc Securities.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Huntington closed at $20.25, down 25 cents, while First Banc Securities closed at $22, up 25 cents.  First Banc Securities, with assets of $520.2 million, operates 12 banking offices in West Virginia and western Pennsylvania.  Huntington has assets of $10.4 billion and operates banks in Ohio, Kentucky, Indiana and Michigan.  The merger is expected to be completed in late fall, pending approval by regulators, Huntington said.  Dataproducts Corp., fending off hostile suitor DPC Acquisition Partners, agreed in principle to sell $63 million of its real-estate holdings to Trizec Properties Inc.  Dataproducts, a Chatsworth, Calif., computer-printer maker, had said it might sell some real-estate assets and distribute proceeds to holders.  DPC, a group led by Crescott Inc., a New York investment firm, said last week that at least $10 of its proposed $15-a-share bid for the company would be in cash.  The offer has an indicated total value of about $283 million.  The sale to Trizec, a unit of Canada's Trizec Corp. Ltd., is to include Dataproducts' Woodland Hills, Calif., headquarters building and two manufacturing buildings.  The company will lease them back for two years.  The sale is subject to certain conditions, including a definitive agreement.  Dataproducts closed yesterday at $13.50, unchanged, in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  Jerome J. Bushman, Bushmans' Inc. president, was named a director of this bank holding company, boosting board membership to 10.  Federal banking regulators approved Prudential Insurance Co. of America's acquisition of insolvent Cartersville Federal Savings Bank of Georgia.  The deal probably will be among the first to take advantage of broader marketing activities allowed in the landmark savings-and-loan bill.  The Cartersville, Ga., institution, which had $56.9 million in assets, is the second to be sold since banking regulators began taking supervision of insolvent thrifts in February.  The acquisition by Prudential, based in Newark, N.J., won't require any federal assistance.  The historic thrift legislation, which President Bush is expected to sign into law this week, eliminates a restriction that barred holding companies from marketing their products to thrift customers.  Theoretically, Prudential could market insurance products to Cartersville Federal depositors and customers through direct mailings or other means, said Patrick Forte, president of the Association of Thrift Holding Companies.  "It would seem to me to indicate there are some real prospects with the passage of this legislation for companies to avail themselves of the unique thrift holding company powers," he said.  Under terms of the deal, Prudential will invest $20 million in cash, and acquire assets and certain liabilities of the thrift, which will be renamed Cartersville Federal Prudential Savings Bank.  As of March 31, 1989, Cartersville Federal had liabilities of $65.6 million, which exceeded assets by about $8.6 million.  Cartersville Federal's insolvency resulted partly from poor loan documentation and practices, regulators said.  In Newark, Prudential said the purchase will allow it to expand its banking business, which operates nationwide through its network of agents.  The big insurance company already markets credit cards, certificates of deposit and other products through an Atlanta-based bank, Prudential Bank & Trust Co.  But Prudential said existing banking regulations limit the Atlanta bank in some respects and that purchasing the S&L will free Prudential to offer "a broader array of financial services."  The two institutions, which are about 25 miles apart, will share certain top management but will operate at least intitially as stand-alone businesses.  Each is a wholly owned subsidiary of Prudential.  A Prudential spokesman said the Atlanta bank will provide "operating support" to the newly acquired S&L.  In April, in the first transaction since banking officials took over management of insolvent thrifts, First Federal Savings Bank, Santurce, Puerto Rico, purchased insolvent Tropical Federal Savings & Loan Association, Miami, for $3.3 million in cash and with $11.4 million in government assistance.  Cartersville Federal was one of 263 insolvent S&Ls put under the supervision of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  Nine additional S&Ls, all in Louisiana, were placed in receivership yesterday and issued new federal charters.  The institutions, and their assets, are:  Security Homestead Association, New Orleans, $598.2 million; South Savings & Loan Association, Slidell, $266.4 million; Delta Savings & Loan Association, Kenner, $146.5 million; Citizens Homestead Association, New Orleans, $114.1 million; American Savings & Loan Association, New Orleans, $71.8 million; Central Savings & Loan Association, New Orleans, $58.5 million; Home Savings & Loan Association, New Orleans, $37.9 million; Terrebonne Savings & Loan Association, Houma, $30 million; and First City Savings Bank, Baton Rouge, $24.3 million.  Financial institutions in Louisiana have suffered in recent years as the state's economy sagged under low oil and gas prices.  WHO'S NEWS: Michelle Berman was named publisher of Soap Opera Digest, newly acquired by News Corp.'s Murdoch Magazines division.  She was publisher of In Fashion magazine, which was discontinued.  She succeeds Gerry Ritterman.  First Interstate Bancorp, Los Angeles, said it signed a definitive agreement to sell its equipment financing and leasing unit, Commercial Alliance Corp., to ORIX Corp., Tokyo, for $190 million.  The sale, scheduled to be completed in the current quarter, won't have any effect on First Interstate's after-tax earnings, a spokesman said.  Joseph J. Pinola, the bank-holding company's chairman and chief executive officer, said: "This transaction furthers our strategy to focus more closely on our core businesses, especially consumer banking in the Western U.S."  First Interstate has already shed about $4 billion as part of a restructuring program begun in late 1987.  Commercial Alliance had total assets of $1.9 billion as of June 30.  The unit had net income of $14.8 million for the 12 months ended June 30.  ORIX is Japan's biggest leasing company, First Interstate said.  A Delaware Chancery Court vice chancellor denied a request by a group including Kingsbridge Capital Group to enjoin certain anti-takeover measures by Dunkin' Donuts Inc.  The measures include the issuance of about 1.1 million shares of Dunkin' Donuts stock to a new employee stock ownership plan; the sale of a new class of convertible preferred stock to General Electric Capital Corp.; and Dunkin' Donuts' refusal to redeem the rights issued pursuant to its shareholders' rights plan.  "The motions for preliminary injunctive relief must be denied for failure to demonstrate a likelihood of irreparable harm," ruled Vice Chancellor William Chandler.  Kingsbridge, a unit of Unicorp Canada Corp., and Cara Operations Ltd., a Canadian food-services franchiser, last week extended until Aug. 15 their $43-a-share bid for the stock they don't already own of Dunkin' Donuts.  Dunkin' Donuts, a Randolph, Mass., franchiser of doughnut shops, has rejected the offer as inadequate.  A spokesman for Kingbridge couldn't be reached for comment on the ruling.  First Executive Corp., a Los Angeles-based life insurance holding company, said second-quarter net income rose 15% to $51 million, or 45 cents a share.  That compares with year-earlier profit of $44.2 million, or 39 cents a share, restated to comply with new life-insurance accounting rules.  For the six months, First Executive said it had net income of $6.9 million, or less than one cent a share, including $55.8 million from the cumulative effect of a tax-related accounting change.  Year-earlier net totaled $79.8 million, or 68 cents a share.  For the first half of 1989, the company posted a loss from operations of $48.9 million, including a previously reported $150 million loss from the sale of its Executive Life of New York unit.  All per-share figures are adjusted to reflect a 5% stock dividend paid in June.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Continental Airlines Inc., a unit of Texas Air Corp., offering of $150 million of senior notes, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Gentex Corp., offering of one million common shares, via Furman Selz Mager Dietz & Birney Inc.  First Chicago Corp., offering of up to 1,180,335 common shares in connection with its previously announced acquisition of Ravenswood Financial Corp.  Florida Power & Light Co., a unit of FPL Group Inc., shelf offering of up to $250 million of first-mortgage bonds on terms to be determined at the time of sale.  Ralston Purina Co., shelf offering of up to $200 million of debt securities and warrants on terms to be set at the time of sale.  When combined with securities remaining unsold from a previous offering, the filing gives the company as much as $300 million of securities available for sale.  R.P. Scherer Corp., offering of $150 million of senior discount debentures, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  TRW Inc., shelf offering of up to $300 million of debt securities and warrants on terms to be set at the time of sale.  When combined with securities remaining unsold from a previous offering, the filing gives the company as much as $500 million of securities available for sale.  David A. Arledge and Michael L. Beatty were elected executive vice presidents of this energy concern.  Mr. Arledge, 44 years old, was formerly a senior vice president and continues as chief financial officer and a director of the company.  Mr. Beatty, 42, was also a senior vice president and retains the titles of general counsel and director at Coastal.  Santa Fe Railway said it and the members of the United Transportation Union on the Coast Lines division of the railroad have ratified an agreement that will reduce the size of crews on the division's freight trains.  The Santa Fe Pacific Corp. unit said the standard train crew on the Coast Lines, which includes operations in California, Arizona and New Mexico, will consist of one conductor and one brakeman in addition to one locomotive engineer.  Currently, the standard crew size is four.  Santa Fe said designated intermodal, or piggyback, trains, which will represent as much as 20% of the railway's through trains, will operate with no brakeman.  In return, the railway said it will provide $75,000 in benefits for each of the 1,300 workers involved.  Santa Fe said the benefit may be taken in cash by those who choose voluntary separation.  Those choosing to remain with the company can elect to receive a $10,000 cash payment payable within 30 days of the Sept. 1 agreement date with the remaining $65,000 indexed for inflation and distributed when they retire or leave the company.  Employees may also elect to defer the entire $75,000.  The company said that if stock in Santa Fe Railway becomes publicly traded, $10,000 of this amount will be paid in the form of stock.  Santa Fe said none of the employees involved will be fired as a result of this agreement.  Nucorp Inc., Chicago, said it signed a letter of intent to acquire the closely held stock of United Capitol Holding Co. for about $88 million.  Atlanta-based United Capitol is an insurance concern which specializes in unusual liability cases, among other things.  Nucorp said the acquisition is subject to a definitive agreement, regulatory approvals and the tender of at least 90% of United Capitol stock.  Nucorp said that holders of at least 51% of United Capitol stock agreed to the letter of intent.  John W. Rowe, president and chief executive officer of New England Electric System, a Westborough, Mass., electric utility company, was named a director of this regional bank holding company.  He fills a vacancy.  Philip A. Laskawy, 48 years old, was named vice chairman and New York regional managing partner of this accounting and consulting firm.  Previously, he had been vice chairman and New York regional managing partner of Ernst & Whinney, which recently merged with Arthur Young & Co. Richard A. Young, 50, was named vice chairman and East regional managing partner of the new company.  He had been managing partner of the Northeast region of Arthur Young.  Manville Corp. said the Environmental Protection Agency filed a complaint against it, charging that Manville failed to comply with a plan to clean up an asbestos-landfill site.  The company said the EPA charged that Manville violated a consent decree when it improperly graded some property at the asbestos landfill in Waukegan, Ill., last fall.  The EPA said the property wasn't to be disturbed, Manville said.  Manville, a building and forest-products concern, denied the allegations and called the complaint a dispute over "an honest disagreement on the interpretation of engineering documents."  Manville said that it is continuing cleanup of the site on schedule and that it believes it has always been in full compliance with the work plan agreed on with the EPA. Manville said it expects to complete the cleanup by the end of next May.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Manville closed at $7.875, up 12.5 cents.  Separately, Harry W. Sherman resigned as corporate vice president and president of the Manville Forest Products Corp. subsidiary to become chief executive officer of a new investment group, Warrior River Paper Co. Tom Stephens, Manville's president and chief executive officer, said the forest products' management will report directly to him until a successor is found.  The company also said Bill Morrow was elected corporate vice president and promoted to the new position of executive vice president of the forest-products subsidiary.  Mr. Morrow had been vice president and general manager of the subsidiary's wood-products and forest-resources division.  The company also said Mike Linder would continue as the subsidiary's vice president, converting operations.  Mr. Linder, who joined the company recently, had been a vice president, manufacturing, for Gulf States Paper Corp.  Gary L. Roubos, the 52-year-old president and chief executive officer of this industrial manufacturing company, was elected to the additional post of chairman.  He succeeds Thomas C. Sutton, who retired.  Mr. Sutton, 68, remains chairman of the company's executive committee.  Federal prosecutors said they planned to seek a new and expanded indictment against Michael Milken, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s former chief of junk bond operations, by Oct. 1.  Mr. Milken was charged last March in a 98-count indictment alleging that he had committed racketeering and fraud.  Also indicted were Mr. Milken's brother, Lowell Milken, and Bruce Lee Newberg, a former Drexel junk bond trader.  Much of the information alleged in the March indictment was given to the government by Ivan Boesky, the imprisoned former stock speculator.  Since 1986, Mr. Boesky has cooperated with prosecutors in the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office in the case against Mr. Milken.  Many of the charges in the new indictment will be based on information provided the government by witnesses who began cooperating late last year and early this year, according to individuals familiar with the investigation.  Those witnesses include three Drexel employees who worked for Mr. Milken and a former client of Mr. Milken's.  Drexel agreed last December to plead guilty to six felony counts to avoid racketeering charges.  A provision of Drexel's criminal plea agreement calls for the firm not to pay Mr. Milken or his brother much of their 1988 compensation.  The Milkens have challenged that provision.  U.S. District Judge Kimba Wood said in court yesterday that she will hold a hearing on the motion later this month or early next month.  Treasury bond prices were narrowly mixed in light trading yesterday as investors braced for a deluge of new government notes and bonds to be auctioned this week.  Today, the Treasury begins the quarterly refunding of government debt with the sale of $10 billion of three-year notes.  The Treasury will sell $9.75 billion of 10-year notes tomorrow and $9.75 billion of 30-year bonds Thursday.  The auction had been contingent upon Congress raising the debt ceiling, which it did late Friday by increasing the government's credit limit by $70 billion to $2.87 trillion.  Trading was modest ahead of the auction as many investors, still nervous from Friday's sharp two-point sell-off, seemed reluctant to stake new positions.  The benchmark Treasury bond lost about $21.25 per $1,000 face value Friday.  "People are uncertain," said Michael Moran, a trading manager at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  "They want to wait" to gauge how well the auction is progressing before making their next moves, he said.  In yesterday's trading, bond prices were moderately lower early in the day as investors worried about absorbing the $29.5 billion of new securities.  But later, Treasury securities gained modest strength as the value of the U.S. dollar rose on foreign-exchange markets.  A stronger dollar led to speculation that foreign investors, especially the Japanese, will become significant participants in the auction.  "That made people a little bullish," said Richard L. Sandor, senior vice president, financial futures and options, at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  As a result, the benchmark 30-year bond stabilized and ended unchanged.  Mortgage-backed securities and corporate bonds drifted slightly lower, while municipal bonds were unchanged to 1/4 point lower.  Bond market traders and analysts at several Japanese firms agreed that Japanese investors will show some interest in the coming auction, especially for the 10-year notes and 30-year bonds.  However, the analysts seem to be divided about the extent of Japanese participation.  Robert Brusca, chief economist at Nikko Securities Co. International, said the auction will see "good" Japanese interest because "the dollar has perked back up and Japanese political problems that hurt the yen are far from over."  He expects Japanese to favor the 10-year notes over the other issues because of the relatively high yield.  In when-issued trading, the new three-year notes were quoted at a price to yield 7.99%, the 10-year notes at 7.98% and the 30-year bonds at 8.03%.  Scott E. Pardee, co-chairman of Yamaichi International America Inc., said the Japanese "will show considerable interest" in the auctions "because of the considerable amount of cash" held by Japanese investors.  He cautioned, however, that Japanese buying interest in the auctions could be curbed by uncertainty about the dollar's longer-term direction, a narrower differential between U.S. and Japanese interest rates and a growing preference on the part of Japanese investors for U.S. stocks rather than U.S. bonds.  The Japanese "will have a difficult time making up their minds" about what to do at the auctions, said Mr. Pardee.  "The Japanese are stuck in the same box as domestic investors.  They would like to buy on a dip, but they're nervous about how much farther the market will go."  In addition to the refunding, investors were concerned about how the thrift bailout plan that Congress and the White House hammered out late last week will affect the Treasury market.  Under the plan, the U.S. must raise a rescue fund of about $50 billion -- $20 billion of which must be placed by Sept. 30.  Treasury Undersecretary Robert Glauber has said the government will raise the $20 billion by drawing from cash balances and issuing cash-management bills, or short-term IOUs.  The debt will then be refinanced across a broad spectrum of Treasury securities in October, November and December, he said.  On Thursday, the government will auction $15 billion of 247-day cash-management bills, up from the originally scheduled $10 billion.  The sale will provide a portion of the initial cash needed for the thrift rescue plan.  Meanwhile, short-term interest rates jumped at the government's weekly Treasury bill auction.  The average discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was 7.94%, up sharply from last week's average rate of 7.65%.  The average discount rate on new six-month Treasury bills was 7.70%, up from 7.35% last week.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds were mixed in modest trading ahead of the government's quarterly refunding.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late yesterday at a price of 108 28/32 to yield 8.07%, unchanged from Friday.  The latest 10-year notes were essentially unchanged at 107 15/32 to yield 8.01%.  At the government's weekly auction, the average discount rates on the three-month bills was the highest since the average of 8.09% at the auction on July 24.  The average rate on six-month bills was the highest since 7.73% on July 24.  Here are details of yesterday's Treasury bill auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @Applications ........... $23,082,435,000 $22,152,415,000  @Accepted bids .......... $6,605,425,000 $6,601,075,000  @Accepted at low price .. 42% 98%  @Accepted noncompet'ly .. $1,210,695,000 $1,209,650,000  @Average price (Rate) ... 97.993 (7.94%) 96.107 (7.70%)  @High price (Rate) ...... 98.003 (7.90%) 96.127 (7.66%)  @Low price (Rate) ....... 97.988 (7.96%) 96.102 (7.71%)  @Coupon equivalent ...... 8.21% 8.12%  Both issues are dated Aug. 10.  The 13-week bills mature Nov. 9, and the 26-week bills mature Feb. 8, 1990.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Prices of mortgage-backed securities were down late yesterday, but off session lows.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities for August delivery were down 1/8 at 97 27/32.  The spread between the Ginnie Mae issue and the Treasury 10-year note stood at 1.44 percentage points, where it was late Friday.  Traders said mortgage-backed securities are performing well, given the unusually large amount of paper sold by thrifts last week.  The traders say price declines continued to be somewhat limited because underwriters are using the newly available collateral to form mortgage-backed deals, which remain attractive to investors.  Earlier today, Merrill Lynch Capital Markets increased the size of its previously offered Freddie Mac-77 collateralized mortgage obligation issue to $1.25 billion from $500 million.  That makes it the largest Freddie Mac CMO issue to come to market to date, according to Merrill.  Ginnie Mae 8 1/2% securities fell 5/32 to 95 20/32, and 9 1/2% securities, at 99 25/32, were down 4/32.  Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities fell 5/32 to 98 26/32, and the 10% issue, at 100 23/32, fell 2/32.  Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities fell 5/32 to 99 14/32, and the 10% issue, at 101 4/32, was down 1/32.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were mostly unchanged to 1/4 point weaker late yesterday, but the short end of the market continued to register marked price losses.  Yields for municipal notes were up 0.10 to 0.20 percentage point, after soaring 0.15 to 0.30 percentage point Friday.  One trader estimated that upwards of $400 million of municipal notes came up for bids yesterday.  The bulk of yesterday's selling was by dealers who, according to traders, were heavily stocked with recently issued municipal notes.  But institutional investors have also been sellers, with at least one bond fund said to have put $150 million of various notes up for sale yesterday.  The municipal note market "blood bath," as one trader termed it, began Friday when the July jobs report spurred a wave of dealer selling.  Yesterday's issuance pace was moderate.  Among the larger deals engineered was the pricing of $80.8 million of senior lien refunding electric revenue bonds for the municipality of Anchorage, Alaska, by a group led by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  The $1 billion of Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority bonds priced last week were freed to trade yesterday, and prices in the secondary market fell sharply below formal reoffering levels.  Yields for term bonds were 0.06 to 0.16 percentage point higher than at the formal reoffering.  Foreign Bonds  British government bonds ended slightly firmer on a downward revision in British retail sales data.  But in other major markets, government bond prices were hurt by Friday's sharp declines in the U.S. Treasury market.  In Britain, prices were slightly lower in early trading but rebounded after the government said retail sales in June fell 2.3% from May.  The government had estimated the decline earlier at 1.8%.  Among benchmark issues, the Treasury's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 7/32 to end at 115 10/32, yielding 9.68%, while its 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 1/32 to close at 99 29/32, yielding 11.77%.  In Japan, government bonds ended lower again, though traders said the tone was firm considering the yen's weakness.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at a price of 96.80, down 0.12 yen for each 100 yen face value.  The yield rose to 5.125%.  West German government bonds held to narrow ranges and ended down about 0.25 point on the long end.  Bonn's 6 3/4% issue due June 1999 ended at 100.45 to yield 6.68%, off 0.25 from late Friday.  The 6 3/4% notes due 1994 fell 0.20 to par.  Among recent Eurobonds, the World Bank's 6 3/4% mark bonds due 1999 fell 0.25 point to 99.15, to yield 6.87%.  Corporate Issues  Prices of most corporate issues closed about 1/8 point lower.  Trading activity was slow as investors digested last week's $5.5 billion of new issues.  The bulk of the new notes and bonds priced last week have been freed to trade and were generally trading below par and at a wider yield differential over Treasurys.  ENVIRONMENTAL BOOM: Howrey & Simon, a 150-lawyer firm in Washington, D.C., brought in Steven L. Leifer, 36 years old, as its first partner in its week-old environmental law practice group.  By 1990, the firm plans to have as many as 10 environmental lawyers, said Mr. Leifer, formerly a partner at the Washington office of Rivkin, Radler, Dunne & Bayh, based in Uniondale, N.Y. . . .  Meanwhile, in Rochester, N.Y., Nixon, Hargrave, Devans & Doyle expanded its environmental practice to 45 lawyers with the addition of partner Frank L. Amoroso, 40, and Michael J. Tone, 42, who will work as counsel to the 252-lawyer firm.  Mr. Amoroso was formerly chairman of Rivkin, Radler's environmental practice group.  Mr. Tone, formerly a solo practitioner, had served as associate counsel and deputy division director of the New York State Department of Environmental Conservation.  Messrs.  Amoroso and Tone will handle wetlands, Superfund litigation and environment-related real estate transactions in the New York City area.  FORMER AT&T COUNSEL JOINS FIRM: Joseph A. Hoffman, formerly vice president and assistant general counsel of American Telephone & Telegraph Co., joined the Roseland, N.J., office of Hannoch Weisman as a partner.  In June, Mr. Hoffman, 56, retired from AT&T, where he managed general litigation and environmental work.  He was a professor of environmental law at the Seton Hall University School of Law prior to joining 150-lawyer Hannoch Weisman.  Equitex Inc. said it and Acrodyne Corp. completed the purchase of the assets of MacGregor Sporting Goods Inc. in a transaction valued at about $25 million.  Equitex is an investment concern.  Acrodyne is a merchant bank based in Orchard Lake, Mich.  MacGregor, an East Rutherford, N.J., sporting goods concern, is operating under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, which protects it from creditors while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Tokyo stocks closed lower in thin dealings, though they rebounded from their worst levels after getting a push from late index-buying orders.  London share prices ended stronger -- and at highs for the day -- as active dealings among market makers had an exaggerated, though positive, impact on an extremely quiet market.  Brokers in Tokyo said the market there continued to lack energy because of a combination of factors, including late dollar gains.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues was down 111.61 points at 34630.38.  The index lost 37.82 points Friday.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 300 million shares, the slowest in weeks and down from a revised 385 million shares Friday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 460 to 402, while 223 issues remained unchanged.  In early trading Tuesday in Tokyo, the Nikkei index rose 25.80 points to 34656.18.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which fell 3.42 points Friday, was up 2.21 points at 2615.48.  One factor that discouraged investors was the dollar's gains since the Tokyo close last Friday.  Another was the party election to be held Tuesday by the ruling Liberal Democratic Party for a successor to outgoing Prime Minister Sosuke Uno.  In addition, investors avoided taking positions ahead of this week's quarterly U.S. Treasury auctions, traders said.  The U.S. Treasury will sell $13.6 billion of three-year, 10-year and 30-year bonds, and the results will be watched closely for indications about the direction of U.S. interest rates.  Brokers also blamed the lack of action on the absence of many participants because of the beginning of the "Obon" summer holiday season.  "Investors can't get motivated to trade actively when everybody else is on vacation.  It can't be helped," a trader said.  One analyst said, however, that these are merely excuses used to explain recent dull trading.  He said the problem is that the market can't find a focus to encourage buying activities.  What little buying there was Monday was targeted at speculative issues and stocks whose prices are high compared with the exchange average.  Brokers said the high-priced issues attracted some trading interest because their price movements in thin trading provide better opportunities.  Among these, high-technology and other export-oriented electrical issues in particular attracted buying interest, as investors were encouraged by the strong dollar and the companies' strong earning prospects, traders said.  TDK was up 100 yen (72 cents) at 5,860 ($41.93).  Fanuc gained 60 yen to 6,750.  Sony advanced to 8,030 yen in early trading but failed to keep its gains and eventually fell 10 yen to close at 7,970.  Monday also saw a comeback for housing issues, which led the market two weeks ago and helped the Nikkei rise to records.  These issues had fallen back last week.  Meanwhile, in London, dealers said the market gleaned some support from a firm showing on Wall Street during the London afternoon.  The market opened a fraction stronger and then proceeded to climb steadily throughout the day, pausing only intermittently on signs of limited profit-taking.  Despite the gain, most dealers remained unconvinced that the market will push far beyond current levels.  "The froth and excitement has gone out of the market," one dealer said.  "The market just isn't certain where it's headed next."  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended at a high for the day of 2341.5, up 14 points.  At its lowest, the index stood at 2328.1.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index closed up 16.2 points at 1957.  Turnover amounted to a very low 344.7 million shares, compared with 731.4 million shares Friday.  "Inter-market-making dealings dominated proceedings," one dealer noted.  At the London close, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 7.97 points at 2661.42.  Dealers said mid-morning news on U.K. final retail sales figures for June also gave the market a slight upward jolt.  B.A.T rallied 18 pence (29 cents) to 845 pence ($13.57) as players ruminated on the prospects for Hoylake's #13.2 billion ($21.2 billion) offer for the U.K. conglomerate and considered the possibility that a rival, higher offer might emerge.  The market is awaiting details on how Hoylake plans to finance the takeover, due to be published in its offer document Tuesday.  After rising sharply Friday, composite insurance stocks encountered profit-taking.  Commercial Union fell 17 pence to 405, Guardian Royal slipped 2 to 223, and Sun Alliance fell 2 to 298.  "Recent bid speculation in the sector has been overdone," one trader said.  Thorn EMI rallied 18 pence to 853 following news reports that suggested the company has a potential breakup value of #15 a share.  In sympathy, Rank Organisation rallied 12 to 983.  In Frankfurt, share prices rose, then fell, ending lopsided in choppy trading as market participants bought into auto maker issues but took profits on other industry groups.  Share prices in Amsterdam closed mixed with sufficient gains to push the market's main indicator to a record for the second consecutive session.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Zurich, Brussels and Milan and lower in Paris and Stockholm.  South African gold stocks closed mixed.  In Sydney, the market shrugged off a sharp drop in the gold price and a lackluster showing by Wall Street Friday to post its third consecutive post-crash high.  Share prices in Hong Kong finished lower in moderately active trading after failing to sustain a sharp morning rally.  Taipei stock prices advanced sharply on bullish sentiment, pushing the key market barometer near the 10000-point level.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Seoul, Singapore and Wellington and lower in Manila.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 4 Aug 3 Year  @ U.S. ................... 316.7 317.4 + 23.7  @ Britain ................ 702.8 697.5 + 28.7  @ Canada ................. 433.0 433.2 + 17.9  @ Japan .................. 1546.5 1549.1 + 8.9  @ France ................. 523.2 526.9 + 18.2  @ Germany ................ 249.0 247.5 + 19.8  @ Hong Kong .............. 1922.3 1970.7 - 5.3  @ Switzerland ............ 228.4 228.4 + 32.1  @ Australia .............. 335.7 335.1 + 15.6  @ World index ............ 542.0 545.4 + 9.6  USAir Group Inc., in a move that might be designed to ward off unwanted suitors, sold Berkshire Hathaway Inc. $358 million of preferred stock that is convertible to a 12% stake in the carrier.  The move is unusual because it marks the first major investment in an airline by Berkshire Hathaway Chairman Warren E. Buffett, who has tended to shy away from investments in capital-intensive and labor-intensive industries.  However, the method of investment closely parallels Mr. Buffett's $600 million purchase last month of preferred stock that is convertible into an 11% stake in Gillette Co., which has narrowly escaped battles with hostile investors in recent years.  In Omaha, Neb., Mr. Buffett said late yesterday that his USAir Group investment is friendly to management, with which he said he is happy.  The closely followed investor added that he wants to see USAir Group remain independent.  The Washington-based airline holding company said Berkshire Hathaway acquired a new issue of 9.25% Series A cumulative preferred stock that is convertible after two years into USAir Group common at a conversion price of $60 a share.  USAir Group estimated that the Berkshire Hathaway stake represents about 12% of its voting shares.  Unlike the Gillette move, Mr. Buffett won't become a director of USAir Group.  USAir Group, which said it welcomed Mr. Buffett's move, has been the subject of takeover speculation since late July when an investment group that includes Steinhardt Partners Limited Partnership of New York raised its stake in USAir Group to 5.89% and indicated it may consider seeking control of the company.  Since the Steinhardt move, the price of USAir Group has risen more than $5 a share.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, USAir Group common rose $1 to $53 a share, and Berkshire Hathaway fell $25 to $7,650 a share.  The Berkshire Hathaway investment was disclosed by USAir Group after the close of trading.  The sale of such a large stake is the strongest statement yet by USAir Group that it doesn't want to get wrapped up in the takeover frenzy that has ensnared UAL Corp. and NWA Inc.  This summer, USAir Group adopted a so-called poison pill measure and yesterday announced that it had expanded its common share buy-back program to 7.2 million shares from the five million shares it announced earlier.  On June 30, USAir Group had about 43.9 million common shares outstanding.  USAir Group said it will use proceeds from the preferred stock sale to finance its common share repurchase program.  The company also said it is mulling whether to adopt an Employee Stock Ownership Plan.  Monday, August 7, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.:8.60% 28 to 44 days; 8.40% 45 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.75% 30 days; 8.60% 60 days; 8.50% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.14% one month; 8.09% two months; 8.04% three months; 7.97% six months; 7.89% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.75% one month; 8.60% three months; 8.60% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES:8.65% 30 days; 8.50% 60 days; 8.38% 90 days; 8.27% 120 days; 8.20% 150 days; 8.15% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% one month; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% two months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% three months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% four months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% five months; 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 7/8% one month; 8 3/4% three months; 8 5/8% six months; 8 9/ 16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 7, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94%, 13 weeks; 7.70%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.03%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).9.95%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.85%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.73%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  STOCK PRICES SOARED as dwindling recession fears prompted investors to shift their strategies.  The Dow Jones industrials jumped 41.54 points, to 2694.99, a post-crash high and less than 28 points short of the record.  Still, traders questioned how long the stock market rally will last.  Bond prices finished unchanged, while the dollar recorded modest gains.  ---  UAL's stock rocketed $46.25, to $210.75, after United Air's parent confirmed receiving a takeover bid from investor Marvin Davis.  Other airline stocks surged, pushing the Dow Jones Transportation Average up a record 94.06, to a new high of 1344.06.  ---  USAir sold Berkshire Hathaway $358 million of preferred stock convertible to a 12% stake, possibly to ward off unwanted suitors.  It is the first major airline investment by Berkshire's chairman Buffett.  ---  Banking regulators approved Prudential Insurance's acquisition of an insolvent Georgia thrift.  The deal is likely to be among the first to take advantage of broader marketing activities allowed in the S&L bill.  ---  Civil insider-trading charges were filed by the SEC against two Merrill Lynch ex-employees and a New York lawyer whose 1985 stock transactions led to the unraveling of Dennis Levine's stock-trading scheme.  ---  Hewlett-Packard plans to announce today an alliance with South Korea's Samsung.  The move is likely to fuel competition among makers of computer workstations and to speed the arrival of low-cost models.  ---  AT&T accused MCI of giving special discounts to several big clients without filing details with the FCC.  The unusual complaint could prompt a policy review by the agency.  ---  Warner-Lambert said earnings prospects have improved further.  The company also is seeking acquisitions and isn't interested in a merger despite continued takeover rumors.  ---  Mutual funds may be required by the SEC to disclose who is managing the portfolio and to notify investors of any change in managers, agency staffers say.  The plan is certain to be strongly opposed by the industry.  ---  Jerrico agreed to be acquired by a New York investment group for $24.25 a share, or $620 million.  The operator of Long John Silver's restaurants was a long-rumored takeover candidate.  ---  IBM plans to meet with clients and consultants today to provide details of some new telecommunications equipment, industry executives said.  ---  Reebok agreed in principle to buy CML Group's Boston Whaler unit for $42 million, signaling a major broadening of Reebok's product base.  ---  Volkswagen plans to offer more standard features in its European cars without raising prices, a strategy it began last week in the U.S.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 197,580,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2694.99, up 41.54; transportation 1344.06, up 94.06; utilities 221.52, up 3.34.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3323.09, up 1.14.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.57, off 0.36; spot index 127.94, off 0.25.  Dollar: 140.05 yen, up 0.15; 1.9162 marks, up 0.0092.  Strikes continued for a second day against three regional telephone companies, as union leaders vowed to fight for better wage increases and against proposals to shift some health-care costs to workers.  Most union employees at Nynex Corp., Pacific Telesis Group and Bell Atlantic remained off the job, with management employees filling in as operators, repairmen and installers.  There were few new developments.  Negotiators for Pacific Telesis's telephone units in California and Nevada held informal talks, but spokesmen for both sides indicated they were still far apart on health-care benefits and wages.  At Nynex, company and union negotiators haven't met since talks broke down last week.  Bargainers for the Communications Workers of America and Bell Atlantic, based in Philadelphia, also hadn't scheduled any meetings.  Yesterday, 9,000 members of the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers in New Jersey and 2,000 IBEW members in Pennsylvania struck the company, joining the CWA strike, which began Sunday.  About 160,000 union workers, mostly members of the CWA, are on strike in the three regions.  The Federal Communications Commission said it began an investigation into alleged abuses of FCC procedures by Sonrise Management Services Inc., which organized investment partnerships to apply for licenses for new FM radio stations.  Sonrise, based in Columbus, Ga., has been under scrutiny recently following the bizarre plane crash last month of lawyer-pilot Thomas Root, who represented partnerships organized by Sonrise before the FCC. Mr. Root, who was apparently unconscious as his small plane flew from Virginia to the Caribbean, survived the crash in the Atlantic Ocean but turned up with a baffling gunshot wound and a history of problems at the FCC.  The commission said information on Sonrise "raised serious questions as to whether Sonrise, its applicants and their attorneys, consultants and advisers" abused the commission's processes or broke criminal laws.  The FCC has been looking into whether Sonrise controlled the partnerships it put together, a position that would disqualify the partnerships from winning licenses.  Sonrise officials couldn't be reached for comment.  The Chicago Board Options Exchange received regulatory approval of rule changes intended to expedite arbitration cases brought against brokers by their customers.  The changes, cleared by the Securities and Exchange Commission, are identical to those approved earlier this year for the New York and American stock exchanges and the National Association of Securities Dealers.  Highlights of the new rules, which go into effect Sept. 1, provide that:  -- Individuals with close ties to the securities industry no longer be eligible for the role of public arbitrators in deciding CBOE cases.  Rather, these individuals, including lawyers and accountants who routinely represent industry firms or individuals, will be re-classified as industry arbitrators. (Arbitration committees include two public representatives and one from industry.)  -- The CBOE's official in charge of arbitration be required to provide customers with 10-year employment histories of arbitrators assigned to their claims.  -- Pre-hearing proceedings be revised to provide for exchange of documents between customers and their brokers, conferences and other matters.  -- The cap for a claim classed as "small" be raised to $10,000 from $5,000.  -- A record or tape recording of all hearings be kept and transcribed if parties involved in a dispute so wish.  -- Summaries of awards and issues arbitrated be made available at the CBOE.  Indoor air pollution makes up a major portion of the public's exposure to dirty air and may pose acute and chronic health risks, the Environmental Protection Agency said.  In a report required by Congress, the agency called for expanded research on a variety of topics, including the health effects of chemical contaminants commonly found indoors and possible ways to reduce exposure to biological pollutants.  The EPA also recommended that Congress work with private-sector organizations to develop guidelines covering ventilation, as well as building design, operation and maintenance, to ensure that public health is protected.  The report also advocates a national program of technical assistance and information dissemination to educate the public about the risks and ways to reduce them.  Specifically, the agency said the U.S. should identify the health effects from air pollution in commercial and public buildings, schools, healthcare facilities and homes.  The three-volume report also discusses causes of indoor air pollution and current strategies for controlling the hazard.  For example, building designs that reduce outdoor air ventilation in an effort to conserve energy can hurt indoor air quality, the EPA said.  A section that deals with current efforts to attack indoor pollution discusses an EPA investigation of complaints about pollution in its own headquarters and at the Library of Congress.  The local newspaper war, dormant for a year, is heating up.  The first new shots were fired about a week ago, when A.H. Belo Corp., parent of the Dallas Morning News, announced it was beginning a joint venture with Universal Press Syndicate, distributor of the Doonesbury cartoon strip and Dear Abby and Erma Bombeck columns.  The venture is intended to explore and develop electronic media possibilities for Universal's features.  But under the companies' agreement, Belo got exclusive rights to Universal Press offerings for the Dallas Morning News, the city's largest newspaper.  And the Dallas Times Herald, the No. 2 paper, got cancellation notices for 26 features it purchases from Universal.  Yesterday, charging interference with a contract and unfair competition, the Times Herald sued Belo, Universal Press and the Morning News in state court in Houston.  A bitter circulation lawsuit, in which each newspaper charged the other with inflating circulation figures, was settled last year.  Outward feuding between the papers ceased shortly after that, when the Times Herald was sold to DTH Media Inc., controlled by John Buzzetta.  The Times Herald asked the court to block the cancellations and to award unspecified actual and punitive damages.  The Morning News said it will challenge the charges.  "I think the suit is without foundation, and we will defend ourselves vigorously," said James P. Sheehan, Belo's chief operating officer.  Don Anderson, senior vice president of HBO Inc., is expected to be named today to head HBO's effort to market its new Comedy Channel, which makes its debut this fall.  For Mr. Anderson, it will be his second opportunity to try to sell a new idea to cable operators.  For him -- and for cable -- much has changed in the 13 years since his first opportunity.  In 1976, Mr. Anderson, a lone black man with a secretary and no other staff, set out to sell the cable industry in the Western U.S. on HBO, an unseen pie in the sky that would deliver movies by satellite.  Until then, Time Inc.'s HBO operated only in the Northeast corridor.  "The biggest challenge?  A new product with East Coast interest, and trying to sell to a parochial industry," recalls Mr. Anderson, who was 37 years old when he established the movie service in 13 western states.  Back then, cable operators had plenty of channels left for new services.  What they needed was the imagination to see the potential in a new idea.  As he prepares for a similar effort on behalf of the new Comedy Channel, Mr. Anderson, now age 50 and backed by a staff of 200, faces a changed environment.  Today's vastly expanded cable universe has very few empty channels.  And many cable systems will have to bump an existing service to add a new one.  Dropping an established cable channel is not an everyday thing for cable operators, in part because it's "political suicide," says analyst Dennis McAlpine of Oppenheimer & Co. There's nothing like a dropped channel, he says, to light up politicians' phones when cries are already going out for the reregulation of cable.  To make matters worse, archrival Viacom has promised to deliver its own comedy channel on the heels of HBO's planned September start-up, and Atlanta-based Cox Communications Inc. is said to be considering such a service also.  "How are we going to punch through?"  Mr. Anderson asks.  "With a compelling, high-profile network.  High profile means it's not like the weather channel, not like the shopping channel."  When pressed, Mr. Anderson says HBO will get its edge by offering cable operators extensive support in selling local ads on the comedy network.  With this "handholding," he promises to lead the affiliates deep into the most important revenue stream for cable operators today.  But more than handholding is required.  "The other hand has also got to be twisting the arm," Mr. McAlpine says.  Mr. Anderson comes across more like a cable prophet than a strong-arm man.  He was running his own communications firm in his native Los Angeles in 1972, producing in-flight music for airlines, when an employee sold him on the notion that cable was the medium of the future and that blacks would eventually have a big stake in it.  Mr. Anderson saw that cable systems, initially built in suburbs, would have to wire the "hole in the doughnut," the central cities where the largest number of blacks and other minorities live. (Many central cities still haven't been wired.)  Mr. Anderson got a head start on this vision by folding his business and heading to Washington, D.C., to direct government relations for the National Cable Television Association.  Fighting the industry's early battles, he forged the close relationships with cable operators that HBO called on to sell the first satellite cable service.  For the past four years, Mr. Anderson has overseen HBO's 16.7% stake in Black Entertainment Television, the only black-owned cable service.  HBO upgraded BET's satellite capabilities, and in that period BET expanded its reach from seven million to 23 million households.  The competition among makers of low-end workstations and high-end personal computers may be about to get much fiercer.  Hewlett-Packard Co. plans to announce today an alliance with South Korea's Samsung Group.  Under the agreement, Samsung Electronics Co. will manufacture both microprocessor chips and workstations using Hewlett-Packard's reduced-instruction-set-computing (RISC) technology and UNIX software.  RISC chips are very fast, powerful microprocessors; UNIX is an operating system offering multi-tasking and advanced graphic capabilities.  The centerpiece of their plan, the companies said, is to produce a $5,000 workstation within two years.  Such a machine, with several times the processing power of today's entry-level machines that cost about $10,000, would compete not only with low-end workstations made by Sun Microsystems Inc. and Digital Equipment Corp., but also with high-performance personal computers made by International Business Machines Corp. and Apple Computer Inc.  Hewlett-Packard said it will buy some of the Samsung workstations and resell them under its own name.  Samsung can also sell the machines on its own.  An industry consultant, Andrew Allison, said the two companies will have to ship the machine, or at least a version with performance comparable to Sun's least expensive machine, the SparcStation 1, by late next year for it to be competitive.  He said they are capable of meeting such a deadline.  Sun Microsystems has forged an alliance with two Taiwanese companies, to clone and ship low-cost versions of its workstations next year.  The strategic aim of the alliance with Samsung is to enlist Samsung's renowned ability to manufacture products, including a clone of IBM's personal computers, at very low costs, with low margins.  Hewlett-Packard is known as a producer of high-performance machines, at high margins, and wants to stay in that market.  "Clearly, we think this relationship is going to make us more competitive in the low end of the business," said Bill Kay, general manager of Hewlett-Packard's workstation group.  But just as clearly, Hewlett-Packard's direct competitors weren't impressed.  "Very simply, it's too little, too late," said Chester Silvestri, vice president for technology products for MIPS Computer Systems Inc., which licences RISC chips to manufacturers, including Digital.  Sun Microsystems said the Samsung alliance confers no special competitive advantage on Hewlett-Packard, since Sun could buy and resell machines made by low-cost producers in the Far East, if it so chose.  Its SparcStation 1 is already priced at about $10,000.  Nonetheless, Hewlett-Packard is a huge company with much greater resources than Sun and MIPS.  It dominates the RISC market with its line of high-end workstations, and is the leading maker of all kinds of workstations with its recent acquisition of Apollo Computer.  Although late to the low-end of the RISC computer market, it could be a formidable competitor.  The Samsung alliance "is a major announcement," asserted Mr. Allison.  "It puts another gorilla into the low-end UNIX systems cage."  In the past, RISC/UNIX machines have been very expensive, and limited mostly to scientific and engineering applications.  But Sun Microsystems has led a movement to offer less expensive workstations that are beginning to compete with IBM's PS/2 line and with Apple Computer's Macintosh.  The market for RISC/UNIX machines, while relatively small, is growing much faster than the market for computers using MS/DOS -- the operating system for personal computers made by IBM and its clones -- or for Apple's proprietary operating system.  In many cases, the RISC/ UNIX machines offer more speed for less money, and already offer graphics and multi-tasking capabilities that MS/DOS users can get only by upgrading to IBM's expensive new OS/2 operating system.  The major constraint on their invasion of the personal-computer market is the lack of commercial applications.  Mr. Allison predicted that these machines will run MS/DOS as well as UNIX within two years.  "It is just a prerequisite to penetrate the PC market," Mr. Allison said.  "They will all do it."  After that, the main problem facing makers of both powerful personal computers and powerful RISC/UNIX machines will be the lack of software applications that fully tap their power.  "Why do I need a $20,000 OS/2 computer to run an application that can run as fast on a $2,000 PC?" asked Mr. Allison.  Hewlett-Packard said it will also help Samsung develop less expensive sets of RISC chips that Samsung will be licensed to manufacture and sell to Hewlett-Packard and to other manufacturers.  Mr. Kay said Hewlett-Packard isn't trying to encourage clones of its machines -- a course being taken by Sun Microsystems.  Rather, it is seeking partnerships that will give it a competitive advantage in some particular niche, such as the extreme low end or extreme high end of the workstation market.  Last week, Hewlett-Packard announced an agreement with Hitachi Ltd. of Japan to develop jointly a very high-performance RISC chip set.  The two companies' goal is to develop in about two years a machine with a speed of "considerably more" than 100 million instructions per second, more than five times faster than any desktop computer available today.  But Hewlett-Packard's RISC competitors are also forging alliances and planning far faster chips.  Tomorrow, Sun Microsystems will announce an agreement with N.V. Philips of the Netherlands, under which Philips Components, a unit that is the largest semiconductor supplier in Europe, will develop RISC chips.  Sun said the agreement "will have a formidable impact on the world-wide RISC market."  ---  G. Pascal Zachary contributed to this article.  CENTRAL AMERICAN LEADERS SET a 90-day timetable to disband the Contras.  The presidents of five Central American nations, concluding a three-day summit at the Honduran resort of Tela, announced an agreement for demobilizing and repatriating 11,000 Nicaraguan rebels based in Honduras.  The plan calls for the U.S-backed guerrillas to surrender their arms to a force of Spanish, West German and Canadian soldiers within three months.  The accord also calls for talks to end El Salvador's civil war.  The Bush administration had lobbied to keep the Contra rebels intact at least until elections are held in Nicaragua.  Such voting is scheduled for February.  ---  A U.N. ENVOY EXPRESSED optimism about freeing hostages in Lebanon.  The U.N.'s undersecretary-general for peacekeeping operations, after five days of meetings in Lebanon and Syria, said current circumstances "might be more conducive" to getting Western hostages released but predicted "a long process" of diplomacy.  Israel, meanwhile, rejected a demand to free an abducted Shiite cleric, saying three Israeli soldiers had to be included in any swap of hostages and Arab prisoners.  The FBI's forensic experts believe a videotape of a hanged man showed Higgins.  The agency didn't offer a conclusion on the cause or time of death.  ---  The U.S. and Soviet Union concluded a round of talks on reducing long-range nuclear arms.  It was the first such round since Bush took office.  Both sides to the seven-week meeting in Geneva cited progress over inspection procedures, but said obstacles remain, including a dispute over U.S. plans for a space-based anti-missile system.  ---  Walesa called for a coalition government in Poland that would exclude the Communist Party.  Intensifying his objections to Prime Minister Kiszczak's government, the Solidarity leader urged two small political parties allied with the Communists -- the Peasants and the Democrats -- to switch their allegiance to his independent movement.  ---  A Tennessee court opened a divorce trial in which the judge must decide whether seven frozen embryos should go to a husband who currently doesn't want children or to his wife, who can't conceive naturally.  The case, thought to be the first in the U.S., is to focus on whether the fertilized eggs deserve consideration as a potential child.  ---  The State Department said a plane carrying Rep. Leland of Texas failed to arrive at a refugee camp near the Ethiopian-Sudanese border, raising concern about the safety of the Democrat and his group.  The aircraft was said to be Ethiopian.  The congressman has been traveling in Africa, visiting areas hit by famine and civil war.  ---  U.S. officials said the Bush administration will urge Mexico to join in tougher joint action against drug traffickers by making money laundering an extraditable offense.  Meanwhile, Secretary of State Baker, leading a high-level team in talks with Mexican officials, said Mexico had become an economic model for other debtor nations.  ---  The EPA said indoor air pollution makes up a major portion of the public's exposure to dirty air and may pose acute and chronic health risks.  In a report required by Congress, the agency called for expanded research on various topics, including the health effects of chemical contaminants found indoors and ways to cut exposure.  ---  New Zealand's ruling party elected Deputy Prime Minister Palmer to succeed Lange as prime minister.  Lange, who cited health reasons, announced his resignation Sunday after a year of Labor Party wrangling over economic policies.  The U.S. has expressed hope that Wellington's anti-nuclear policy would be reassessed.  ---  A U.N. delegation arrived in Cambodia to investigate the feasibility of forming an international body to monitor a pullout of Vietnam's troops, scheduled to be completed next month, Phnom Penh's official news agency reported.  The fact-finding team was sent by an international conference on Cambodia that opened July 30 in Paris.  ---  Firefighters battled dozens of blazes on 182,000 acres in seven states in the West.  More than 220,000 acres have been scorched by wildfires that began last month, and thousands of "dry lightning" strikes raised fears of new forest fires in the region.  ---  Sri Lanka's president called a special cabinet meeting to discuss negotiations for the withdrawal of India's 45,000 peacekeeping troops from the island nation.  New Delhi, which withdrew 875 soldiers Sunday, is to pull out 725 more today.  Colombo has accused the soldiers of engaging in ethnic fighting between Tamils and Sinhalese.  ---  Shevardnadze said Iran had adopted a "wholly positive attitude" toward ending the conflict in Afghanistan, and he expressed hope that Pakistan would join negotiations to settle the civil war.  The Soviet foreign minister, concluding a 24-hour trip to Kabul, also stressed that Moscow would continue military aid to the Afghan government.  Continuing perception that U.S. interest rates have hit bottom for the time being boosted the dollar.  Foreign-exchange traders also traced support for the dollar to a three-day U.S. Treasury refinancing operation starting today, in which approximately $29.5 billion in three-year, 10-year and 30-year Treasury issues will be sold.  In addition, the agency Thursday is selling $15 billion in short-term cash-management bills.  Traders expect fairly brisk overseas interest for the government bonds and a correlative demand for the U.S. currency to buy the bills.  After a stronger-than-expected U.S. employment report for July was released Friday, the dollar rallied vigorously because the healthy employment figures suggest the U.S. Federal Reserve has, in a recent series of credit easings, added enough stimulus to the economy to divert the threat of a recession.  The dollar suffered in recent weeks from the impression that the Fed would have to continue depressing interest rates to foster economic growth.  Lower interest rates generally reduce demand for the domestic currency by hurting returns on many interest-bearing investments.  While Friday's data advance the economy's position for a "soft landing," or measured economic growth with lower inflation, dealers warned the market's exuberance could be hastily reversed if future indicators reflect a less certain course for the economy.  "We're wondering, 'is this for real?  One lousy number and we're all bullish again,'" said Francoise Soares-Kemp, vice president of treasury at Credit Suisse in New York.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9162 marks, up from 1.9070 marks late Friday, and at 140.05 yen, up modestly from 139.90 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5991, below $1.6060 late Friday.  In Tokyo Tuesday, the dollar opened for trading at 139.55 yen, down from Monday's Tokyo close of 139.78 yen.  The dollar traded in a stable, tight range through the Asian day, then climbed at the start of European trading.  The dollar's inability to rupture a technically important barrier at 1.9150 marks and concern over Fed intervention, after a reported action by the central bank Friday, prompted profit-taking as European trading wound down.  But demand for the U.S. currency revived in afternoon New York trading, pushing the dollar to its intraday high of 1.9185 marks.  Apart from the optimism for U.S. interest rates and the promise of bond-market-related dollar purchases, the release tomorrow of the Fed's "Beige Book" report on economic activity may also help the U.S. currency.  "The book will give some feel for Fed monetary policy," Ms. Soares-Kemp said.  "I would suggest that they see that maybe the economy has bottomed out," meaning there won't be a rush to ease credit further.  Keith Cheveralls, vice president and chief foreign-exchange dealer at Nippon Credit Bank in New York, said he sees less revelation than confirmation coming from the "Beige Book."  "It may not differ from recent comments by {Fed Chairman Alan} Greenspan" in testimony before Congress, he said.  In that testimony, Mr. Greenspan voiced Fed satisfaction with inflation control and suggested the monetary authority had shifted its focus to stimulating the economy enough to avoid a recession.  Nonetheless, Mr. Cheveralls said, the employment data indicate the Fed's more lax credit stance will suffice for now.  The next major reading on the U.S. economy for July comes Friday with the producer price index and retail-sales data.  The PPI is the most closely watched indicator and could disturb the market if it comes in far from the expected 0.1% rise, traders said.  On New York's Commodity Exchange, gold for current delivery settled at $365.90 an ounce, down $1.90.  Estimated volume was a moderate 2.6 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at $366.15 an ounce. 